Missouri, session 2026, SB1517.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 64.401, 66.265, 67.799, 67.990,
67.1422, 67.1531, 67.1551, 67.1880, 68.235, 68.250, 71.800,
71.802, 80.460, 90.500, 92.010, 92.031, 92.035, 94.060, 94.070,
94.250, 94.260, 94.340, 94.350, 94.400, 95.150, 95.390,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1517 2
115.123, 137.016, 137.037, 137.055, 137.065, 137.073, 137.082,
137.115, 137.565, 137.570, 137.1040, 137.1050, 137.1055,
139.053, 162.441, 162.840, 164.021, 164.151, 167.231, 178.881,
182.010, 182.015, 182.020, 182.030, 182.100, 182.140, 182.650,
182.655, 182.715, 182.717, 184.350, 184.351, 184.353, 184.357,
184.359, 184.600, 184.604, 184.614, 190.040, 190.065, 190.074,
190.296, 198.260, 198.263, 198.310, 204.250, 205.563, 205.979,
206.070, 206.120, 209.130, 210.860, 233.172, 233.200, 233.345,
233.455, 233.460, 233.510, 235.175, 238.232, 247.130, 247.350,
247.470, 247.550, 249.929, 249.1106, 249.1150, 250.060,
256.445, 257.360, 257.370, 262.598, 263.452, 263.472, 278.240,
278.280, 321.225, 321.240, 321.241, 321.243, 321.244, 321.460,
321.610, 321.620, 650.399, and 650.408, RSMo, and section
67.457 as enacted by house bill no. 175 merged with house bill
no. 1035 merged with senate bill no. 248, ninety-seventh general
assembly, first regular session, and section 163.021 as enacted
by senate bill no. 727, one hundred second general assembly,
second regular session, are repealed and one hundred eighteen
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
64.401, 66.265, 67.457, 67.496, 67.799, 67.990, 67.1422,
67.1531, 67.1551, 67.1880, 68.235, 68.250, 71.800, 71.802,
80.460, 90.500, 92.010, 92.031, 92.035, 94.060, 94.070, 94.250,
94.260, 94.340, 94.350, 94.400, 95.150, 95.390, 115.123,
115.240, 115.706, 137.016, 137.037, 137.039, 137.055, 137.065,
137.073, 137.082, 137.115, 137.565, 137.1040, 137.1050,
137.1055, 139.035, 139.053, 162.441, 162.840, 163.021, 164.021,
164.151, 167.231, 178.881, 182.010, 182.015, 182.020, 182.030,
182.100, 182.140, 182.650, 182.655, 182.715, 182.717, 184.350,
184.351, 184.353, 184.357, 184.359, 184.600, 184.604, 184.614,
190.040, 190.065, 190.074, 190.296, 198.260, 198.263, 198.310,
204.250, 205.563, 205.979, 206.070, 206.120, 209.130, 210.860,
233.172, 233.200, 233.345, 233.455, 233.460, 233.510, 235.175,

SB 1517 3
238.232, 247.130, 247.350, 247.470, 247.550, 249.929, 249.1106,
249.1150, 250.060, 256.445, 257.360, 257.370, 262.598, 263.452,
263.472, 278.240, 278.280, 321.225, 321.240, 321.241, 321.243,
321.244, 321.460, 321.610, 321.620, 650.399, and 650.408, to
read as follows:
64.401. 1. Persons residing in an area adjacent to
and within three miles of a municipality that has formed and
established a park system under sections 90.010 to 90.020
and 90.500 to 90.570 may petition to become part of the park
system in the manner prescribed in this subsection. The
petition shall include a description of the territory to be
embraced by the park system, the provision for a tax to
support the park system at the rate of tax which residents
of the municipality are required to pay to support the park
system, and the signatures of five percent of the qualified
voters within the area outside the municipality as
determined by the county clerk on the basis of the number of
votes cast in the area for governor in the last election
held prior to filing of the petition. The petition shall be
filed with the governing body of the municipality and the
county clerk. The governing body of the municipality shall
within thirty days of receipt of the petition vote to
approve or reject the request of the adjacent property
owners to become part of the municipal parks system at a
regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body of the
municipality. The governing body of the municipality shall
notify the county clerk of its action. If the governing
body of the municipality rejects the request, no further
action on the matter shall be taken for a period of one year
after the date that the governing body rejects the request.
After such period of time, the persons residing in the area
may submit a new petition pursuant to this subsection. If

SB 1517 4
the governing body of the municipality approves the request,
the county clerk shall proceed as prescribed in subsections
2 and 3 of this section.
2. Upon approval of the issue by the governing body of
the municipality as prescribed in subsection 1 of this
section, the county clerk shall present the petition to the
county commission who shall thereupon set the petition for
hearing not less than thirty days nor more than forty days
after the filing.
3. Notice shall be given by the county commission of
the time and place where the hearing will be held, by
publication on three separate days in one or more newspapers
having a general circulation within the territory proposed
to be incorporated as part of the park system, the first of
which publications shall be not less that twenty days prior
to the date set for the hearing and if there is no such
newspaper, then notice shall be posted in ten of the most
public places in the territory, not less than twenty days
prior to the date set for the hearing. This notice shall
include a description of the territory as set out in the
petition, the question of incorporation for park system
services and the rate of tax which residents within the area
outside the municipality would be required to pay to support
the park system as set out in the petition.
4. If the county commission finds that the petition
and notice meet the requirements of subsections 1, 2 and 3
of this section, and that the boundaries as defined are
reasonable boundaries for the incorporation of the area into
the park system, the county commission shall order the
submission of the question.

SB 1517 5
5. The question shall be submitted to the voters
within the area outside the municipality [substantially in
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the area be part of the public park system
of the ______ (city, town, village) and shall a
______ cent tax on each one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation within the area be levied for
public parks?
□ YES □ NO]
6. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by
the qualified voters within the area outside the
municipality voting thereon are in favor of the proposal,
then the area shall be part of the municipal park system as
of the first day of the year following the year of the
election.
7. The results of the election shall be certified by
the election official of the county not less than thirty
days after the election. In the event the proposal fails to
receive a majority of the votes within the area outside the
municipality in favor of the proposal, then such proposal
shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one
year of the date of the election the proposal was rejected.
8. If the area outside the municipality votes to join
the municipal park system, then such an area shall have
proportional representation on the park board in accordance
with its population to the population of the municipality,
except that such area shall be entitled to at least one
representative on the park board. The county clerk shall
determine the number of additional representatives by
dividing the population of the municipality based on the
last decennial census by nine to produce the quotient and

SB 1517 6
shall allocate to the area that has voted to join the
district one representative per quotient or part thereof
which representative or representatives shall be in addition
to the nine representatives from the municipality. The
county commission shall appoint board members who shall have
resided in the area outside the municipality which is
included within the municipal park system for terms of three
years. Where the area is in more than one county, the
county commissions of each county shall, as nearly as
practicable, evenly appoint such members with the county
commission of the county having the largest area within the
100 system appointing a greater number of board members if the
101 members cannot be appointed evenly. Residents of such area
102 residing outside the municipal boundaries shall have the
103 same right of access to parks and park facilities in the
104 municipal park system as residents of the municipality.
105 9. The provisions of sections 90.010 to 90.020 and
106 90.500 and 90.570 shall apply to all areas outside the
107 municipality that are included in the municipal park system
108 under the provisions of this section.
66.265. 1. Any county of the first classification
having a charter form of government and containing part of a
city with a population of three hundred thousand or more
inhabitants may, after voter approval pursuant to subsection
2 of this section, levy an annual tax for the purpose of
providing law enforcement services within such county in an
amount not to exceed fourteen cents per one hundred dollars
assessed valuation.
2. The ballot of submission shall be [substantially in
the following form:] submitted as provided in section
115.706.

SB 1517 7
[Shall ______ County impose a property tax upon
all real and tangible personal property within the
county at a rate of ______ (insert the amount)
cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation
for the purpose of providing revenue for law
enforcement within the county?
□ YES □ NO]
If a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question
within the county vote in favor of the tax, such tax shall
be levied and collected pursuant to this section. If a
majority of the voters voting on the question within the
county vote against the tax, no such tax shall be levied and
collected pursuant to this section.
3. The county collector of each county in which the
authority is located shall collect the property taxes upon
all real property and tangible personal property within that
county in the same manner as any other property taxes are
collected. The governing body of the county shall use the
proceeds of the tax prescribed in this section solely for
providing law enforcement services in the county.
67.457. 1. To establish a neighborhood improvement
district, the governing body of any city or county shall
comply with either of the procedures described in subsection
2 or 3 of this section.
2. The governing body of any city or county proposing
to create a neighborhood improvement district may by
resolution submit the question of creating such district to
all qualified voters residing within such district at a
general [or special] election [called for that purpose].
Such resolution shall set forth the project name for the
proposed improvement, the general nature of the proposed

SB 1517 8
improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the
boundaries of the proposed neighborhood improvement district
to be assessed, and the proposed method or methods of
assessment of real property within the district, including
any provision for the annual assessment of maintenance costs
of the improvement in each year during the term of the bonds
issued for the original improvement and after such bonds are
paid in full. The governing body of the city or county may
create a neighborhood improvement district when the question
of creating such district has been approved by the vote of
the percentage of electors within such district voting
thereon that is equal to the percentage of voter approval
required for the issuance of general obligation bonds of
such city or county under Article VI, Section 26 of the
constitution of this state. The notice of election
containing the question of creating a neighborhood
improvement district shall contain the project name for the
proposed improvement, the general nature of the proposed
improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the
boundaries of the proposed neighborhood improvement district
to be assessed, the proposed method or methods of assessment
of real property within the district, including any
provision for the annual assessment of maintenance costs of
the improvement in each year after the bonds issued for the
original improvement are paid in full, and a statement that
the final cost of such improvement assessed against real
property within the district and the amount of general
obligation bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the
estimated cost of such improvement, as stated in such
notice, by more than twenty-five percent, and that the
annual assessment for maintenance costs of the improvements
shall not exceed the estimated annual maintenance cost, as

SB 1517 9
stated in such notice, by more than twenty-five percent.
The ballot upon which the question of creating a
neighborhood improvement district is submitted to the
qualified voters residing within the proposed district shall
contain a question in substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (name of city or county) be
authorized to create a neighborhood improvement
district proposed for the ______ (project name
for the proposed improvement) and incur
indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds
to pay for all or part of the cost of public
improvements within such district, the cost of
all indebtedness so incurred to be assessed by
the governing body of the ______ (city or
county) on the real property benefitted by such
improvements for a period of ______ years, and,
if included in the resolution, an assessment in
each year thereafter with the proceeds thereof
used solely for maintenance of the improvement?
3. As an alternative to the procedure described in
subsection 2 of this section, the governing body of a city
or county may create a neighborhood improvement district
when a proper petition has been signed by the owners of
record of at least two-thirds by area of all real property
located within such proposed district. Each owner of record
of real property located in the proposed district is allowed
one signature. Any person, corporation, or limited
liability partnership owning more than one parcel of land
located in such proposed district shall be allowed only one
signature on such petition. The petition, in order to
become effective, shall be filed with the city clerk or
county clerk. A proper petition for the creation of a

SB 1517 10
neighborhood improvement district shall set forth the
project name for the proposed improvement, the general
nature of the proposed improvement, the estimated cost of
such improvement, the boundaries of the proposed
neighborhood improvement district to be assessed, the
proposed method or methods of assessment of real property
within the district, including any provision for the annual
assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement in each
year during the term of the bonds issued for the original
improvement and after such bonds are paid in full, a notice
that the names of the signers may not be withdrawn later
than seven days after the petition is filed with the city
clerk or county clerk, and a notice that the final cost of
such improvement assessed against real property within the
district and the amount of general obligation bonds issued
therefor shall not exceed the estimated cost of such
improvement, as stated in such petition, by more than twenty-
five percent, and that the annual assessment for maintenance
costs of the improvements shall not exceed the estimated
annual maintenance cost, as stated in such petition, by more
than twenty-five percent.
4. Upon receiving the requisite voter approval at an
election or upon the filing of a proper petition with the
city clerk or county clerk, the governing body may by
100 resolution or ordinance determine the advisability of the
101 improvement and may order that the district be established
102 and that preliminary plans and specifications for the
103 improvement be made. Such resolution or ordinance shall
104 state and make findings as to the project name for the
105 proposed improvement, the nature of the improvement, the
106 estimated cost of such improvement, the boundaries of the
107 neighborhood improvement district to be assessed, the

SB 1517 11
108 proposed method or methods of assessment of real property
109 within the district, including any provision for the annual
110 assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement in each
111 year after the bonds issued for the original improvement are
112 paid in full, and shall also state that the final cost of
113 such improvement assessed against the real property within
114 the neighborhood improvement district and the amount of
115 general obligation bonds issued therefor shall not, without
116 a new election or petition, exceed the estimated cost of
117 such improvement by more than twenty-five percent.
118 5. The boundaries of the proposed district shall be
119 described by metes and bounds, streets or other sufficiently
120 specific description. The area of the neighborhood
121 improvement district finally determined by the governing
122 body of the city or county to be assessed may be less than,
123 but shall not exceed, the total area comprising such
124 district.
125 6. In any neighborhood improvement district organized
126 prior to August 28, 1994, an assessment may be levied and
127 collected after the original period approved for assessment
128 of property within the district has expired, with the
129 proceeds thereof used solely for maintenance of the
130 improvement, if the residents of the neighborhood
131 improvement district either vote to assess real property
132 within the district for the maintenance costs in the manner
133 prescribed in subsection 2 of this section or if the owners
134 of two-thirds of the area of all real property located
135 within the district sign a petition for such purpose in the
136 same manner as prescribed in subsection 3 of this section.
137 7. Prior to any assessment hereafter being levied
138 against any real property within any neighborhood
139 improvement district, and prior to any lien enforceable

SB 1517 12
140 under either chapter 140 or 141 being imposed after August
141 28, 2013, against any real property within a neighborhood
142 improvement district, the clerk of the governing body
143 establishing the neighborhood improvement district shall
144 cause to be recorded with the recorder of deeds for the
145 county in which any portion of the neighborhood improvement
146 district is located a document conforming to the provisions
147 of sections 59.310 and 59.313, and which shall contain at
148 least the following information:
149 (1) Each and all owners of record of real property
150 located within the neighborhood improvement district at the
151 time of recording, who shall be identified in the document
152 as grantors and indexed by the recorder, as required under
153 and pursuant to section 59.440;
154 (2) The governing body establishing the neighborhood
155 improvement district and the title of any official or agency
156 responsible for collecting or enforcing any assessments, who
157 shall be identified in the document as grantees and so
158 indexed by the recorder, as required under and pursuant to
159 section 59.440;
160 (3) The legal description of the property within the
161 neighborhood improvement district which may either be the
162 metes and bounds description authorized in subsection 5 of
163 this section or the legal description of each lot or parcel
164 within the neighborhood improvement district; and
165 (4) The identifying number of the resolution or
166 ordinance creating the neighborhood improvement district, or
167 a copy of such resolution or ordinance.
67.496. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, no political subdivision or election authority
shall advertise or describe any proposed tax on property in

SB 1517 13
a political subdivision as not increasing taxes, or any
language to that effect, unless both:
(1) Failing to adopt the proposed measure would cause
an actual increase in the tax rate; and
(2) Adopting the proposed measure would cause the tax
rate to stay the same or decrease.
67.799. 1. A regional recreational district may, by a
majority vote of its board of directors, impose an annual
property tax for the establishment and maintenance of public
parks and recreational facilities and grounds within the
boundaries of the regional recreational district not to
exceed sixty cents per year on each one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation on all property within the district,
except that no such tax shall become effective unless the
board of directors of the district submits to the voters of
the district[, at a county or state general, primary or
special election,] a proposal to authorize the tax.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall a ______ cent tax per one hundred dollars
assessed valuation be levied for public parks and
recreational facilities?
□ YES □ NO]
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the tax shall become effective. If a
majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting
are opposed to the proposal, then the board of directors
shall have no power to impose the tax unless and until the

SB 1517 14
board of directors of the district submits another proposal
to authorize the tax and such proposal is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
3. The property tax authorized in subsections 1 and 2
of this section shall be levied and collected in the same
manner as other ad valorem property taxes are levied and
collected.
4. (1) A regional recreational district may, by a
majority vote of its board of directors, impose a tax not to
exceed one-half of one cent on all retail sales subject to
taxation pursuant to sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the
purpose of funding the creation, operation and maintenance
of public parks, recreational facilities and grounds within
the boundaries of a regional recreational district. The tax
authorized by this subsection shall be in addition to all
other sales taxes allowed by law. No tax pursuant to this
subsection shall become effective unless the board of
directors submits to the voters of the district, at a
[county or state] general[, primary or special] election, a
proposal to authorize the tax, and such tax shall become
effective only after the majority of the voters voting on
such tax approve such tax.
(2) In the event the district seeks to impose a sales
tax pursuant to this subsection, the question shall be
submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall a ______ cent sales tax be levied on all
retail sales within the district for public parks
and recreational facilities?
□ YES □ NO

SB 1517 15
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the tax shall become effective. If a
majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting
are opposed to the proposal, then the board of directors
shall have no power to impose the tax unless and until
another proposal to authorize the tax is submitted to the
voters of the district and such proposal is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon. The
provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to any
tax approved pursuant to this subsection.
5. As used in this section, "qualified voters" or
"voters" means any individuals residing within the proposed
district who are eligible to be registered voters and who
have registered to vote under chapter 115 or, if no
individuals eligible and registered to vote reside within
the proposed district, all of the owners of real property
located within the proposed district who have unanimously
petitioned for or consented to the adoption of an ordinance
by the governing body imposing a tax authorized in this
section. If the owner of the property within the proposed
district is a political subdivision or corporation of the
state, the governing body of such political subdivision or
corporation shall be considered the owner for purposes of
this section.
67.990. 1. The governing body of any county or city
not within a county may, upon approval of a majority of the
qualified voters of such county or city voting thereon, levy
and collect a tax not to exceed five cents per one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation, or in any county of the first
classification with more than eighty-five thousand nine

SB 1517 16
hundred but less than eighty-six thousand inhabitants, the
governing body may, upon approval of a majority of the
qualified voters of the county voting thereon, levy and
collect a tax not to exceed ten cents per one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation upon all taxable property
within the county or city or for the purpose of providing
services to persons sixty years of age or older. The tax so
levied shall be collected along with other county or city
taxes, in the manner provided by law. All funds collected
for this purpose shall be deposited in a special fund for
the provision of services for persons sixty years of age or
older, and shall be used for no other purpose except those
purposes authorized in sections 67.990 to 67.995. Deposits
in the fund shall be expended only upon approval of the
board of directors established in section 67.993, if in a
county, and only in accordance with the fund budget approved
by the county governing body.
2. The question of whether the tax authorized by this
section shall be imposed shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[OFFICIAL BALLOT
Shall ______ (name of county/city) levy a tax of
______ cents per each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation for the purpose of providing services to
persons sixty years of age or older?
□ YES □ NO ]
67.1422. 1. Notwithstanding sections 67.1531,
67.1545, and 67.1551, if the petition was filed pursuant to
subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of section 67.1421 by a

SB 1517 17
governing body of the city, the governing body may adopt an
ordinance approving the petition and submit a ballot to the
qualified voters of the district[; the question shall be in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall the community improvement district to be
known as the "______ Community Improvement
District" approved by the ______ (insert governing
body) be established for the purpose of (here
summarize the proposed improvements and services)
and be authorized to impose a real property tax
upon (all real property) within the district at a
rate of not more than ten cents per hundred dollars
assessed valuation for a period of ten years from
the date on which such tax is first imposed for the
purpose of providing revenue for ______ (insert
general description of purpose) in the district?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".]
The governing body of the city shall not submit the question
to the qualified voters of the district on more than one
occasion.
2. A district levying a real property tax pursuant to
this section may repeal or amend such real property tax or
lower the tax rate of such tax if such repeal, amendment or
lower rate will not impair the district's ability to repay
any liabilities which it has incurred, money which it has
borrowed or obligations that it has issued to finance any
improvements or services rendered within the district.

SB 1517 18
3. An election conducted under this section may be
conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 115
or by mail-in ballot.
67.1531. 1. The district may levy by resolution a tax
upon real property or on any business located within the
boundaries of the district; provided however, no such
resolution shall be final nor shall it take effect until the
qualified voters approve, by mail-in ballot, the tax which
the resolution seeks to impose. If a majority of the votes
cast by the qualified voters voting on the proposed tax are
in favor of the tax, then the resolution and any amendments
thereto shall be in effect. If a majority of the votes cast
by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the tax, then
the resolution seeking to levy the tax shall be deemed to be
null and void.
2. The district may levy a real property tax rate
lower than the tax rate ceiling approved by the qualified
voters pursuant to subsection 1 of this section and may
increase that lowered tax rate to a level not exceeding the
tax rate ceiling without approval of the qualified voters.
3. The ballot shall be [substantially in the following
form:] submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[(1)
Shall the ______ (insert name of district) Community
Improvement District ("District") impose a real
property tax upon (all real property) within the
district at a rate of not more than ______ (insert
amount) dollars per hundred dollars assessed
valuation for a period of ______ (insert number)
years from the date on which such tax is first
imposed for the purpose of providing revenue for
______ (insert general description of purpose) in the
district?

SB 1517 19
□ YES □ NO
; and
(2) In the county seat of a county of the first
classification without a charter form of government
containing a population of at least two hundred thousand:
Shall the ______ (insert name of district)
Community Improvement District ("District" )
impose a real property tax within the district
at a rate of not more than ______ (insert
amount) dollars per hundred dollars of assessed
valuation and/or a business license tax in an
amount not to exceed ______ upon all persons who
are engaged in the business of ______ for a
period of ______ (insert number) years from the
date on which such tax is first imposed for the
purpose of providing revenue for ______ (insert
general description of purpose) in the district?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".]
4. No district levying a real property tax or a
business license tax pursuant to this section may repeal or
amend such real property tax or business license tax or
lower the tax rate of such tax if such repeal, amendment or
lower rate will impair the district's ability to repay any
liabilities which it has incurred, money which it has
borrowed or obligations that it has issued to finance any
improvements or services rendered within the district.

SB 1517 20
67.1551. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter
115, an election for real estate tax pursuant to sections
67.1401 to 67.1571 shall be conducted in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
2. After the board has passed a resolution for the
levy of real property tax and a vote of the qualified voters
is required, the board shall provide written notice of such
resolution to the election authority. The board shall be
entitled to rescind such resolution provided that written
notice of such rescission is delivered to the election
authority prior to the time the election authority mails the
ballots to the qualified voters.
3. Upon receipt of written notice of a district's
resolution for the levy of a real property tax the election
authority shall:
(1) Specify a date upon which the election shall occur
which date shall be a Tuesday, and shall be not earlier than
the tenth Tuesday, and not later than the fifteenth Tuesday,
after the date of the board's passage of the resolution and
shall not be on the same day as an election conducted
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 115. After August 28,
2026, such elections shall occur on the general election day;
(2) Publish notice of the election in a newspaper of
general circulation within the municipality two times. The
first publication date shall be more than sixty days prior
to the date of the election and the second publication date
shall be not more than thirty days and not less than ten
days prior to the date of the election. The published
notice shall include, but not be limited to, the following
information:
(a) The name and general boundaries of the district;

SB 1517 21
(b) The type of tax proposed, its rate, purpose and
duration;
(c) The date the ballots for the election shall be
mailed to qualified voters;
(d) The date of the election;
(e) Qualified voters will consist of:
a. Such persons who reside within the district and who
are registered voters pursuant to the records of the
election authority as of the thirtieth day prior to the date
of the election; or
b. If no such registered voters reside in the
district, the owners of real property located within the
district pursuant to the tax records of the county clerk, or
the collector of revenue if the district is located in a
city not within a county, for real property as of the
thirtieth day prior to the date of the election;
(f) A statement that persons residing in the district
shall register to vote with the election authority on or
before the thirtieth day prior to the date of the election
in order to be a qualified voter for purposes of the
election;
(g) A statement that the ballot must be returned to
the election authority's office in person, or by depositing
the ballot in the United States mail addressed to the
election authority's office and postmarked, not later than
the date of the election; and
(h) A statement that any qualified voter that did not
receive a ballot in the mail or lost the ballot received in
the mail may pick up a mail-in ballot at the election
authority's office, specifying the dates and time such
ballot will be available and the location of the election
authority's office;

SB 1517 22
(3) The election authority shall mail to each
qualified voter not more than fifteen days and not less than
ten days prior to the date of the election together with a
notice containing substantially the same information as the
published notice and a return addressed envelope directed to
the election authority's office with a sworn affidavit on
the reverse side of such envelope for the qualified voter's
signature. For purposes of mailing ballots to real property
owners only one ballot shall be mailed per capita at the
address shown on the records of the county clerk, or the
collector of revenue if the district is located in a city
not within a county. Such affidavit shall be in
substantially the following form:
FOR REGISTERED VOTERS:
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury
that I reside in the ______ (insert name)
Community Improvement District and I am a
registered voter and qualified to vote in
this election.
______________________________
Qualified Voter's
Signature
______________________________
Printed Name of Qualified
Voter
FOR REAL PROPERTY OWNERS:
I hereby declare under penalty of perjury
that I am the owner of real property in the
______ (insert name) Community Improvement
District and qualified to vote in this

SB 1517 23
election, or authorized to affix my
signature on behalf of the owner (named
below) of real property in the ______
(insert name) Community Improvement
District which is qualified to vote in this
election.
100 ______________________________
101 Signature
102 ______________________________
103 Print Name of Real Property Owner
104 If Signer is Different from Owner:
105 Name of Signer: ______
106 State Basis of Legal Authority to Sign:
107 ______
108 All persons or entities having a fee ownership in the
109 property shall sign the ballot. Additional signature pages
110 may be affixed to this ballot to accommodate all required
111 signatures.
112 4. Each qualified voter shall have one vote. Each
113 voted ballot shall be signed with the authorized signature.
114 5. Mail-in ballots shall be returned to the election
115 authority's office in person, or by depositing the ballot in
116 the United States mail addressed to the election authority's
117 office and postmarked, no later than the date of the
118 election. The election authority shall transmit all voted
119 ballots to a team of judges of not less than four, with an
120 equal number from each of the two major political parties.
121 The judges shall be selected by the municipal clerk from

SB 1517 24
122 lists compiled by the election authority. Upon receipt of
123 the voted ballots, the judges shall verify the authenticity
124 of the ballots, canvass the votes, and certify the results.
125 Certification by the election judges shall be final and
126 shall be immediately transmitted to the election authority.
127 Any qualified voter who voted in such election may contest
128 the result in the same manner as provided in chapter 115.
129 6. The results of the election shall be entered upon
130 the records of the election authority and a certified copy
131 of the election results shall be filed with the municipal
132 clerk, who shall cause the same to be entered upon the
133 records of the municipal clerk.
134 7. The district shall reimburse the election authority
135 for the costs it incurs to conduct an election under this
136 section.
67.1880. 1. If approved by at least four-sevenths of
the qualified voters voting on the question in the district,
the district may impose a property tax in an amount not to
exceed the annual rate of thirty cents on the hundred
dollars assessed valuation. The district board may levy a
property tax rate lower than its approved tax rate ceiling
and may increase that lowered tax rate to a level not
exceeding the tax rate ceiling without voter approval. The
property tax shall be uniform throughout the district.
2. The ballot of submission shall be [substantially in
the following form:] submitted as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall the ______ Law Enforcement District impose
a property tax upon all real and tangible personal
property within the district at a rate of not more
than ______ (insert amount) cents per hundred
dollars assessed valuation for the purpose of

SB 1517 25
providing revenue for the development of a project
(or projects) in the district (insert general
description of the project or projects, if
necessary)?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".]
3. The county collector of each county in which the
district is partially or entirely located shall collect the
property taxes and special benefit assessments made upon all
real property and tangible personal property within that
county and the district, in the same manner as other
property taxes are collected.
4. Every county collector having collected or received
district property taxes shall, on or before the fifteenth
day of each month and after deducting his or her
commissions, remit to the treasurer of that district the
amount collected or received by him or her prior to the
first day of the month. Upon receipt of such money, the
district treasurer shall execute a receipt therefor, which
he or she shall forward or deliver to the collector. The
district treasurer shall deposit such sums into the district
treasury, credited to the appropriate project or purpose.
The collector and district treasurer shall make final
settlement of the district account and commissions owing,
not less than once each year, if necessary.
68.235. 1. For the purposes of providing funds to pay
all, or any portion of, the qualified project costs
associated with any approved project, subsequent to the

SB 1517 26
establishment of a district pursuant to this act, and
subsequent to the circuit court's certification of a
question regarding any proposed real property tax needed to
fund a project, a port authority may levy by resolution a
tax upon real property within the boundaries of the
district; provided however, no such resolution shall be
final nor shall it take effect until the qualified voters
approve, by mail-in ballot election conducted in accordance
with section 68.250, the circuit court's certified question
regarding such proposed real property tax, provided that
such resolution shall be final and no mail-in ballot
election shall be required where the port authority is the
owner of all of the real property within the proposed
district. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified
voters voting on the proposed real property tax are in favor
of the tax, then the resolution shall become effective. If
a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting
are opposed to the real property tax, then the resolution
seeking to levy the real property tax shall be deemed to be
null and void on the date on which the election may no
longer be challenged pursuant to section 68.250. The port
authority may levy a real property tax rate lower than the
tax rate ceiling approved by the qualified voters pursuant
to this subsection and may, by resolution, increase that
lowered tax rate to a level not exceeding the tax rate
ceiling without approval of the qualified voters.
2. The ballot shall be [substantially in the following
form:] submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ (insert name of district) impose
a real property tax upon (all real property)
within the district at a rate of not more than
______ (insert amount) dollars per hundred dollars

SB 1517 27
assessed valuation for a period of ______ (insert
number) years from the date on which such tax is
first imposed for the purpose of providing revenue
for ______ (insert general description of project
or projects) in the district?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".]
3. A port authority may repeal or amend by resolution
any real property tax imposed pursuant to this section
before the expiration date of such real property tax unless
the repeal or amendment of such real property tax will
impair the port authority's ability to repay any obligations
the port authority has incurred to pay any part of the cost
of a port improvement project.
68.250. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter
115 except the provisions of section 115.125 and section
115.706, when applicable, an election for any proposed real
property tax or proposed sales and use tax, or both, within
a district pursuant to this act shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
2. After the board has passed a resolution approving
the levy of a real property tax or a sales and use tax, or
both, the board shall provide written notice of such
resolution, along with the circuit court's certified
question regarding the real property tax or the sales and
use tax, or both, as applicable, to the election authority.
The board shall be entitled to repeal or amend such
resolution provided that written notice of such repeal or

SB 1517 28
amendment is delivered to the election authority prior to
the date that the election authority mails the ballots to
the qualified voters.
3. Upon receipt of written notice of a port
authority's resolution, along with the circuit court's
certified question, for the levy of a real property tax or a
sales and use tax, or both, the election authority shall:
(1) Specify a date upon which the election shall
occur, which date shall be a Tuesday and shall be, unless
otherwise approved by the board and election authority and
applicable circuit court pursuant to section 115.125, not
earlier than the tenth Tuesday, and not later than the
fifteenth Tuesday, after the date the board passes the
resolution and shall not be on the same day as an election
conducted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 115. After
August 28, 2026, the election shall occur on the general
election day;
(2) Publish notice of the election in a newspaper of
general circulation within the municipality two times. The
first publication date shall be not more than forty-five,
but not less than thirty-five, days prior to the date of the
election and the second publication date shall be not more
than twenty, and not less than ten, days prior to the date
of the election. The published notice shall include, but
not be limited to, the following information:
(a) The name and general boundaries of the district;
(b) The type of tax proposed (real property tax or
sales and use tax or both), its rate or rates, and its
purpose or purposes;
(c) The date the ballots for the election shall be
mailed to qualified voters;
(d) The date of the election;

SB 1517 29
(e) The applicable definition of qualified voters;
(f) A statement that persons residing in the district
shall register to vote with the election authority on or
before the thirtieth day prior to the date of the election
in order to be a qualified voter for purposes of the
election;
(g) A statement that the ballot shall be returned to
the election authority's office in person, or by depositing
the ballot in the United States mail addressed to the
election authority's office and postmarked not later than
the date of the election; and
(h) A statement that any qualified voter that did not
receive a ballot in the mail or lost the ballot received in
the mail may pick up a mail-in ballot at the election
authority's office, specifying the dates and time such
ballot will be available and the location of the election
authority's office;
(3) The election authority shall mail the ballot, a
notice containing substantially the same information as the
published notice and a return addressed envelope directed to
the election authority's office with a sworn affidavit on
the reverse side of such envelope for the qualified voter's
signature, to each qualified voter not more than fifteen
days and not less than ten days prior to the date of the
election. For purposes of mailing ballots to real property
owners, only one ballot shall be mailed per capita at the
address shown on the official, or recorded, real estate
records of the county recorder, or the city recorder of
deeds if the district is located in a city not within a
county, as of the thirtieth day prior to the date of the
election. Such affidavit shall be in substantially the
following form:

SB 1517 30
FOR REGISTERED VOTERS:
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I
reside in the _________ Port Improvement District
No. _________ (insert name of district) and I am
a registered voter and qualified to vote in this
election.
__________________
Qualified Voter's
Signature
__________________
Printed Name of
Qualified Voter
FOR REAL PROPERTY OWNERS:
I hereby declare under penalty of perjury that I
am the owner of real property in the _________
Port Improvement District No. _________ (insert
name of district) and qualified to vote in this
election, or authorized to affix my signature on
behalf of the owner (named below) of real property
in the _________ Port Improvement District No.
_________ (insert name of district) which is
100 qualified to vote in this election.
101 __________________
102 Signature
103 __________________
104 Print Name of Real Property Owner
105 If Signer is Different from Owner:
106 Name of Signer: _________

SB 1517 31
107 State Basis of Legal Authority to Sign: _________
108 All persons or entities having a fee ownership in the
109 property shall sign the ballot. Additional signature pages
110 may be affixed to this ballot to accommodate all required
111 signatures.
112 4. Each qualified voter shall have one vote. Each
113 voted ballot shall be signed with the authorized signature.
114 5. Mail-in ballots shall be returned to the election
115 authority's office in person, or by depositing the ballot in
116 the United States mail addressed to the election authority's
117 office and postmarked no later than the date of the
118 election. The election authority shall transmit all voted
119 ballots to a team of judges of not less than four. The
120 judges shall be selected by the election authority from
121 lists it has compiled prior to the date by which the mail-in
122 ballots must be returned. Upon receipt of the voted
123 ballots, the judges shall verify the authenticity of the
124 ballots, canvass the votes, and certify the results.
125 Certification by the election judges shall be final and
126 shall be immediately transmitted to the election authority.
127 Any qualified voter who voted in such election may contest
128 the result in the same manner as provided in chapter 115.
129 6. The results of the election shall be entered upon
130 the records of the election authority and two certified
131 copies of the election results shall be filed with the port
132 authority and entered upon the records of the port authority.
133 7. The port authority shall reimburse the election
134 authority for the costs it incurs to conduct an election
135 under this section.

SB 1517 32
136 8. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, nothing
137 in this act shall prevent a port authority from proposing
138 both a real property tax levy question and a sales and use
139 tax levy question to the district's qualified voters in the
140 same election.
141 9. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, this
142 section shall not apply when the port authority is the owner
143 of all of the real property within the proposed district.
71.800. 1. For the purpose of paying for all costs
and expenses incurred in the operation of the district, the
provision of services or improvements authorized in section
71.796, and incidental to the leasing, construction,
acquisition, and maintenance of any improvements provided
for under sections 71.790 to 71.808 or for paying principal
and interest on notes or bonds authorized for the
construction or acquisition of any said improvement, the
district may impose a tax upon the owners of real property
within the district which shall not exceed eighty-five cents
on the one-hundred-dollar assessed valuation. In any city
other than a city not within a county, real property subject
to partial tax abatement under either the provisions of the
urban redevelopment corporations law of Missouri or the
provisions of sections 99.700 to 99.710 shall for the
purpose of assessment and collection of ad valorem real
estate taxes levied under the provisions of this section be
assessed and ad valorem real estate taxes shall be collected
as if the real estate were not subject to the tax
abatement. The collection of delinquent receipts of said
tax shall be in the same manner and form as that provided by
law for all ad valorem property taxes. Taxes levied and
collected under sections 71.790 to 71.808 shall be uniform

SB 1517 33
upon the same class of subjects within the territorial
limits of the authority levying the tax.
2. For the purpose of paying for all costs and
expenses incurred in the operation of the district and the
provision of services or improvements authorized in section
71.796, the district may impose additional tax on businesses
and individuals doing business within the district. If the
governing body imposes any business license taxes, such
additional taxes shall not exceed fifty percent of the
business license taxes. Whenever a hearing is held herein,
the governing body shall hear all protests and receive
evidence for or against the proposed action; rule upon all
protests which determination shall be final; and may
continue the hearing from time to time. Proceedings shall
terminate if protest is made by businesses in the proposed
area which pay a majority of the additional taxes within the
area. For purposes of the additional tax to be imposed
pursuant to this part, the governing body of the city may
make a reasonable classification of businesses, giving
consideration to various factors.
3. In addition to the taxes authorized by subsections
1 and 2 of this section, any district within a city which
has a population of three hundred fifty thousand or more and
is located within more than one county upon authorization of
a majority of the voters voting thereon may impose one or
more of the following special assessments on all real
property located within the district:
(1) Not more than five cents per square foot on each
square foot of land;
(2) Not more than one-half of a cent per square foot
on each square foot of improvements on land; and

SB 1517 34
(3) Not more than twelve dollars per abutting foot of
the lots, tracts and parcels of land within the district
abutting on public streets, roads and highways.
4. For purposes of sections 10(c), 16, and 22 of
article X of the Constitution of Missouri, and of section
137.073, the following terms as applied to an election
pursuant to this section mean:
(1) "Approval of the required majority" or "direct
voter approval", a simple majority;
(2) "Qualified voters", persons or other entities who
have filed an application pursuant to subsection 6 of this
section.
5. The governing body of any city in which there is a
special business district may order an election on the
approval of a new tax rate ceiling or assessment limit for
any tax imposed pursuant to subsections 1 to 3 of this
section. All costs of any such election shall be borne by
the district out of its existing levy. The order shall set
forth the new tax rate ceiling or assessment limit
proposed. Any provision of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the tax rate ceiling may be increased or
decreased, from any rate as revised under the provisions of
section 137.073 to any rate not in excess of eighty-five
cents on the one-hundred-dollar assessed valuation. Such
order shall specify a date on which ballots for the election
shall be mailed. [Such date shall be a Tuesday, and shall
be not earlier than the eighth Tuesday from the issuance of
the order, nor later than August fifteenth of the year the
order is issued and shall not be on the same day as an
election conducted under the provisions of chapter 115.]
Such election shall take place on the general election day.

SB 1517 35
6. Application for a ballot shall be conducted as
provided in this subsection:
(1) Persons entitled to apply for a ballot in an
election to approve a new tax rate ceiling for a tax imposed
pursuant to subsection 1 or 3 of this section shall be:
(a) A resident individual of the district; or
(b) A person, including an individual, partnership,
limited partnership, corporation, estate, or trust, which
owns real property within the special business district;
(2) A person entitled to apply for a ballot in an
election to approve a new tax rate ceiling for a tax imposed
pursuant to subsection 2 of this section shall be a person,
including an individual, partnership, limited partnership,
corporation, estate, or trust, which possesses a license to
100 do business in the district;
101 (3) Only persons entitled to apply for a ballot in
102 elections pursuant to this section shall apply. Such
103 persons shall apply with the clerk of the city in which the
104 special business district is organized. Each person
105 applying shall provide:
106 (a) Such person's name, address, mailing address, and
107 phone number;
108 (b) An authorized signature; and
109 (c) Evidence that such person is entitled to vote.
110 Such evidence shall be:
111 a. For resident individuals, proof of registration
112 from the election authority;
113 b. For owners of real property, a tax receipt or deed
114 or other document which evidences an equitable ownership,
115 and identifies the real property by location;
116 c. For holders of business licenses, a copy of such
117 business license;

SB 1517 36
118 (4) No person shall apply later than the fourth
119 Tuesday before the date for mailing ballots specified in the
120 governing body's order.
121 7. The clerk shall mail a ballot to each applicant of
122 the district along with a return addressed envelope directed
123 to the city clerk's office with a sworn affidavit on the
124 reverse side of such envelope for the voter's signature.
125 Such affidavit shall be in the following form:
126 I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I am
127 qualified to vote, or to affix my authorized
128 signature in the name of an entity which is entitled
129 to vote, in this election.
130 ________________________
131 Authorized Signature Subscribed and sworn to
132 before me this
133 ______ day
134 of ______, 20______
135 ________________________
136 Printed Name of Voter
137 ________________________ ________________________
138 Address of Voter Signature of notary or
139 other
140 officer authorized to
141 administer
142 oaths
143 ________________________
144 Mailing Address of Voter

SB 1517 37
145 (if different)
146 8. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
147 the question shall be submitted [in substantially the
148 following forms] as provided in section 115.706:
149 (1) [Shall the special business district of
150 ______ be authorized to impose a tax on
151 owners of real property in a sum not to
152 exceed ______ cents on the one hundred dollar
153 assessed valuation?
154 □ YES □ NO
155 If you are in favor of the question, place an
156 "X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
157 opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
158 box opposite "NO".
159 (2)] Shall the special business district of ______
160 be authorized to impose its business license
161 tax on businesses and individuals doing
162 business within the special business district
163 in an amount not to exceed ______ percent of
164 the business license tax imposed by ______?
165 □ YES □ NO
166 If you are in favor of the question, place an
167 "X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
168 opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
169 box opposite "NO".
170 [(3)] (2) Shall the special business district of ______
171 be authorized to impose a special assessment
172 not to exceed ______ cents per square foot on
173 each square foot of land within the district?
174 □ YES □ NO

SB 1517 38
175 If you are in favor of the question, place an
176 "X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
177 opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
178 box opposite "NO".
179 [(4)] (3) Shall the special business district of ______
180 be authorized to impose a special assessment
181 not to exceed ______ cents per square foot on
182 each square foot of improvements on land
183 within the district?
184 □ YES □ NO
185 If you are in favor of the question, place an
186 "X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
187 opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
188 box opposite "NO".
189 [(5)] (4) Shall the special business district of ______
190 be authorized to impose a special assessment
191 not to exceed ______ dollars per abutting
192 foot of the lots, tracts and parcels of land
193 within the district abutting on public
194 streets, roads and highways?
195 □ YES □ NO
196 If you are in favor of the question, place an
197 "X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
198 opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
199 box opposite "NO".
200 [(6)] (5) Shall the special business district of ______
201 change its tax on ______ to ______?
202 □ YES □ NO
203 If you are in favor of the question, place an
204 "X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
205 opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
206 box opposite "NO".

SB 1517 39
207 Each ballot shall be plain paper, through which printing or
208 writing cannot be read.
209 9. Each qualified voter shall have one vote. Each
210 voter which is not an individual shall determine how to cast
211 its vote as provided for in its articles of incorporation,
212 articles of partnership, bylaws, or other document which
213 sets forth an appropriate mechanism for the determination of
214 the entity's vote. If a voter has no such mechanism, then
215 its vote shall be cast as determined by a majority of the
216 persons who run the day-to-day affairs of the voter. Each
217 voted ballot shall be signed with the authorized signature.
218 10. Voted ballots shall be returned to the city
219 clerk's office by mail or hand delivery no later than 5:00
220 p.m. on the sixth Tuesday after the date for mailing the
221 ballots as set forth in the governing body's order. The
222 city clerk shall transmit all voted ballots to a team of
223 judges of not less than four, with an equal number from each
224 of the two major political parties. The judges shall be
225 selected by the city clerk from lists compiled by the
226 election authority. Upon receipt of the voted ballots the
227 judges shall verify the authenticity of the ballots, canvass
228 the votes, and certify the results. Certification by the
229 election judges shall be final and shall be immediately
230 transmitted to the governing body. Any voter who applied
231 for such election may contest the result in the same manner
232 as provided in chapter 115.
233 11. If approved, the new tax rate ceiling or
234 assessment limit shall be effective for the tax year in
235 which the election is held, the provisions of section 67.110
236 to the contrary notwithstanding.

SB 1517 40
71.802. 1. Any district established under the
provisions of sections 71.790 to 71.808 may, upon approval
of the constitutionally required percentage of the voters of
the district voting thereon, incur indebtedness and issue
bonds or notes for the payment thereof. Notice of the
election, the amount and the purpose of the loan shall be
given.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the special business district incur indebtedness
for the purpose of ______ in the amount of ______
dollars, evidenced by the issuance of bonds or notes
and levy a real estate tax to pay therefor?]
3. If the constitutionally required percentage of the
votes cast are for the indebtedness, the district shall,
subject to the restrictions of section 71.796 and section
71.800, be vested with the power to incur indebtedness in
the name of the district, to the amount and for the purposes
specified on the ballot, and issue the bonds of the district
for the payment thereof.
4. The indebtedness authorized by this section shall
not be contracted for a period longer than twenty years, and
the entire amount of the indebtedness shall at no time
exceed, including the existing indebtedness of the district,
in the aggregate ten percent of the value of taxable
tangible property therein, as shown by the last completed
assessment for state and county purposes.
5. It shall be the duty of the district to provide for
the collection of an annual tax sufficient to pay the
interest on the indebtedness as it falls due, and also to
constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal
thereof within the time the principal becomes due.

SB 1517 41
80.460. 1. The chairman of the board of trustees of
all towns and villages in this state shall procure from the
clerk of the county commission in which such town is
located, and it shall be the duty of said clerk to deliver
to the chairman of the board of trustees within twenty days
after the date of the final adjournment of the board of
equalization a certified abstract from his assessment books,
as corrected by the board of equalization, on all property
within such town subject to its taxing power and the
assessed value thereof as corrected by the board of
equalization, which abstract shall be immediately
transmitted to the board of trustees, and it shall be the
duty of such board of trustees to establish by ordinance the
annual rates of tax levy for the year for municipal purposes
upon all subjects and objects of taxation within such town,
which tax shall not exceed the maximum rate for general
municipal purposes of fifty cents on the one hundred dollars
assessed valuation; provided, however, that the rate of
taxation for general municipal purposes herein limited may
be increased for such purposes for a period not to exceed
four years at any one time when such rate and purpose of
increase are submitted to a vote of the voters within such
towns and two-thirds of the voters voting thereon shall vote
therefor, but such increase so voted shall be limited to a
maximum rate of taxation not to exceed thirty cents on the
one hundred dollars assessed valuation. The board of
trustees of any such towns may submit a question for
increase of levy when in the opinion of such board of
trustees the necessity therefor arises, and such question
shall be submitted by such board of trustees when petitioned
therefor by voters equaling in number five percent or more
of the voters of such towns or villages voting for mayor or

SB 1517 42
member of board of trustees at the last election at which a
mayor or member of board of trustees was elected.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in levy
on one hundred dollars assessed valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years?]
3. If such increase in levy shall be voted, then such
increased levy shall be effective for the number of years
designated, and no longer, but such towns through their
boards of trustees may submit any such proposal for
continuing such increase of levy at any time for like
periods not to exceed four years each.
90.500. 1. When one hundred voters of any
incorporated city or town having less than thirty thousand
inhabitants, or any city of the third class, shall petition
the mayor and common council asking that an annual tax be
levied for the establishment and maintenance of free public
parks in the incorporated city or town, and providing for
suitable entertainment therein, and shall specify in their
petition a rate of taxation as provided in this section, the
mayor and common council shall submit the question to the
voters.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall a ______ cent tax per one hundred dollars
assessed valuation be levied for public parks?]
3. The tax specified in the notice shall be levied and
collected in the same manner as other general taxes of the
incorporated city or town and shall be deposited in the park
fund. The rate of taxation authorized by this section shall
be combined with any rate of tax imposed pursuant to the

SB 1517 43
provisions of section 90.010, and any tax authorized
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall cease in
case the voters of such incorporated city or town shall so
determine, by a majority vote after a petition for the
submission is filed in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
92.010. 1. Any constitutional charter cities in this
state which may now have or hereafter acquire seven hundred
thousand or more inhabitants may levy upon all subjects and
objects of taxation a rate for general municipal purposes
not to exceed the annual rate of one dollar on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation; provided, that the city
of St. Louis may levy for county purposes, in addition to
the municipal rate of taxation above provided, a rate not
exceeding the rate which would be allowed for county
purposes if said city of St. Louis were a county; provided,
however, that the rate of taxation for general municipal
purposes herein limited may be increased for not to exceed
four years, when the rate and purpose of the increase are
submitted to a vote and two-thirds of the voters voting
thereon shall vote therefor, but such increase so voted
shall be limited to a maximum rate of taxation not to exceed
thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation.
The legislative body of any of said cities may submit the
question of an increase of levy when, in the opinion of such
legislative body, necessity therefor arises, and such
question shall be submitted by such legislative body when
petitioned therefor by the voters equaling in number one
percent or more of the voters of the city voting for mayor
at the last city election at which a mayor was elected.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.

SB 1517 44
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax
levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years?]
3. If such increase in levy shall be voted, then such
increased levy shall be effective for the number of years
designated, and no longer, but said cities, through their
legislative bodies, may submit any such proposal for
continuing such increase of levy at any time for like
periods not to exceed four years each.
92.031. 1. Such cities may, in the alternative to
imposing the levies for debt service and for capital
improvements and operating expenses for hospital, public
health, recreation grounds and museum purposes as provided
for in section 92.030, elect by ordinance to levy and impose
an annual tax for debt service and an annual tax for capital
improvements and operating expenses for hospital, public
health, recreation grounds and museum purposes such as are
referred to in subdivisions (1), (2) and (3) of subsection 2
of section 92.030, which tax levies shall be independent of
the other tax levies provided for in section 92.030.
2. In the event such cities make such election, the
limits on individual and total annual tax levy rate referred
to in subdivisions (1), (2) and (3) of subsection 2 of
section 92.030 for debt service and for capital improvements
and operating expenses for hospital, public health,
recreation grounds and museum purposes shall not apply. The
tax levy rate for capital improvements and operating
expenses for hospital, public health, recreation grounds and
museum purposes may be increased from its current rate to a
rate not to exceed one dollar per hundred dollars assessed
valuation by submission to and approval by a vote of the
people as provided in section 115.706.

SB 1517 45
92.035. 1. Any city having a charter form of
government and a population of at least three hundred
thousand, but less than six hundred and fifty thousand and
located wholly or partially within a county of the first
class having a charter form of government, in addition to
the levy and imposition of taxes authorized by section
92.030, may, except as otherwise provided in this section,
by ordinance, levy or impose a tax not to exceed the rate of
ten cents on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation
of real and tangible personal property located within the
city. The proceeds of the tax representing a rate of at
least three cents on each one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation to be used for the operation, improvement or
construction expansion of museum facilities in existence on
August 13, 1978, and the remaining proceeds of the tax to be
used exclusively for the construction, operation,
improvement, or expansion of additional facilities for such
museum and no other. The word "museum" as used in this
section, shall not be construed to mean or include an art
gallery. General admission to the museum's facility in
existence prior to August 13, 1978, shall be free and open
to the residents of such city. Before the city shall impose
any tax under this section at a rate which exceeds two cents
on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation, the
governing body of the city shall submit the proposed tax
rate increase to the voters of the city for approval or
rejection at an election.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be an increased tax levy of ______
cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation
for museum purposes?]

SB 1517 46
3. If a majority of the votes cast upon the proposal
are in favor of the levy increase, the governing body of the
city may, by ordinance, impose the additional tax. If a
majority of the votes cast upon the proposal are against the
levy increase, the governing body of the city shall not
impose the increase. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
a rejected proposal from being resubmitted to a vote of the
voters.
94.060. 1. All cities of the third class in this
state may by ordinance levy and impose annually for
municipal purposes upon all subjects and objects of taxation
within such cities a tax which shall not exceed the maximum
rate of one dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation; provided, however, that the rate of tax levy of
one dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation for
municipal purposes may be increased for such purposes for a
period not to exceed four years at any one time when such
rate and purpose of increase are submitted to a vote of the
voters within such cities and two-thirds of the voters
voting thereon shall vote therefor, but such increase so
voted shall be limited to a maximum rate of taxation not to
exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation.
2. The city council may submit the question of
increasing the levy when in the opinion of such city council
the necessity therefor arises, and the question shall be
submitted by such city council when petitioned therefor by
voters equaling in number five percent or more of the voters
of such cities voting for mayor at the last election at
which a mayor was elected.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.

SB 1517 47
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax
levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years in
the city of ______?]
4. If such increase in levy shall be voted, then such
increased levy shall be effective for the number of years
designated, and no longer, but cities through their city
councils may submit the question of continuing such increase
of levy at any time for like periods not to exceed four
years each.
94.070. 1. In addition to the levy aforesaid for
general municipal purposes, all cities of the third class
are hereby authorized to levy annually not to exceed the
following rates of taxation on all property subject to its
taxing power for the following special purposes:
(1) For library purposes in the manner and at the rate
authorized under the provisions of sections 182.140 to
182.301;
(2) For hospitals, public health, and museum purposes
twenty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation;
and
(3) For recreational grounds in the manner and at the
rate authorized under the provisions of sections 90.500 to
90.570.
2. In lieu of the twenty cents levied on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation for hospitals, public
health, and museum purposes in subdivision (2) of subsection
1 of this section, any city of the third classification with
more than ten thousand eight hundred but less than ten
thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in more than
one county may levy a tax at the rate of thirty cents on the

SB 1517 48
one hundred dollars assessed valuation for hospital, public
health, and museum purposes.
3. A question submitted under this section shall be
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
94.250. 1. All cities of the fourth class in this
state may by city ordinance levy and impose annually for
municipal purposes upon all subjects and objects of taxation
within such cities a tax which shall not exceed the maximum
rate of one dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation.
2. The maximum rate of taxation for general municipal
purposes may be increased for not to exceed four years at
any one time when the rate and purpose of such increase are
submitted to a vote and two-thirds of the voters voting
thereon vote in favor of the increase, but the increase so
voted shall be limited to a maximum rate of taxation not to
exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation. The board of aldermen of such cities may submit
the question, and the question shall be submitted by the
board of aldermen when petitioned therefor by voters
equaling in number five percent or more of the voters of
such cities voting for mayor at the last election at which a
mayor was elected.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax
levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years in
the city of ______?]
4. If the increase in levy is voted, the increased
levy shall be effective for the number of years designated,
and no longer, but such cities through their boards of

SB 1517 49
aldermen may submit proposals for continuing the increase of
levy at any time for like periods not to exceed four years
each.
94.260. 1. In addition to the levy aforesaid for
general municipal purposes, all cities of the fourth class
are hereby authorized to levy annually not to exceed the
following rates of taxation on all property subject to its
taxing powers for the following special purposes:
(1) For library purposes in the manner and at the rate
authorized under the provisions of sections 182.140 to
182.301;
(2) For hospital, public health, and museum purposes,
twenty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation;
and
(3) For recreation grounds in the manner and at the
rate authorized under the provisions of sections 90.500 to
90.570.
2. A question submitted under this section shall be
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
94.340. 1. All cities and towns in this state
organized and operating under special charters granted by
the legislature, known as special charter cities and towns,
may by ordinance levy and impose annually for municipal
purposes upon all subjects and objects of taxation within
such cities and towns a tax which shall not exceed the
maximum rate of one dollar on the one hundred dollars
assessed valuation; provided, however, that the rate of
taxation for general municipal purposes herein limited may
be increased for not to exceed four years when the rate and
purpose of such increase are submitted to a vote of the
voters within such cities and towns and two-thirds of the
voters voting thereon shall vote therefor, but such increase

SB 1517 50
so voted shall be limited to a maximum rate of taxation not
to exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation.
2. The council of any such cities and towns may submit
the question of increasing the levy when in the opinion of
such council the necessity therefor arises, and the question
shall be submitted by such council when petitioned therefor
by voters equaling in number five percent or more of the
voters of such cities and towns voting for mayor at the last
election at which a mayor was elected.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax
levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years in
the city of ______?]
4. If such increase in levy shall be voted, then such
increased levy shall be effective for the number of years
designated, and no longer, but such cities and towns through
their councils may submit any such proposal for continuing
such increase of levy at any time for like periods not to
exceed four years each.
94.350. 1. In addition to the levy aforesaid for
general municipal purposes, all cities and towns under
special charter are hereby authorized to levy annually not
to exceed the following rates of taxation on all property
subject to its taxing powers for the following special
purposes:
(1) For library purposes in the manner and at the rate
authorized under the provisions of sections 182.140 to
182.301;

SB 1517 51
(2) For hospital, public health, and museum purposes,
twenty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation;
and
(3) For recreation grounds in the manner and at the
rate authorized under the provisions of sections 90.500 to
90.570.
2. A question submitted under this section shall be
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
94.400. 1. All cities in this state which now have or
may hereafter contain a population of not less than ten
thousand and less than three hundred thousand inhabitants
according to the last preceding federal decennial census,
framing and adopting a charter for its own government under
the provisions of Section 19, Article VI of the Constitution
of this state, known as "constitutional charter cities", may
by city ordinance levy and impose annually for municipal
purposes upon all subjects and objects of taxation within
their corporate limits a tax which shall not exceed the
maximum rate of one dollar on the one hundred dollars
assessed valuation, and may by city ordinance levy and
impose annually an additional tax at a rate in excess of
said one dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation, but not to exceed forty cents on the one hundred
dollars assessed valuation for any one or more of the
following purposes, to wit: Library, hospital, public
health, and museum purposes, except that the rate of tax
levy of one dollar on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation for general municipal purposes may, in addition to
the aforesaid rate and purposes of increase which may be
voted by city ordinance, be further increased for general
municipal purposes for a period not to exceed four years at
any one time when such rate and purpose of increase are

SB 1517 52
submitted to a vote of the voters within such cities and two-
thirds of the voters voting thereon shall vote therefor, but
such increase so voted shall be limited to a maximum rate of
taxation not to exceed thirty cents on the one hundred
dollars assessed valuation.
2. The legislative body of any such cities may submit
the question of increasing the levy when in the opinion of
such legislative body the necessity therefor arises and the
question shall be submitted by such legislative body when
petitioned therefor by voters equaling in number five
percent of the voters of such cities voting for a mayor at
the last election at which a mayor was elected.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent increase in tax
levy on one hundred dollars valuation for
general municipal purposes for ______ years in
the city of ______?]
4. If such increase of levy shall be voted, then such
increased levy shall be effective for the number of years
designated, and no longer, but such cities through their
legislative bodies may submit any such proposal for
continuing such increase of levy at any time for like
periods not to exceed four years each.
5. Any city that has a levy for recreation grounds in
excess of two mills on August 28, 1994, may continue the
levy at that rate without any further action. Any levy for
recreation purposes which is two mills or less on August 28,
1994, shall be for purposes of computing the amount
permitted by law considered to be under section 90.010. Any
increase in the levy for recreation grounds after August 28,

SB 1517 53
1994, shall be in accordance with procedures set forth in
section 90.010.
95.150. The question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall ______ (name of city, town, or village)
issue bonds in the amount of ______ dollars for
the purpose of ______?]
95.390. The question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall ______ (name of city) issue bonds in the
amount of ______ dollars to pay judgments and to
levy a tax therefor?]
115.123. 1. All public elections shall be held on
Tuesday. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this
section, and section 247.180, all public elections shall be
held on the general election day, the primary election day,
[the general municipal election day,] the first Tuesday
after the first Monday in November, or on another day
expressly provided by city or county charter, and in
nonprimary years on the first Tuesday after the first Monday
in August. [Bond elections may be held on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday in February but no other issue shall
be included on the ballot for such election.]
2. The following elections shall be exempt from the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section:
(1) Bond elections necessitated by fire, vandalism or
natural disaster;
(2) Elections for which ownership of real property is
required by law for voting;

SB 1517 54
(3) Special elections to fill vacancies and to decide
tie votes or election contests; and
(4) Tax elections necessitated by a financial hardship
due to a five percent or greater decline in per-pupil state
revenue to a school district from the previous year.
3. Nothing in this section prohibits a charter city or
county from having its primary election in March if the
charter provided for a March primary before August 28, 1999.
4. [Nothing in this section shall prohibit elections
held pursuant to section 65.600, but no other issues shall
be on the March ballot except pursuant to this chapter.]
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
all primary elections for local, state, and national offices
shall be conducted on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in August and all general elections for local, state,
and national offices and issues shall be conducted on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. Elections
shall not occur at any other time, except as otherwise
provided in this section.
115.240. The election authority for any political
subdivision or special district shall label ballot measures
relating to taxation that are submitted by such political
subdivision or special district to a vote of the people
numerically or alphabetically in the order in which they are
submitted. No such ballot measure shall be labeled in a
descriptive manner aside from its numerical or alphabetical
designation. Election authorities may coordinate with each
other, or with the secretary of state, to maintain a
database or other record and to ensure that the same measure
shared on the ballot of multiple election authorities at the
same election will have the same numerical or alphabetical
assignment.

SB 1517 55
115.706. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, beginning on January 1, 2027, a
question submitted to voters by a political subdivision
desiring to levy a real property tax or personal property
tax shall be submitted only on a general election day, as
such day is established under section 115.121.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, beginning on January 1, 2027, the ballot language
for a question submitted to voters by a political
subdivision desiring to levy a real property tax or personal
property tax shall include at least the following elements,
as applicable:
(1) The name of the political subdivision imposing the
property tax;
(2) The real property or personal property on which
the property tax will be imposed;
(3) The rate of the tax or, if the political
subdivision is seeking authorization to increase an existing
tax, the amount of such increase, expressed in the number of
cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation;
(4) The number of years for which the tax will be
imposed or the expiration date of the tax;
(5) The purpose for which the tax will be imposed;
(6) A description of additional actions a political
subdivision affected by the ballot issue will be required to
take;
(7) If the political subdivision is seeking
authorization to issue bonds, notes, or other obligations:
(a) An indication that bonds, notes, or other
obligations will be issued if the proposal is approved;

SB 1517 56
(b) The kind of bonds, notes, or other obligations
that will be issued including, but not limited to, general
obligation bonds or revenue bonds; and
(c) The total amount of such bonds, notes, or other
obligations;
(8) A statement indicating the real property or
personal property that will be affected by such tax or
increase, containing wording substantially similar to the
following, as applicable:
"If approved, this proposition would increase the
property taxes of:
A residential property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.0019) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
A commercial property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.0032) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
An agricultural property ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 100,000 multiplied by 0.0012) per
$100,000 of appraised valuation;
A motor vehicle ______ (insert levy amount
multiplied by 10,000 multiplied by 0.00333) per
$10,000 of appraised valuation."; and
(9) Other information the election authority deems
necessary to provide information to voters.
137.016. 1. As used in Section 4(b) of Article X of
the Missouri Constitution, the following terms mean:
(1) "Residential property"[,]:
(a) All real property improved by a structure which is
used or intended to be used for residential living by human
occupants[,];

SB 1517 57
(b) Vacant land in connection with an airport[,];
(c) Land used as a golf course[,];
(d) Manufactured home parks[,];
(e) Bed and breakfast inns in which the owner resides
and uses as a primary residence with six or fewer rooms for
rent[, and];
(f) Time-share units as defined in section 407.600,
except to the extent such units are actually rented and
subject to sales tax under subdivision (6) of subsection 1
of section 144.020, but residential property shall not
include other similar facilities used primarily for
transient housing. For the purposes of this section,
"transient housing" means all rooms available for rent or
lease for which the receipts from the rent or lease of such
rooms are subject to state sales tax pursuant to subdivision
(6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020;
(2) "Agricultural and horticultural property", all
real property used for agricultural purposes and devoted
primarily to the raising and harvesting of crops; to the
feeding, breeding and management of livestock which shall
include breeding, showing, and boarding of horses; to
dairying, or to any other combination thereof; and buildings
and structures customarily associated with farming,
agricultural, and horticultural uses. Agricultural and
horticultural property shall also include land devoted to
and qualifying for payments or other compensation under a
soil conservation or agricultural assistance program under
an agreement with an agency of the federal government.
Agricultural and horticultural property shall further
include any reliever airport. Real property classified as
forest croplands shall not be agricultural or horticultural
property so long as it is classified as forest croplands and

SB 1517 58
shall be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to
implement Section 7 of Article X of the Missouri
Constitution. Agricultural and horticultural property shall
also include any sawmill or planing mill defined in the U.S.
Department of Labor's Standard Industrial Classification
(SIC) Manual under Industry Group 242 with the SIC number
2421. Agricultural and horticultural property shall also
include urban and community gardens. For the purposes of
this section, "urban and community gardens" shall include
real property cultivated by residents of a neighborhood or
community for the purposes of providing agricultural
products, as defined in section 262.900, for the use of
residents of the neighborhood or community, and shall not
include a garden intended for individual or personal use;
(3) "Utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and
other real property"[,]:
(a) All real property used directly or indirectly for
any commercial, mining, industrial, manufacturing, trade,
professional, business, or similar purpose, including all
property centrally assessed by the state tax commission
[but];
(b) Shall not include floating docks, portions of
which are separately owned and the remainder of which is
designated for common ownership and in which no one person
or business entity owns more than five individual units[.];
(c) All other real property not included in the
property listed in subclasses (1) and (2) of Section 4(b) of
Article X of the Missouri Constitution, as such property is
defined in this section, shall be deemed to be included in
the term "utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and
other real property".

SB 1517 59
2. Pursuant to Article X of the state Constitution,
any taxing district may adjust its operating levy to recoup
any loss of property tax revenue, except revenues from the
surtax imposed pursuant to Article X, Subsection 2 of
Section 6 of the Constitution, as the result of changing the
classification of structures intended to be used for
residential living by human occupants which contain five or
more dwelling units if such adjustment of the levy does not
exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980
tax year. For purposes of this section, loss in revenue
shall include the difference between the revenue that would
have been collected on such property under its
classification prior to enactment of this section and the
amount to be collected under its classification under this
section. The county assessor of each county or city not
within a county shall provide information to each taxing
district within its boundaries regarding the difference in
assessed valuation of such property as the result of such
change in classification.
3. All reclassification of property as the result of
changing the classification of structures intended to be
used for residential living by human occupants which contain
five or more dwelling units shall apply to assessments made
after December 31, 1994.
4. Where real property is used or held for use for
more than one purpose and such uses result in different
classifications, the county assessor shall allocate to each
classification the percentage of the true value in money of
the property devoted to each use; except that, where
agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in this
100 section, also contains a dwelling unit or units, the farm
101 dwelling, appurtenant residential-related structures and up

SB 1517 60
102 to five acres immediately surrounding such farm dwelling
103 shall be residential property, as defined in this section,
104 provided that the portion of property used or held for use
105 as an urban and community garden shall not be residential
106 property. This subsection shall not apply to any reliever
107 airport.
108 5. All real property which is vacant, unused, or held
109 for future use; which is used for a private club, a not-for-
110 profit or other nonexempt lodge, club, business, trade,
111 service organization, or similar entity; or for which a
112 determination as to its classification cannot be made under
113 the definitions set out in subsection 1 of this section,
114 shall be classified according to its immediate most suitable
115 economic use, which use shall be determined after
116 consideration of:
117 (1) Immediate prior use, if any, of such property;
118 (2) Location of such property;
119 (3) Zoning classification of such property; except
120 that, such zoning classification shall not be considered
121 conclusive if, upon consideration of all factors, it is
122 determined that such zoning classification does not reflect
123 the immediate most suitable economic use of the property;
124 (4) Other legal restrictions on the use of such
125 property;
126 (5) Availability of water, electricity, gas, sewers,
127 street lighting, and other public services for such property;
128 (6) Size of such property;
129 (7) Access of such property to public thoroughfares;
130 and
131 (8) Any other factors relevant to a determination of
132 the immediate most suitable economic use of such property.

SB 1517 61
133 6. All lands classified as forest croplands shall not,
134 for taxation purposes, be classified as subclass (1),
135 subclass (2), or subclass (3) real property, as such classes
136 are prescribed in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri
137 Constitution and defined in this section, but shall be taxed
138 in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7
139 of Article X of the Missouri Constitution.
137.037. 1. The county commission of any county may,
at any election, submit to the voters of the county a
proposition to authorize a levy not to exceed two mills on
the dollar of assessed valuation of all tangible property
taxable by the county to pay the cost of contracting with a
private person or firm to reevaluate all real property
subject to taxation by that county or to provide funding for
that portion of all costs of the assessor's office which
would otherwise be paid from county general revenues.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the county commission be authorized to
levy a tax not to exceed twenty cents on the
hundred dollars assessed valuation on all
property taxable by the county to provide funds
annually to pay the cost of assessing and
equalizing real property values subject to
taxation by the county?]
3. If the question receives a majority of the votes
cast thereon, the county commission may impose a levy for
that purpose, the proceeds of which shall be placed in the
assessment fund.
137.039. 1. As used in this section, "additional tax
abatement revenues" means revenues derived from higher tax
levies on real property inside a political subdivision that

SB 1517 62
has adopted any tax abatement or similar economic incentive
authorized under general law but outside an area subject to
tax abatement within the political subdivision.
2. Beginning on January first of the calendar year
immediately following the effective date of this section,
each political subdivision that adopts or has adopted any
tax abatement or similar economic incentive authorized under
state law shall decrease the levy of real property tax rates
levied under state law to reduce the amount of tax revenues
such political subdivision received from additional tax
abatement revenues.
137.055. 1. After the assessor's book of each county,
except in any city not within a county or any county with a
charter form of government, shall be corrected and adjusted
according to law, but not later than September twentieth, of
each year, the county governing body shall ascertain the sum
necessary to be raised for county purposes, and fix the rate
of taxes on the several subjects of taxation so as to raise
the required sum, and the same to be entered in the proper
columns in the tax book. Any city not within a county and
any county with a charter form of government shall set the
tax rate by October first of each year for each calendar
year after December 31, 2008.
2. Prior to fixing the rate of taxes, as provided in
this section, the county governing body shall hold a public
hearing on the proposed rate of taxes at which citizens
shall be heard. A notice stating the time and place for the
hearing shall be published in at least one newspaper
qualified under the laws of Missouri of general circulation
in the county at least seven days prior to the date of the
hearing. The notice shall include the aggregate assessed
valuation by category of real, total personal and other

SB 1517 63
tangible property in the county as entered in the tax book
for the fiscal year for which the tax is to be levied, the
aggregate assessed valuation by category of real, total
personal and other tangible property in the county for the
preceding taxable year, the required sums to be raised from
the property tax for each purpose for which the county
levies taxes as approved in the budget adopted under chapter
50, the proposed rate of taxes which will produce
substantially the same revenues as required by the budget,
[and the increase in tax revenue realized due to an increase
in assessed value as a result of new construction and
improvement,] and the increase, both in dollar value and
percentage, in tax revenue as a result of reassessment if
the proposed tax rate is adopted. Failure of any taxpayer
to appear at said hearing shall not prevent the taxpayer
from pursuit of any other legal remedy otherwise available
to the taxpayer. Nothing in this subsection absolves county
governing bodies of responsibilities under section 137.073
nor to adjust tax rates in event changes in assessed
valuation occur that would alter the tax rate calculations.
137.065. 1. For county purposes the annual tax on
property, not including taxes for the payment of valid
bonded indebtedness or renewal bonds issued in lieu thereof,
shall not exceed the rates herein specified: In counties
having three hundred million dollars or more assessed
valuation and having by operation of law attained the
classification of a county of the first class, the rates
shall not exceed thirty-five cents on the hundred dollars
assessed valuation; and in all other counties, the rate
shall not exceed fifty cents, except that in any county the
maximum rates of taxation as limited in this section may be
increased for not to exceed four years, when the rate and

SB 1517 64
purpose of the increase are submitted to a vote and two-
thirds of the voters of the county voting thereon shall vote
therefor.
2. County commissions are hereby authorized to submit
the question of increasing maximum tax rates herein
specified, and shall submit the question when petitioned
therefor by not less than ten percent of the voters of the
county as determined by the total vote cast for governor in
the last preceding general election for governor.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a levy for county purposes of
______ on the hundred dollars assessed
valuation?]
4. For any county, which by operation of law attains
the classification of a county of the first class on or
after January 1, 1991, which has a tax rate ceiling at or
below thirty-five cents by application of section 137.073 or
137.115, whichever is applicable, it shall not be necessary
to further reduce such county's tax rate due to the
attainment of such first class county status.
137.073. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "General reassessment", changes in value, entered
in the assessor's books, of a substantial portion of the
parcels of real property within a county resulting wholly or
partly from reappraisal of value or other actions of the
assessor or county equalization body or ordered by the state
tax commission or any court;
(2) "Tax rate", "rate", or "rate of levy", singular or
plural, includes the tax rate for each purpose of taxation
of property a taxing authority is authorized to levy without

SB 1517 65
a vote and any tax rate authorized by election, including
bond interest and sinking fund;
(3) "Tax rate ceiling", a tax rate as revised by the
taxing authority to comply with the provisions of this
section or when a court has determined the tax rate; except
that, other provisions of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, a school district may levy the operating
levy for school purposes required for the current year
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 163.021, less all
adjustments required pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of
the Missouri Constitution, if such tax rate does not exceed
the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax
year. This is the maximum tax rate that may be levied,
unless a higher tax rate ceiling is approved by voters of
the political subdivision as provided in this section;
(4) "Tax revenue", when referring to the previous
year, means the actual receipts from ad valorem levies on
all classes of property, including state-assessed property,
in the immediately preceding fiscal year of the political
subdivision, plus an allowance for taxes billed but not
collected in the fiscal year and plus an additional
allowance for the revenue which would have been collected
from property which was annexed by such political
subdivision but which was not previously used in determining
tax revenue pursuant to this section. The term "tax
revenue" shall not include any receipts from ad valorem
levies on any property of a railroad corporation or a public
utility, as these terms are defined in section 386.020,
which were assessed by the assessor of a county or city in
the previous year but are assessed by the state tax
commission in the current year. All school districts and
those counties levying sales taxes pursuant to chapter 67

SB 1517 66
shall include in the calculation of tax revenue an amount
equivalent to that by which they reduced property tax levies
as a result of sales tax pursuant to section 67.505 and
section 164.013 [or as excess home dock city or county fees
as provided in subsection 4 of section 313.820] in the
immediately preceding fiscal year but not including any
amount calculated to adjust for prior years. For purposes
of political subdivisions which were authorized to levy a
tax in the prior year but which did not levy such tax or
levied a reduced rate, the term "tax revenue", as used in
relation to the revision of tax levies mandated by law,
shall mean the revenues equal to the amount that would have
been available if the voluntary rate reduction had not been
made.
2. (1) Whenever changes in assessed valuation are
entered in the assessor's books for any personal property,
in the aggregate, or for any subclass of real property as
such subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X
of the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
the county clerk in all counties and the assessor of St.
Louis City shall notify each political subdivision wholly or
partially within the county or St. Louis City of the change
in valuation of each subclass of real property,
individually, and personal property, in the aggregate[,
exclusive of new construction and improvements]. All
political subdivisions shall immediately revise the
applicable rates of levy for each purpose for each subclass
of real property, individually, and personal property, in
the aggregate, for which taxes are levied to the extent
necessary to produce from all taxable property[, exclusive
of new construction and improvements,] substantially the
same amount of tax revenue as was produced in the previous

SB 1517 67
year for each subclass of real property, individually, and
personal property, in the aggregate, except that the rate
shall not exceed the greater of the most recent voter-
approved rate or the most recent voter-approved rate as
adjusted under subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of this
section.
(2) Any political subdivision that has received
approval from voters for a tax increase after August 27,
2008, may levy a rate to collect substantially the same
amount of tax revenue as the amount of revenue that would
have been derived by applying the voter-approved increased
tax rate ceiling to the total assessed valuation of the
political subdivision as most recently certified by the city
or county clerk on or before the date of the election in
which such increase is approved, increased by the percentage
increase in the consumer price index, as provided by law,
except that the rate shall not exceed the greater of the
most recent voter-approved rate or the most recent voter-
approved rate as adjusted under subdivision (2) of
subsection 5 of this section. Such tax revenue shall not
include any receipts from ad valorem levies on any real
property which was assessed by the assessor of a county or
city in such previous year but is assessed by the assessor
of a county or city in the current year in a different
100 subclass of real property.
101 (3) Where the taxing authority is a school district
102 for the purposes of revising the applicable rates of levy
103 for each subclass of real property, the tax revenues from
104 state-assessed railroad and utility property shall be
105 apportioned and attributed to each subclass of real property
106 based on the percentage of the total assessed valuation of

SB 1517 68
107 the county that each subclass of real property represents in
108 the current [taxable] tax year.
109 (4) As provided in Section 22 of Article X of the
110 constitution, a political subdivision may also revise each
111 levy to allow for inflationary assessment growth occurring
112 within the political subdivision. The inflationary growth
113 factor for any such subclass of real property or personal
114 property shall be limited to the actual assessment growth in
115 such subclass or class, [exclusive of new construction and
116 improvements, and] exclusive of the assessed value on any
117 real property which was assessed by the assessor of a county
118 or city in the current year in a different subclass of real
119 property, but not to exceed the consumer price index or five
120 percent, whichever is lower. Should the tax revenue of a
121 political subdivision from the various tax rates determined
122 in this subsection be different than the tax revenue that
123 would have been determined from a single tax rate as
124 calculated pursuant to the method of calculation in this
125 subsection prior to January 1, 2003, then the political
126 subdivision shall revise the tax rates of those subclasses
127 of real property, individually, and/or personal property, in
128 the aggregate, in which there is a tax rate reduction,
129 pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. Such
130 revision shall yield an amount equal to such difference and
131 shall be apportioned among such subclasses of real property,
132 individually, and/or personal property, in the aggregate,
133 based on the relative assessed valuation of the class or
134 subclasses of property experiencing a tax rate reduction.
135 Such revision in the tax rates of each class or subclass
136 shall be made by computing the percentage of current year
137 adjusted assessed valuation of each class or subclass with a
138 tax rate reduction to the total current year adjusted

SB 1517 69
139 assessed valuation of the class or subclasses with a tax
140 rate reduction, multiplying the resulting percentages by the
141 revenue difference between the single rate calculation and
142 the calculations pursuant to this subsection and dividing by
143 the respective adjusted current year assessed valuation of
144 each class or subclass to determine the adjustment to the
145 rate to be levied upon each class or subclass of property.
146 The adjustment computed herein shall be multiplied by one
147 hundred, rounded to four decimals in the manner provided in
148 this subsection, and added to the initial rate computed for
149 each class or subclass of property. For school districts
150 that levy separate tax rates on each subclass of real
151 property and personal property in the aggregate, if voters
152 approved a ballot before January 1, 2011, that presented
153 separate stated tax rates to be applied to the different
154 subclasses of real property and personal property in the
155 aggregate, or increases the separate rates that may be
156 levied on the different subclasses of real property and
157 personal property in the aggregate by different amounts, the
158 tax rate that shall be used for the single tax rate
159 calculation shall be a blended rate, calculated in the
160 manner provided under subdivision (1) of subsection 6 of
161 this section.
162 (5) Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection
163 to the contrary, no revision to the rate of levy for
164 personal property shall cause such levy to increase over the
165 levy for personal property from the prior year.
166 3. (1) Where the taxing authority is a school
167 district, it shall be required to revise the rates of levy
168 to the extent necessary to produce from all taxable
169 property, including state-assessed railroad and utility
170 property, which shall be separately estimated in addition to

SB 1517 70
171 other data required in complying with section 164.011,
172 substantially the amount of tax revenue permitted in this
173 section. In the year following tax rate reduction, the tax
174 rate ceiling may be adjusted to offset such district's
175 reduction in the apportionment of state school moneys due to
176 its reduced tax rate. However, in the event any school
177 district, in calculating a tax rate ceiling pursuant to this
178 section, requiring the estimating of effects of state-
179 assessed railroad and utility valuation or loss of state
180 aid, discovers that the estimates used result in receipt of
181 excess revenues, which would have required a lower rate if
182 the actual information had been known, the school district
183 shall reduce the tax rate ceiling in the following year to
184 compensate for the excess receipts, and the recalculated
185 rate shall become the tax rate ceiling for purposes of this
186 section.
187 (2) For any political subdivision which experiences a
188 reduction in the amount of assessed valuation relating to a
189 prior year, due to decisions of the state tax commission or
190 a court pursuant to sections 138.430 to 138.433, or due to
191 clerical errors or corrections in the calculation or
192 recordation of any assessed valuation:
193 (a) Such political subdivision may revise the tax rate
194 ceiling for each purpose it levies taxes to compensate for
195 the reduction in assessed value occurring after the
196 political subdivision calculated the tax rate ceiling for
197 the particular subclass of real property or for personal
198 property, in the aggregate, in a prior year. Such revision
199 by the political subdivision shall be made at the time of
200 the next calculation of the tax rate for the particular
201 subclass of real property or for personal property, in the
202 aggregate, after the reduction in assessed valuation has

SB 1517 71
203 been determined and shall be calculated in a manner that
204 results in the revised tax rate ceiling being the same as it
205 would have been had the corrected or finalized assessment
206 been available at the time of the prior calculation;
207 (b) In addition, for up to three years following the
208 determination of the reduction in assessed valuation as a
209 result of circumstances defined in this subdivision, such
210 political subdivision may levy a tax rate for each purpose
211 it levies taxes above the revised tax rate ceiling provided
212 in paragraph (a) of this subdivision to recoup any revenues
213 it was entitled to receive had the corrected or finalized
214 assessment been available at the time of the prior
215 calculation.
216 4. (1) In order to implement the provisions of this
217 section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
218 Missouri, the term improvements shall apply to both real and
219 personal property. In order to determine the value of new
220 construction and improvements, each county assessor shall
221 maintain a record of real property valuations in such a
222 manner as to identify each year the increase in valuation
223 for each political subdivision in the county as a result of
224 new construction and improvements. The value of new
225 construction and improvements shall include the additional
226 assessed value of all improvements or additions to real
227 property which were begun after and were not part of the
228 prior year's assessment, except that the additional assessed
229 value of all improvements or additions to real property
230 which had been totally or partially exempt from ad valorem
231 taxes pursuant to sections 99.800 to 99.865, sections
232 135.200 to 135.255, and section 353.110 shall be included in
233 the value of new construction and improvements when the
234 property becomes totally or partially subject to assessment

SB 1517 72
235 and payment of all ad valorem taxes. The aggregate increase
236 in valuation of personal property for the current year over
237 that of the previous year is the equivalent of the new
238 construction and improvements factor for personal property.
239 Beginning January 1, 2027, any increase in the aggregate
240 valuation of personal property for the current year over
241 that of the previous year shall not be counted as new
242 construction. Notwithstanding any opt-out implemented
243 pursuant to subsection 14 of section 137.115, the assessor
244 shall certify the amount of new construction and
245 improvements and the amount of assessed value on any real
246 property which was assessed by the assessor of a county or
247 city in such previous year but is assessed by the assessor
248 of a county or city in the current year in a different
249 subclass of real property separately for each of the three
250 subclasses of real property for each political subdivision
251 to the county clerk in order that political subdivisions
252 shall have this information for the purpose of calculating
253 tax rates pursuant to this section and Section 22, Article
254 X, Constitution of Missouri. In addition, the state tax
255 commission shall certify each year to each county clerk the
256 increase in the general price level as measured by the
257 Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the United
258 States, or its successor publications, as defined and
259 officially reported by the United States Department of
260 Labor, or its successor agency. The state tax commission
261 shall certify the increase in such index on the latest
262 twelve-month basis available on February first of each year
263 over the immediately preceding prior twelve-month period in
264 order that political subdivisions shall have this
265 information available in setting their tax rates according
266 to law and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of

SB 1517 73
267 Missouri. For purposes of implementing the provisions of
268 this section and Section 22 of Article X of the Missouri
269 Constitution, the term "property" means all taxable
270 property, including state-assessed property.
271 (2) Each political subdivision required to revise
272 rates of levy pursuant to this section or Section 22 of
273 Article X of the Constitution of Missouri shall calculate
274 each tax rate it is authorized to levy and, in establishing
275 each tax rate, shall consider each provision for tax rate
276 revision provided in this section and Section 22 of Article
277 X of the Constitution of Missouri, separately and without
278 regard to annual tax rate reductions provided in section
279 67.505 and section 164.013. Each political subdivision
280 shall set each tax rate it is authorized to levy using the
281 calculation that produces the lowest tax rate ceiling. It
282 is further the intent of the general assembly, pursuant to
283 the authority of Section 10(c) of Article X of the
284 Constitution of Missouri, that the provisions of such
285 section be applicable to tax rate revisions mandated
286 pursuant to Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
287 Missouri as to reestablishing tax rates as revised in
288 subsequent years, enforcement provisions, and other
289 provisions not in conflict with Section 22 of Article X of
290 the Constitution of Missouri. Annual tax rate reductions
291 provided in section 67.505 and section 164.013 shall be
292 applied to the tax rate as established pursuant to this
293 section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
294 Missouri, unless otherwise provided by law.
295 5. (1) In all political subdivisions, the tax rate
296 ceiling established pursuant to this section shall not be
297 increased unless approved by a vote of the people. Approval
298 of the higher tax rate shall be by at least a majority of

SB 1517 74
299 votes cast. When a proposed higher tax rate requires
300 approval by more than a simple majority pursuant to any
301 provision of law or the constitution, the tax rate increase
302 must receive approval by at least the majority required.
303 (2) When voters approve an increase in the tax rate,
304 the amount of the increase shall be added to the tax rate
305 ceiling as calculated pursuant to this section to the extent
306 the total rate does not exceed any maximum rate prescribed
307 by law. If a ballot question presents a stated tax rate for
308 approval rather than describing the amount of increase in
309 the question, the stated tax rate approved shall be adjusted
310 as provided in this section and, so adjusted, shall be the
311 current tax rate ceiling. The increased tax rate ceiling as
312 approved shall be adjusted such that, when applied to the
313 current total assessed valuation of the political
314 subdivision, [excluding new construction and improvements
315 since the date of the election approving such increase,] the
316 revenue derived from the adjusted tax rate ceiling is equal
317 to the sum of: the amount of revenue which would have been
318 derived by applying the voter-approved increased tax rate
319 ceiling to total assessed valuation of the political
320 subdivision, as most recently certified by the city or
321 county clerk on or before the date of the election in which
322 such increase is approved, increased by the percentage
323 increase in the consumer price index, as provided by law.
324 Such adjusted tax rate ceiling may be applied to the total
325 assessed valuation of the political subdivision at the
326 setting of the next tax rate. If a ballot question presents
327 a phased-in tax rate increase, upon voter approval, each tax
328 rate increase shall be adjusted in the manner prescribed in
329 this section to yield the sum of: the amount of revenue
330 that would be derived by applying such voter-approved

SB 1517 75
331 increased rate to the total assessed valuation, as most
332 recently certified by the city or county clerk on or before
333 the date of the election in which such increase was
334 approved, increased by the percentage increase in the
335 consumer price index, as provided by law, from the date of
336 the election to the time of such increase and, so adjusted,
337 shall be the current tax rate ceiling.
338 (3) The provisions of subdivision (2) of this
339 subsection notwithstanding, if prior to the expiration of a
340 temporary levy increase voters approve a subsequent levy
341 increase, the new tax rate ceiling shall remain in effect
342 only until such time as the temporary levy expires under the
343 terms originally approved by a vote of the people, at which
344 time the tax rate ceiling shall be decreased by the amount
345 of the temporary levy increase. If prior to the expiration
346 of a temporary levy increase voters of a political
347 subdivision are asked to approve an additional, permanent
348 increase to the political subdivision's tax rate ceiling,
349 voters shall be submitted ballot language that clearly
350 indicates that if the permanent levy increase is approved,
351 the temporary levy shall be made permanent.
352 (4) The governing body of any political subdivision
353 may levy a tax rate lower than its tax rate ceiling and may,
354 in a nonreassessment year, increase that lowered tax rate to
355 a level not exceeding the tax rate ceiling without voter
356 approval in the manner provided under subdivision [(4)] (5)
357 of this subsection. Nothing in this section shall be
358 construed as prohibiting a political subdivision from
359 voluntarily levying a tax rate lower than that which is
360 required under the provisions of this section or from
361 seeking voter approval of a reduction to such political
362 subdivision's tax rate ceiling.

SB 1517 76
363 [(4)] (5) In a year of general reassessment, a
364 governing body whose tax rate is lower than its tax rate
365 ceiling shall revise its tax rate pursuant to the provisions
366 of subsection 4 of this section as if its tax rate was at
367 the tax rate ceiling. In a year following general
368 reassessment, if such governing body intends to increase its
369 tax rate, the governing body shall conduct a public hearing,
370 and in a public meeting it shall adopt an ordinance,
371 resolution, or policy statement justifying its action prior
372 to setting and certifying its tax rate. The provisions of
373 this subdivision shall not apply to any political
374 subdivision which levies a tax rate lower than its tax rate
375 ceiling solely due to a reduction required by law resulting
376 from sales tax collections. The provisions of this
377 subdivision shall not apply to any political subdivision
378 which has received voter approval for an increase to its tax
379 rate ceiling subsequent to setting its most recent tax rate.
380 (6) (a) As used in this subdivision, the following
381 terms mean:
382 a. "Current tax rate ceiling", the tax rate ceiling in
383 effect before the voters approve a higher tax rate;
384 b. "Increased tax rate ceiling", the new tax rate
385 ceiling in effect after the voters approve a higher tax rate.
386 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
387 contrary, when the required majority of voters in a
388 political subdivision passes an increase in the political
389 subdivision's tax rate, the political subdivision shall use
390 the current tax rate ceiling and the increase approved by
391 the voters in establishing the rates of levy for the tax
392 year immediately following the election.
393 (c) If the assessed valuation of real property in such
394 political subdivision is reduced in such tax year

SB 1517 77
395 immediately following the election, such political
396 subdivision may raise its rates of levy so that the revenue
397 received from its local real property tax rates equals the
398 amount the political subdivision would have received from
399 the increased rates of levy had there been no reduction in
400 the assessed valuation of real property in the political
401 subdivision.
402 (d) Using the increased tax rate ceiling shall be
403 revenue neutral as required in Article X, Section 22 of the
404 Constitution of Missouri.
405 6. (1) For the purposes of calculating state aid for
406 public schools pursuant to section 163.031, each taxing
407 authority which is a school district shall determine its
408 proposed tax rate as a blended rate of the classes or
409 subclasses of property. Such blended rate shall be
410 calculated by first determining the total tax revenue of the
411 property within the jurisdiction of the taxing authority,
412 which amount shall be equal to the sum of the products of
413 multiplying the assessed valuation of each class and
414 subclass of property by the corresponding tax rate for such
415 class or subclass, then dividing the total tax revenue by
416 the total assessed valuation of the same jurisdiction, and
417 then multiplying the resulting quotient by a factor of one
418 hundred. Where the taxing authority is a school district,
419 such blended rate shall also be used by such school district
420 for calculating revenue from state-assessed railroad and
421 utility property as defined in chapter 151 and for
422 apportioning the tax rate by purpose.
423 (2) Each taxing authority proposing to levy a tax rate
424 in any year shall notify the clerk of the county commission
425 in the county or counties where the tax rate applies of its
426 tax rate ceiling and its proposed tax rate. Each taxing

SB 1517 78
427 authority shall express its proposed tax rate in a fraction
428 equal to the nearest one-tenth of a cent, unless its
429 proposed tax rate is in excess of one dollar, then one/one-
430 hundredth of a cent. If a taxing authority shall round to
431 one/one-hundredth of a cent, it shall round up a fraction
432 greater than or equal to five/one-thousandth of one cent to
433 the next higher one/one-hundredth of a cent; if a taxing
434 authority shall round to one-tenth of a cent, it shall round
435 up a fraction greater than or equal to five/one-hundredths
436 of a cent to the next higher one-tenth of a cent. Any
437 taxing authority levying a property tax rate shall provide
438 data, in such form as shall be prescribed by the state
439 auditor by rule, substantiating such tax rate complies with
440 Missouri law. All forms for the calculation of rates
441 pursuant to this section shall be promulgated as a rule and
442 shall not be incorporated by reference. The state auditor
443 shall promulgate rules for any and all forms for the
444 calculation of rates pursuant to this section which do not
445 currently exist in rule form or that have been incorporated
446 by reference. In addition, each taxing authority proposing
447 to levy a tax rate for debt service shall provide data, in
448 such form as shall be prescribed by the state auditor by
449 rule, substantiating the tax rate for debt service complies
450 with Missouri law. A tax rate proposed for annual debt
451 service requirements will be prima facie valid if, after
452 making the payment for which the tax was levied, bonds
453 remain outstanding and the debt fund reserves do not exceed
454 the following year's payments. The county clerk shall keep
455 on file and available for public inspection all such
456 information for a period of three years. The clerk shall,
457 within three days of receipt, forward a copy of the notice
458 of a taxing authority's tax rate ceiling and proposed tax

SB 1517 79
459 rate and any substantiating data to the state auditor. The
460 state auditor shall, within fifteen days of the date of
461 receipt, examine such information and return to the county
462 clerk his or her findings as to compliance of the tax rate
463 ceiling with this section and as to compliance of any
464 proposed tax rate for debt service with Missouri law. If
465 the state auditor believes that a taxing authority's
466 proposed tax rate does not comply with Missouri law, then
467 the state auditor's findings shall include a recalculated
468 tax rate, and the state auditor may request a taxing
469 authority to submit documentation supporting such taxing
470 authority's proposed tax rate. The county clerk shall
471 immediately forward a copy of the auditor's findings to the
472 taxing authority and shall file a copy of the findings with
473 the information received from the taxing authority. The
474 taxing authority shall have fifteen days from the date of
475 receipt from the county clerk of the state auditor's
476 findings and any request for supporting documentation to
477 accept or reject in writing the rate change certified by the
478 state auditor and to submit all requested information to the
479 state auditor. A copy of the taxing authority's acceptance
480 or rejection and any information submitted to the state
481 auditor shall also be mailed to the county clerk. If a
482 taxing authority rejects a rate change certified by the
483 state auditor and the state auditor does not receive
484 supporting information which justifies the taxing
485 authority's original or any subsequent proposed tax rate,
486 then the state auditor shall refer the perceived violations
487 of such taxing authority to the attorney general's office
488 and the attorney general is authorized to obtain injunctive
489 relief to prevent the taxing authority from levying a
490 violative tax rate.

SB 1517 80
491 (3) In the event that the taxing authority incorrectly
492 completes the forms created and promulgated under
493 subdivision (2) of this subsection, or makes a clerical
494 error, the taxing authority may submit amended forms with an
495 explanation for the needed changes. If such amended forms
496 are filed under regulations prescribed by the state auditor,
497 the state auditor shall take into consideration such amended
498 forms for the purposes of this subsection.
499 7. No tax rate shall be extended on the tax rolls by
500 the county clerk unless the political subdivision has
501 complied with the foregoing provisions of this section.
502 8. Whenever a taxpayer has cause to believe that a
503 taxing authority has not complied with the provisions of
504 this section, the taxpayer may make a formal complaint with
505 the prosecuting attorney of the county. Where the
506 prosecuting attorney fails to bring an action within ten
507 days of the filing of the complaint, the taxpayer may bring
508 a civil action pursuant to this section and institute an
509 action as representative of a class of all taxpayers within
510 a taxing authority if the class is so numerous that joinder
511 of all members is impracticable, if there are questions of
512 law or fact common to the class, if the claims or defenses
513 of the representative parties are typical of the claims or
514 defenses of the class, and if the representative parties
515 will fairly and adequately protect the interests of the
516 class. In any class action maintained pursuant to this
517 section, the court may direct to the members of the class a
518 notice to be published at least once each week for four
519 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
520 published in the county where the civil action is commenced
521 and in other counties within the jurisdiction of a taxing
522 authority. The notice shall advise each member that the

SB 1517 81
523 court will exclude him or her from the class if he or she so
524 requests by a specified date, that the judgment, whether
525 favorable or not, will include all members who do not
526 request exclusion, and that any member who does not request
527 exclusion may, if he or she desires, enter an appearance.
528 In any class action brought pursuant to this section, the
529 court, in addition to the relief requested, shall assess
530 against the taxing authority found to be in violation of
531 this section the reasonable costs of bringing the action,
532 including reasonable attorney's fees, provided no attorney's
533 fees shall be awarded any attorney or association of
534 attorneys who receive public funds from any source for their
535 services. Any action brought pursuant to this section shall
536 be set for hearing as soon as practicable after the cause is
537 at issue.
538 9. If in any action, including a class action, the
539 court issues an order requiring a taxing authority to revise
540 the tax rates as provided in this section or enjoins a
541 taxing authority from the collection of a tax because of its
542 failure to revise the rate of levy as provided in this
543 section, any taxpayer paying his or her taxes when an
544 improper rate is applied has erroneously paid his or her
545 taxes in part, whether or not the taxes are paid under
546 protest as provided in section 139.031 or otherwise
547 contested. The part of the taxes paid erroneously is the
548 difference in the amount produced by the original levy and
549 the amount produced by the revised levy. The township or
550 county collector of taxes or the collector of taxes in any
551 city shall refund the amount of the tax erroneously paid.
552 The taxing authority refusing to revise the rate of levy as
553 provided in this section shall make available to the
554 collector all funds necessary to make refunds pursuant to

SB 1517 82
555 this subsection. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on
556 any money erroneously paid by him or her pursuant to this
557 subsection. Effective in the 1994 tax year, nothing in this
558 section shall be construed to require a taxing authority to
559 refund any tax erroneously paid prior to or during the third
560 tax year preceding the current tax year.
561 10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
562 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
563 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
564 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
565 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
566 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
567 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
568 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
569 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
570 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
571 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
572 2004, shall be invalid and void.
137.082. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of
sections 137.075 and 137.080 to the contrary, a building or
other structure classified as residential property pursuant
to section 137.016 newly constructed and occupied on any
parcel of real property shall be assessed and taxed on such
assessed valuation as of the first day of the month
following the date of occupancy for the proportionate part
of the remaining year at the tax rates established for that
year, in all taxing jurisdictions located in the county
adopting this section as provided in subsection 8 of this
section. Newly constructed residential property which has
never been occupied shall not be assessed as improved real
property until such occupancy or the first day of January of
the fourth year following the year in which construction of

SB 1517 83
the improvements was completed. The provisions of this
subsection shall apply in those counties including any city
not within a county in which the governing body has
previously adopted or hereafter adopts the provisions of
this subsection.
2. The assessor may consider a property residentially
occupied upon personal verification or when any two of the
following conditions have been met:
(1) An occupancy permit has been issued for the
property;
(2) A deed transferring ownership from one party to
another has been filed with the recorder of deeds' office
subsequent to the date of the first permanent utility
service;
(3) A utility company providing service in the county
has verified a transfer of service for property from one
party to another;
(4) The person or persons occupying the newly
constructed property has registered a change of address with
any local, state or federal governmental office or agency.
3. In implementing the provisions of this section, the
assessor may use occupancy permits, building permits,
warranty deeds, utility connection documents, including
telephone connections, or other official documents as may be
necessary to discover the existence of newly constructed
properties. No utility company shall refuse to provide
verification monthly to the assessor of a utility connection
to a newly occupied single family building or structure.
4. In the event that the assessment under subsections
1 and 2 of this section is not completed until after the
deadline for filing appeals in a given tax year, the owner
of the newly constructed property who is aggrieved by the

SB 1517 84
assessment of the property may appeal this assessment the
following year to the county board of equalization in
accordance with chapter 138 and may pay any taxes under
protest in accordance with section 139.031; provided
however, that such payment under protest shall not be
required as a condition of appealing to the county board of
equalization. The collector shall impound such protested
taxes and shall not disburse such taxes until resolution of
the appeal.
5. The increase in assessed valuation resulting from
the implementation of the provisions of this section shall
be considered new construction and improvements under the
provisions of this chapter.
6. In counties which adopt the provisions of
subsections 1 to 7 of this section, an amount not to exceed
ten percent of all ad valorem property tax collections on
newly constructed and occupied residential property
allocable to each taxing authority within counties of the
first classification having a population of nine hundred
thousand or more, one-tenth of one percent of all ad valorem
property tax collections allocable to each taxing authority
within all other counties of the first classification and
one-fifth of one percent of all ad valorem property tax
collections allocable to each taxing authority within
counties of the second, third and fourth classifications and
any county of the first classification having a population
of at least eighty-two thousand inhabitants, but less than
eighty-two thousand one hundred inhabitants, in addition to
the amount prescribed by section 137.720 shall be deposited
into the assessment fund of the county for collection costs.
7. For purposes of figuring the tax due on such newly
constructed residential property, the assessor or the board

SB 1517 85
of equalization shall place the full amount of the assessed
valuation on the tax book upon the first day of the month
following occupancy. Such assessed valuation shall be taxed
for each month of the year following such date at its new
assessed valuation, and for each month of the year preceding
such date at its previous valuation. The percentage derived
from dividing the number of months at which the property is
taxed at its new valuation by twelve shall be applied to the
total assessed valuation of the new construction and
improvements, and such product shall be included in the next
year's base for the purposes of figuring the next year's tax
levy rollback. The untaxed percentage shall be considered
as new construction and improvements in the following year
[and shall be exempt from the rollback provisions].
8. Subsections 1 to 7 of this section shall be
effective in those counties including any city not within a
county in which the governing body of such county elects to
adopt a proposal to implement the provisions of subsections
1 to 7 of this section. Such subsections shall become
effective in such county on the first day of January of the
year following such election.
100 9. In any county which adopts the provisions of
101 subsections 1 to 7 of this section prior to the first day of
102 June in any year pursuant to subsection 8 of this section,
103 the assessor of such county shall, upon application of the
104 property owner, remove on a pro rata basis from the tax book
105 for the current year any residential real property
106 improvements destroyed by a natural disaster if such
107 property is unoccupied and uninhabitable due to such
108 destruction. On or after the first day of July, the board
109 of equalization shall perform such duties. Any person
110 claiming such destroyed property shall provide a list of

SB 1517 86
111 such destroyed property to the county assessor. The
112 assessor shall have available a supply of appropriate forms
113 on which the claim shall be made. The assessor may verify
114 all such destroyed property listed to ensure that the person
115 made a correct statement. Any person who completes such a
116 list and, with intent to defraud, includes property on the
117 list that was not destroyed by a natural disaster shall, in
118 addition to any other penalties provided by law, be assessed
119 double the value of any property fraudulently listed. The
120 list shall be filed by the assessor, after he has provided a
121 copy of the list to the county collector and the board of
122 equalization, in the office of the county clerk who, after
123 entering the filing thereof, shall preserve and safely keep
124 them. If the assessor, subsequent to such destruction,
125 considers such property occupied as provided in subsection 2
126 of this section, the assessor shall consider such property
127 new construction and improvements and shall assess such
128 property accordingly as provided in subsection 1 of this
129 section. For the purposes of this section, the term
130 "natural disaster" means any disaster due to natural causes
131 such as tornado, fire, flood, or earthquake.
132 10. Any political subdivision may recover the loss of
133 revenue caused by subsection 9 of this section by adjusting
134 the rate of taxation, to the extent previously authorized by
135 the voters of such political subdivision, for the tax year
136 immediately following the year of such destruction in an
137 amount not to exceed the loss of revenue caused by this
138 section.
137.115. 1. (1) All other laws to the contrary
notwithstanding, the assessor or the assessor's deputies in
all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis
shall annually make a list of all real and tangible personal

SB 1517 87
property taxable in the assessor's city, county, town or
district.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
this section and section 137.078, the assessor shall
annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and
one-third percent of its true value in money as of January
first of each calendar year.
(3) The assessor shall annually assess all real
property, including any new construction and improvements to
real property, and possessory interests in real property at
the percent of its true value in money set in subsection 5
of this section. The true value in money of any possessory
interest in real property in subclass (3), where such real
property is on or lies within the ultimate airport boundary
as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as defined by 14
CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a FAR Part 139
certification and owned by a political subdivision, shall be
the otherwise applicable true value in money of any such
possessory interest in real property[, less the total dollar
amount of costs paid by a party, other than the political
subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on
such real property completed after January 1, 2008, and
which are included in the above-mentioned possessory
interest, regardless of the year in which such costs were
incurred or whether such costs were considered in any prior
year]. The assessor shall annually assess all real property
in the following manner: new assessed values shall be
determined as of January first of each odd-numbered year and
shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered
year, except for new construction and property improvements
which shall be valued as though they had been completed as

SB 1517 88
of January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The
assessor may call at the office, place of doing business, or
residence of each person required by this chapter to list
property, and require the person to make a correct statement
of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
person or under his or her care, charge or management,
taxable in the county.
(4) On or before January first of each even-numbered
year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a two-year
assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and
the state tax commission for their respective approval or
modification. The county governing body shall approve and
forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the
state tax commission by February first. If the county
governing body fails to forward the plan or its alternative
to the plan to the state tax commission by February first,
the assessor's plan shall be considered approved by the
county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to
approve a plan and if the state tax commission and the
assessor and the governing body of the county involved are
unable to resolve the differences, in order to receive state
cost-share funds outlined in section 137.750, the county or
the assessor shall petition the administrative hearing
commission, by May first, to decide all matters in dispute
regarding the assessment maintenance plan. Upon agreement
of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties
proceed with mediation or arbitration upon terms agreed to
by the parties. The final decision of the administrative
hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in
the circuit court of the county involved.
(5) In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real
property within any county with a charter form of

SB 1517 89
government, or within a city not within a county, is made by
a computer, computer-assisted method or a computer program,
the burden of proof, supported by clear, convincing and
cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the
assessor at any hearing or appeal. In any such county,
unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
presumption that the assessment was made by a computer,
computer-assisted method or a computer program. Such
evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
following:
[(1)] (a) The findings of the assessor based on an
appraisal of the property by generally accepted appraisal
techniques; and
[(2)] (b) The purchase prices from sales of at least
three comparable properties and the address or location
thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable"
means that:
[(a)] a. Such sale was closed at a date relevant to
the property valuation; and
[(b)] b. Such properties are not more than one mile
from the site of the disputed property, except where no
similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed
property, the nearest comparable property shall be used.
Such property shall be within five hundred square feet in
size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed
property in age, floor plan, number of rooms, and other
relevant characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City
of St. Louis may send personal property assessment forms
through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each
100 constitute separate subclasses of tangible personal property

SB 1517 90
101 and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of
102 taxation at the following percentages of their true value in
103 money:
104 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
105 unmanufactured condition, one-half of one percent;
106 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
107 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
108 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
109 as and are registered as historic motor vehicles pursuant to
110 section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five
111 years old and which are used solely for noncommercial
112 purposes and are operated less than two hundred hours per
113 year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five
114 percent;
115 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
116 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and
117 tools and equipment used in retooling for the purpose of
118 introducing new product lines or used for making
119 improvements to existing products by any company which is
120 located in a state enterprise zone and which is identified
121 by any standard industrial classification number cited in
122 subdivision (7) of section 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
123 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
124 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
125 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
126 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
127 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
128 energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
129 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true
130 and correct statement of the property, in a printed blank
131 prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being
132 filled out, shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to

SB 1517 91
133 as provided in section 137.155. The list shall then be
134 delivered to the assessor.
135 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such
136 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
137 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
138 shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
139 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen
140 percent;
141 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent;
142 and
143 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two
144 percent.
145 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or,
146 if not located within a county, then the assessor of such
147 city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real
148 property if the use or purpose of such real property is
149 changed after such property is assessed under the provisions
150 of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such
151 property shall be reclassified, he or she shall determine
152 the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage
153 of the tax year that such property was classified in each
154 subclassification.
155 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
156 which are actually used as dwelling units shall be assessed
157 at the same percentage of true value as residential real
158 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of
159 assessment of true value for such manufactured homes shall
160 be the same as for residential real property. If the county
161 collector cannot identify or find the manufactured home when
162 attempting to attach the manufactured home for payment of
163 taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county
164 collector may request the county commission to have the

SB 1517 92
165 manufactured home removed from the tax books, and such
166 request shall be granted within thirty days after the
167 request is made; however, the removal from the tax books
168 does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it
169 is later identified or found. For purposes of this section,
170 a manufactured home located in a manufactured home rental
171 park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
172 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal
173 property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home
174 located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
175 may be considered real property.
176 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered
177 a parcel for the purpose of reimbursement pursuant to
178 section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to
179 be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015
180 and assessed as a realty improvement to the existing real
181 estate parcel.
182 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the
183 assessment of a manufactured home shall be included on the
184 personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
185 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real
186 estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015, in
187 which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment
188 of the manufactured home as a realty improvement to the
189 existing real estate parcel shall be included on the real
190 property tax statement of the real estate owner.
191 9. The assessor of each county and each city not
192 within a county shall use a nationally recognized automotive
193 trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
194 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book,
195 Edmunds, or other similar publication as the recommended
196 guide of information for determining the true value of motor

SB 1517 93
197 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax
198 commission shall select and make available to all assessors
199 which publication shall be used. The assessor of each
200 county and each city not within a county shall use the trade-
201 in value published in the current October issue of the
202 publication selected by the state tax commission. The
203 assessor shall not use a value that is greater than the
204 average trade-in value in determining the true value of the
205 motor vehicle without performing a physical inspection of
206 the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years old or newer from
207 a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other
208 than average without performing a physical inspection of the
209 motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for a particular
210 motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use
211 such information or publications that, in the assessor's
212 judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
213 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of
214 less than fifty thousand dollars as of January 1, 2025, the
215 assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount
216 greater than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous
217 year, provided that such motor vehicle was properly assessed
218 in the previous year.
219 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed
220 valuation of any parcel of subclass (1) real property or any
221 parcel of subclass (3) real property by more than fifteen
222 percent since the last assessment, excluding increases due
223 to new construction or improvements, the assessor shall
224 conduct a physical inspection of such property.
225 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to
226 subsection 10 of this section, the assessor shall notify the
227 property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the
228 owner clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to

SB 1517 94
229 the physical inspection. If a physical inspection is
230 required, the property owner may request that an interior
231 inspection be performed during the physical inspection. The
232 owner shall have no less than thirty days to notify the
233 assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
234 12. A physical inspection, as required by subsection
235 10 of this section, shall include, but not be limited to, an
236 on-site personal observation and review of all exterior
237 portions of the land and any buildings and improvements to
238 which the inspector has or may reasonably and lawfully gain
239 external access, and shall include an observation and review
240 of the interior of any buildings or improvements on the
241 property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant to
242 subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the
243 property via a drive-by inspection or the like shall not be
244 considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as
245 required by this section.
246 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards
247 as proper form of payment of outstanding property tax or
248 license due. No county or city collector may charge
249 surcharge for payment by credit card which exceeds the fee
250 or surcharge charged by the credit card bank, processor, or
251 issuer for its service. A county or city collector may
252 accept payment by electronic transfers of funds in payment
253 of any tax or license and charge the person making such
254 payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the
255 bank, processor, or issuer of such electronic payment.
256 14. Any county or city not within a county in this
257 state may, by an affirmative vote of the governing body of
258 such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and
259 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house
260 bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly, second

SB 1517 95
261 regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
262 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate
263 committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-second
264 general assembly, second regular session, for the next year
265 of the general reassessment, prior to January first of any
266 year. No county or city not within a county shall exercise
267 this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of
268 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
269 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
270 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as
271 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
272 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
273 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a
274 year of general reassessment. For the purposes of applying
275 the provisions of this subsection , a political subdivision
276 contained within two or more counties where at least one of
277 such counties has opted out and at least one of such
278 counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate
279 as in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150
280 of the ninety-first general assembly, second regular
281 session. A governing body of a city not within a county or
282 a county that has opted out under the provisions of this
283 subsection may choose to implement the provisions of this
284 section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
285 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
286 assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as
287 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
288 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
289 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for
290 the next year of general reassessment, by an affirmative
291 vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
292 any year.

SB 1517 96
293 15. The governing body of any city of the third
294 classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
295 hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred
296 inhabitants located in any county that has exercised its
297 authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this section may
298 levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal
299 property only if such city bills and collects its own
300 property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing
301 and collection of such separate and differing tax rates.
302 Such separate and differing rates shall not exceed such
303 city's tax rate ceiling.
304 16. Any portion of real property that is available as
305 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
306 purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that
307 has not been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be
308 assessed based upon how the real property is currently being
309 used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state
310 tax commission, state agency, or political subdivision
311 responsible for the administration of tax policies shall, in
312 the performance of its duties, make available all books,
313 records, and information requested, except such books,
314 records, and information as are by law declared confidential
315 in nature, including individually identifiable information
316 regarding a specific taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property.
317 For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall mean
318 all real property that is in use or readily available as a
319 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
320 purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to
321 others that has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
137.565. 1. Whenever ten or more voters residing in
or owners of land in any general or special road district in
any county in this state shall petition the county

SB 1517 97
commission of the county in which such district is located,
asking that such commission submit the question in such
district for the purpose of voting for or against the levy
of the tax provided for in Section 12(a) of Article X of the
Constitution of Missouri, it shall be the duty of the county
commission, upon the filing of such petition, to submit the
question. The petition so filed shall set out the duration
of the tax to be levied in a period of one, two, three, or
four years and the ballot to be used for voting shall
specify the number of years duration of the tax levy, but in
no event shall the duration of the tax levy be for a period
of more than four years. Such submission shall be made by
an order entered of record setting forth the date and the
rate of tax the commission will levy, which rate shall not
exceed thirty-five cents on the hundred dollars assessed
valuation on all taxable real and tangible personal property
in the district.
2. The question shall be submitted as provided in
section 115.706.
137.1040. 1. In addition to other levies authorized
by law, the county commission in counties not adopting an
alternative form of government and the proper administrative
body in counties adopting an alternative form of government,
or the governing body of any city, town, or village, in
their discretion may levy an additional tax, not to exceed
one quarter of one cent on each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation, on all taxable real property located within such
city, town, village, or county, all of such tax to be
collected and allocated to the city, town, village, or
county treasury, where it shall be known and designated as
the "Cemetery Maintenance Trust Fund" to be used for the

SB 1517 98
upkeep and maintenance of cemeteries located within such
city, town, village, or county.
2. To the extent necessary to comply with Article X,
Section 22(a) of the Missouri Constitution, for any city,
town, village, or county with a tax levy at or above the
limitations provided under Article X, Section 11(b), no
ordinance adopted under this section shall become effective
unless the county commission or proper administrative body
of the county, or governing body of the city, town, or
village submits to the voters of the city, town, village, or
county at a [state] general[, primary, or special] election
a proposal to authorize the imposition of a tax under this
section. The tax authorized under this section shall be
levied and collected in the same manner as other real
property taxes are levied and collected within the city,
town, village, or county. Such tax shall be in addition to
all other taxes imposed on real property, and shall be
stated separately from all other charges and taxes. Such
tax shall not become effective unless the county commission
or proper administrative body of the county or governing
body of the city, town, or village, by order or ordinance,
submits to the voters of the county a proposal to authorize
the city, town, village, or county to impose a tax under
this section on any day [available for such city, town,
village, or county to hold elections or at a special
election called for that purpose].
3. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in
this section shall be [in substantially the following form:]
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city, town,
village, or county) impose a tax on all real

SB 1517 99
property situated in ______ (name of the city,
town, village, or county) at a rate of ______
(insert rate not to exceed one quarter of one cent
per one hundred dollars assessed valuation) for
the sole purpose of providing funds for the
maintenance, upkeep, and preservation of city,
town, village, or county cemeteries?
□ YES □ NO
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, then the tax shall become effective on the first
day of the second calendar quarter immediately following
notification to the city, town, village, or county
collector. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and
until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority
of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. The tax imposed under this section shall be known
as the "Cemetery Maintenance Tax". Each city, town,
village, or county imposing a tax under this section shall
establish separate trust funds to be known as the "Cemetery
Maintenance Trust Fund". The city, town, village, or county
treasurer shall deposit the revenue derived from the tax
imposed under this section for cemetery purposes in the
city, town, village, or county cemetery maintenance trust
fund. The proceeds of such tax shall be appropriated by the
county commission or appropriate administrative body, or the
governing body of the city, town, or village exclusively for

SB 1517 100
the maintenance, upkeep, and preservation of cemeteries
located within the jurisdiction of such commission or body.
5. All applicable provisions in this chapter relating
to property tax shall apply to the collection of any tax
imposed under this section.
137.1050. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible credit amount", the difference between
an eligible taxpayer's real property tax liability on such
taxpayer's homestead for a given tax year from all political
subdivisions levying a real property tax, minus the real
property tax liability on such homestead in the eligible
taxpayer's initial credit year;
(2) "Eligible taxpayer", a Missouri resident who:
(a) Is sixty-two years of age or older as of January
first of the applicable tax year;
(b) Is an owner of record of a homestead or has a
legal or equitable interest in such property as evidenced by
a publicly recorded or a verified, written instrument
including, but not limited to, a trust document in which at
least one primary beneficiary is sixty-two years of age or
older; and
(c) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes
on such homestead;
(3) "Homestead", real property actually occupied by an
eligible taxpayer as the primary residence. An eligible
taxpayer shall not claim more than one primary residence;
(4) "Initial credit year":
(a) In the case of a taxpayer that meets all
requirements of subdivision (2) of this subsection prior to
the year in which a credit is authorized pursuant to

SB 1517 101
subsection 2 of this section, the year in which such credit
is authorized;
(b) For all other taxpayers, the year in which the
taxpayer meets all requirements of subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
If in any tax year subsequent to the eligible taxpayer's
initial credit year the eligible taxpayer's real property
tax liability is lower than such liability in the initial
credit year, such tax year shall be considered the eligible
taxpayer's initial credit year for all subsequent tax
years. This provision shall not apply if an eligible
taxpayer's real property tax liability is lower than such
liability in the taxpayer's initial credit year solely due
to a reduction in a property tax levy made pursuant to
section 321.554.
2. (1) Any county authorized to impose a property tax
[may] shall grant a property tax credit to all eligible
taxpayers residing in such county for certain increases to
such taxpayer's real property tax liability in an amount
equal to the taxpayer's eligible credit amount, provided
that:
(a) Such county adopts an ordinance authorizing such
credit; or
(b) a. A petition in support of a referendum on such
a credit is signed by at least five percent of the
registered voters of such county voting in the last
gubernatorial election and the petition is delivered to the
governing body of the county, which shall subsequently hold
a referendum on such credit.
b. The ballot of submission for the question submitted
to the voters pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subdivision

SB 1517 102
shall be [in substantially the following form:] submitted as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the County of ______ exempt senior
citizens aged 62 and older from increases in
the property tax liability due on such senior
citizens' primary residence?
□ YES □ NO ]
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the credit shall be in effect.
(2) An ordinance adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not preclude such
ordinance from being amended or superseded by a petition
subsequently adopted pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. (1) In a county granting a real property tax
credit pursuant to this section, the county and each
political subdivision levying a real property tax on an
eligible taxpayer's homestead shall apply the county's or
political subdivision's proportional amount of such credit
when calculating the eligible taxpayer's property tax
liability for the tax year. The total amount of the credit
and the county's and each political subdivision's
proportional amount of the credit shall be noted on the
statement of tax due sent to the eligible taxpayer by the
county collector. The county governing body or political
subdivision's governing body may adopt reasonable procedures
in order to carry out the purposes and intent of this
section, provided that neither the county nor a political
subdivision shall [not] adopt any procedure that limits the

SB 1517 103
definition or scope of eligible credit amount or eligible
taxpayer as defined in this section.
(2) If an eligible taxpayer makes new construction and
improvements to such eligible taxpayer's homestead, the real
property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit
year shall be increased to reflect the real property tax
liability attributable to such new construction and
improvements.
(3) If an eligible taxpayer's homestead is annexed
into a taxing jurisdiction to which such eligible taxpayer
did not owe real property tax in the eligible taxpayer's
initial credit year, then the real property tax liability
100 for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall be increased to
101 reflect the real property tax liability owed to the annexing
102 taxing jurisdiction.
103 4. For the purposes of calculating property tax levies
104 pursuant to section 137.073, the total amount of credits
105 authorized [by] in a county pursuant to this section shall
106 be considered tax revenue, as such term is defined in
107 section 137.073, actually received by the political
108 subdivision levying such tax.
109 5. [A county granting a tax credit pursuant to this
110 section shall notify each political subdivision within such
111 county of the total credit amount applicable to such
112 political subdivision by no later than November thirtieth of
113 each year] For purposes of this section, "real property tax"
114 includes, but is not limited to, the following levies on an
115 eligible taxpayer's homestead by a county or a political
116 subdivision within such county:
117 (1) A tax levy for debt service;
118 (2) A tax levy for operating purposes or operating
119 expenses;

SB 1517 104
120 (3) A tax levy for capital improvements or capital
121 projects;
122 (4) A special assessment or special tax levy; and
123 (5) Any other real property tax levied for any purpose.
124 6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
125 prevent an eligible taxpayer from appealing an assessment.
137.1055. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "County", a five percent county or a zero percent
county;
(2) "Five percent county":
(a) Any county with more than forty thousand but fewer
than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than fourteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand
inhabitants;
(b) Any county with more than five thousand but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
fewer than nine hundred inhabitants;
(c) Any county with more than twenty-five thousand but
fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than eight thousand but fewer than twelve
thousand inhabitants;
(d) Any county with more than twelve thousand five
hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than five thousand but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants;
(e) Any county with more than fifteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two
thousand but fewer than three thousand inhabitants;
(f) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer
than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a

SB 1517 105
county seat with more than six hundred seventy but fewer
than seven hundred thirty inhabitants;
(g) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but
fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than five thousand five hundred
but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants;
(h) Any county with more than nine thousand nine
hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than one thousand five hundred but
fewer than two thousand five hundred inhabitants;
(i) Any county with more than twenty-five thousand but
fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than five hundred but fewer than two thousand
five hundred inhabitants;
(j) Any county with more than nine thousand nine
hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than three hundred but fewer than
six hundred inhabitants;
(k) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than five thousand fifty but
fewer than seven thousand inhabitants;
(l) Any county with more than five thousand but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than nine hundred but fewer than one thousand six
hundred inhabitants;
(m) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer
than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a
county seat with fewer than three hundred inhabitants;
(n) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer
than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a

SB 1517 106
county seat with more than three thousand three hundred but
fewer than five thousand inhabitants;
(o) Any county with more than seven thousand but fewer
than eight thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
fewer than four hundred eighty inhabitants;
(p) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but
fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than two thousand two hundred twenty but
fewer than two thousand five hundred inhabitants;
(q) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer
than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than one thousand three hundred but
fewer than two thousand inhabitants;
(r) Any county with more than eleven thousand but
fewer than twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than one thousand but fewer than two
thousand inhabitants;
(s) Any county with more than six thousand but fewer
than seven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than one thousand but fewer than one thousand eight
hundred inhabitants;
(t) Any county with more than eight thousand nine
hundred but fewer than nine thousand nine hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five
thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants;
(u) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer
than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than two thousand but fewer than three
thousand three hundred inhabitants;
(v) Any county with more than four thousand but fewer
than four thousand five hundred inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than eight hundred inhabitants;

SB 1517 107
(w) Any county with more than eleven thousand but
fewer than twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than one hundred but fewer than five
hundred inhabitants;
(x) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but
fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
than ten thousand inhabitants;
(y) Any county with more than two thousand but fewer
than three thousand six hundred inhabitants;
100 (z) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but
101 fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county
102 seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than thirteen
103 thousand inhabitants;
104 (aa) Any county with more than five thousand but fewer
105 than six thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
106 more than one thousand six hundred but fewer than two
107 thousand six hundred inhabitants;
108 (bb) Any county with fewer than two thousand
109 inhabitants;
110 (cc) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but
111 fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county
112 seat with more than one thousand but fewer than two thousand
113 two hundred twenty inhabitants;
114 (dd) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but
115 fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
116 with a county seat with more than one thousand but fewer
117 than two thousand inhabitants;
118 (ee) Any county with more than fifteen thousand seven
119 hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
120 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three

SB 1517 108
121 thousand but fewer than three thousand six hundred
122 inhabitants;
123 (ff) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but
124 fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county
125 seat with more than eight thousand five hundred but fewer
126 than ten thousand inhabitants;
127 (gg) Any county with more than eight thousand but
128 fewer than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with
129 a county seat with more than six hundred but fewer than six
130 hundred seventy inhabitants;
131 (hh) Any county with more than forty thousand but
132 fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
133 with more than twenty-one thousand but fewer than thirty-one
134 thousand inhabitants;
135 (ii) Any county with more than thirty thousand but
136 fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
137 county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
138 thirteen thousand inhabitants;
139 (jj) Any county with more than eight thousand nine
140 hundred but fewer than nine thousand nine hundred
141 inhabitants and with a county seat with fewer than one
142 thousand inhabitants;
143 (kk) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but
144 fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county
145 seat with more than six thousand but fewer than eight
146 thousand five hundred inhabitants;
147 (ll) Any county with more than fifteen thousand seven
148 hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
149 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seven
150 thousand but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants;
151 (mm) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
152 fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a

SB 1517 109
153 county seat with more than twelve thousand five hundred but
154 fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants;
155 (nn) Any county with more than thirty thousand but
156 fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
157 county seat with more than three thousand eight hundred but
158 fewer than six thousand inhabitants;
159 (oo) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
160 fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
161 county seat with more than five thousand but fewer than
162 eight thousand inhabitants;
163 (pp) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
164 fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
165 county seat with more than one thousand four hundred but
166 fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
167 (qq) Any county with more than sixty thousand but
168 fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants;
169 (rr) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six
170 hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and
171 with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
172 than five thousand fifty inhabitants;
173 (ss) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
174 fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
175 county seat with more than two thousand three hundred but
176 fewer than four thousand inhabitants;
177 (tt) Any county with more than one hundred thousand
178 but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and
179 with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
180 than six thousand inhabitants;
181 (uu) Any county with more than eighty thousand but
182 fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants and with a
183 county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer than
184 eighty thousand inhabitants;

SB 1517 110
185 (vv) Any county with more than twenty-five thousand
186 but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county
187 seat with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than twenty
188 thousand inhabitants;
189 (ww) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
190 fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
191 county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
192 twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants;
193 (xx) Any county with more than six thousand but fewer
194 than seven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
195 more than one thousand eight hundred but fewer than two
196 thousand five hundred inhabitants;
197 (yy) Any county with more than three thousand six
198 hundred but fewer than four thousand inhabitants;
199 (zz) Any county with more than nine thousand nine
200 hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with
201 a county seat with fewer than two hundred inhabitants;
202 (aaa) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but
203 fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
204 with a county seat with more than four thousand nine hundred
205 but fewer than five thousand five hundred inhabitants;
206 (bbb) Any county with more than twenty-five thousand
207 but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county
208 seat with more than two thousand five hundred but fewer than
209 six thousand inhabitants;
210 (ccc) Any county with more than eight thousand but
211 fewer than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with
212 a county seat with more than eight hundred but fewer than
213 one thousand three hundred inhabitants;
214 (ddd) Any county with more than four thousand five
215 hundred but fewer than five thousand inhabitants and with a

SB 1517 111
216 county seat with more than one thousand seven hundred thirty-
217 three inhabitants;
218 (eee) Any county with more than nine thousand nine
219 hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with
220 a county seat with more than six hundred but fewer than one
221 thousand inhabitants;
222 (fff) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand
223 but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
224 county seat with more than nine hundred but fewer than one
225 thousand four hundred inhabitants;
226 (ggg) Any county with more than four thousand but
227 fewer than four thousand five hundred inhabitants and with a
228 county seat with fewer than eight hundred inhabitants;
229 (hhh) Any county with more than four thousand five
230 hundred but fewer than five thousand inhabitants and with a
231 county seat with fewer than one thousand seven hundred
232 thirty-three inhabitants;
233 (iii) Any county with more than six thousand but fewer
234 than seven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
235 more than four hundred but fewer than one thousand
236 inhabitants;
237 (jjj) Any county with more than one hundred twenty
238 thousand but fewer than one hundred fifty thousand
239 inhabitants;
240 (kkk) Any county with more than fifty thousand but
241 fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
242 with more than ten thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
243 six hundred inhabitants;
244 (lll) Any county with more than nine thousand nine
245 hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with
246 a county seat with more than one thousand but fewer than one
247 thousand five hundred inhabitants;

SB 1517 112
248 (mmm) Any county with more than eighty thousand but
249 fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants and with a
250 county seat with more than thirteen thousand but fewer than
251 seventeen thousand inhabitants;
252 (nnn) Any county with more than eight thousand nine
253 hundred but fewer than nine thousand nine hundred
254 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one
255 thousand but fewer than two thousand inhabitants;
256 (ooo) Any county with more than twelve thousand five
257 hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants and
258 with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
259 than five thousand inhabitants;
260 (ppp) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six
261 hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and
262 with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
263 than ten thousand inhabitants;
264 (qqq) Any county with more than six thousand but fewer
265 than seven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
266 fewer than three hundred inhabitants;
267 (rrr) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand
268 but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and with a county
269 seat with more than five hundred but fewer than two thousand
270 inhabitants;
271 (sss) Any county with more than fifteen thousand seven
272 hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
273 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four
274 thousand two hundred ten but fewer than six thousand
275 inhabitants;
276 (ttt) Any county with more than forty thousand but
277 fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
278 with more than ten thousand but fewer than fourteen thousand
279 inhabitants;

SB 1517 113
280 (uuu) Any county with more than fifty thousand but
281 fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
282 with more than twelve thousand six hundred but fewer than
283 fifteen thousand inhabitants;
284 (vvv) Any county with more than eleven thousand but
285 fewer than twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and with
286 a county seat with more than two thousand but fewer than two
287 thousand eight hundred fifty inhabitants;
288 (www) Any county with more than fifteen thousand seven
289 hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
290 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three
291 thousand six hundred but fewer than four thousand two
292 hundred ten inhabitants;
293 (3) "Eligible credit amount", the difference between
294 an eligible taxpayer's real property tax liability on such
295 taxpayer's homestead for a given tax year, minus the real
296 property tax liability on such homestead in the eligible
297 taxpayer's initial credit year, provided that, for five
298 percent counties, the real property tax liability on an
299 eligible taxpayer's homestead as determined in the
300 taxpayer's initial credit year may be increased by no more
301 than five percent per year or the percent increase in the
302 Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as published
303 by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, whichever is [greater]
304 lower, and for zero percent counties, the real property tax
305 liability on an eligible taxpayer's homestead shall not be
306 increased above the liability incurred during the initial
307 credit year. For all counties, an eligible taxpayer's real
308 property tax liability shall be increased to reflect any
309 increase in tax liability derived from any new property tax
310 levy or an increase in an existing property tax levy
311 approved by the voters subsequent to an eligible taxpayer's

SB 1517 114
312 initial credit year, provided that, for five percent
313 counties, such increase shall not be considered for the
314 purposes of calculating the allowable increase in an
315 eligible taxpayer's real property tax liability as provided
316 in this subdivision;
317 (4) "Eligible taxpayer", a Missouri resident who:
318 (a) Is an owner of record of a homestead or has a
319 legal or equitable interest in such property as evidenced by
320 a written instrument; and
321 (b) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes
322 on such homestead;
323 (5) "Homestead", real property actually occupied by an
324 eligible taxpayer as the primary residence. An eligible
325 taxpayer shall not claim more than one primary residence;
326 (6) "Initial credit year", the 2024 tax year.
327 If in any tax year subsequent to the eligible taxpayer's
328 initial credit year the eligible taxpayer's real property
329 tax liability is lower than such liability in the initial
330 credit year, such tax year shall be considered the eligible
331 taxpayer's initial credit year for all subsequent tax years;
332 (7) "Zero percent county":
333 (a) Any county with more than one hundred thousand but
334 fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with
335 a county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
336 eleven thousand inhabitants;
337 (b) Any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer
338 than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
339 more than seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one
340 thousand inhabitants;
341 (c) Any county with more than one hundred thousand but
342 fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with

SB 1517 115
343 a county seat with more than twelve thousand but fewer than
344 fourteen thousand inhabitants;
345 (d) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but
346 fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
347 with a county seat with more than two thousand but fewer
348 than three thousand inhabitants;
349 (e) Any county with more than twelve thousand five
350 hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants and
351 with a county seat with more than one thousand but fewer
352 than two thousand inhabitants;
353 (f) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but
354 fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
355 with more than eight thousand but fewer than ten thousand
356 inhabitants;
357 (g) Any county with more than two hundred thousand but
358 fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants;
359 (h) Any county with more than eleven thousand but
360 fewer than twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and with
361 a county seat with more than two thousand eight hundred
362 fifty but fewer than four thousand inhabitants;
363 (i) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but
364 fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
365 with more than ten thousand but fewer than fourteen thousand
366 inhabitants;
367 (j) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer
368 than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a
369 county seat with more than seven hundred thirty but fewer
370 than eight hundred inhabitants;
371 (k) Any county with more than seven thousand but fewer
372 than eight thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
373 more than four hundred eighty but fewer than one thousand
374 inhabitants;

SB 1517 116
375 (l) Any county with more than thirty thousand but
376 fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
377 county seat with more than two hundred but fewer than nine
378 hundred inhabitants;
379 (m) Any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer
380 than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
381 more than one thousand but fewer than four thousand
382 inhabitants;
383 (n) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
384 fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
385 county seat with more than one thousand nine hundred but
386 fewer than two thousand three hundred inhabitants;
387 (o) Any county with more than thirty thousand but
388 fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
389 county seat with more than two thousand but fewer than three
390 thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
391 (p) Any county with more than eighty thousand but
392 fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants and with a
393 county seat with more than twenty thousand but fewer than
394 twenty-five thousand inhabitants;
395 (q) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but
396 fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
397 with more than two thousand but fewer than five thousand
398 inhabitants;
399 (r) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but
400 fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a
401 county seat with more than five hundred but fewer than nine
402 hundred inhabitants;
403 (s) Any county with more than four hundred thousand
404 but fewer than five hundred thousand inhabitants;
405 (t) Any county with more than eleven thousand but
406 fewer than twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and with

SB 1517 117
407 a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer than
408 five thousand inhabitants;
409 (u) Any county with more than seven thousand but fewer
410 than eight thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
411 more than one thousand but fewer than two thousand
412 inhabitants;
413 (v) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but
414 fewer than forty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
415 with more than five thousand but fewer than eight thousand
416 inhabitants.
417 2. By no later than the municipal election in April
418 2026, a county shall place on the ballot a question of
419 whether to grant a property tax credit pursuant to this
420 section to eligible taxpayers residing in such county in an
421 amount equal to the taxpayer's eligible credit amount. If a
422 majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified
423 voters voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the
424 credit shall be in effect and the county shall grant such
425 property tax credit to eligible taxpayers residing in such
426 county in an amount equal to the taxpayer's eligible credit
427 amount.
428 3. (1) A county granting a credit pursuant to this
429 section shall apply such credit when calculating the
430 eligible taxpayer's property tax liability for the tax
431 year. The amount of the credit shall be noted on the
432 statement of tax due sent to the eligible taxpayer by the
433 county collector. The county governing body may adopt
434 reasonable procedures in order to carry out the purposes and
435 intent of this section, provided that the county shall not
436 adopt any procedure that limits the definition or scope of
437 eligible credit amount or eligible taxpayer as defined in
438 this section.

SB 1517 118
439 (2) If an eligible taxpayer makes new construction and
440 improvements to such eligible taxpayer's homestead, the real
441 property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit
442 year shall be increased to reflect the real property tax
443 liability attributable to such new construction and
444 improvements.
445 (3) If an eligible taxpayer's homestead is annexed
446 into a taxing jurisdiction to which such eligible taxpayer
447 did not owe real property tax in the eligible taxpayer's
448 initial credit year, then the real property tax liability
449 for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall be increased to
450 reflect the real property tax liability owed to the annexing
451 taxing jurisdiction.
452 4. For the purposes of calculating property tax levies
453 pursuant to section 137.073, the total amount of credits
454 authorized by a county pursuant to this section shall be
455 considered tax revenue, as such term is defined in section
456 137.073, actually received.
457 5. A county granting a tax credit pursuant to this
458 section shall notify each political subdivision within such
459 county of the total credit amount applicable to such
460 political subdivision by no later than November thirtieth of
461 each year.
462 6. No taxpayer shall be authorized to claim a property
463 tax credit pursuant to this section and section 137.1050 for
464 the same homestead.
139.035. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Motor vehicle", the same meaning as such term is
defined under section 301.010;

SB 1517 119
(2) "Taxing entity", any county or city not within a
county within this state that levies and collects personal
property taxes on motor vehicles;
(3) "Taxpayer", an individual or a business entity
subject to personal property tax on the totaled motor
vehicle;
(4) "Totaled motor vehicle", a motor vehicle
considered to be a total loss due to damage that is so
severe that it cannot be repaired safely, the total cost of
repair or salvage equals or exceeds the vehicle's actual
cash value, or a finding by an insurance company declaring
the motor vehicle to be a total loss. The term "totaled
motor vehicle" includes motorcycles owned by individual
taxpayers and motor vehicles primarily for business use, as
such term is defined under section 301.010, owned by a
business taxpayer;
(5) "Totaled motor vehicle personal property tax
proration program", a program established under the
provisions of this section.
2. Any taxing entity may establish a totaled motor
vehicle personal property tax proration program in
accordance with this section that allows a taxpayer
qualifying under the provisions of this section and any
additional requirements established by the taxing entity to
receive a prorated property tax credit during the tax year
to reduce the total personal property tax owed on a totaled
motor vehicle and to be claimed against the amount of
personal property tax due and owing at the end of the same
tax year by such taxpayer.
3. The prorated property tax credit amount shall apply
to the total of all personal property taxes due and owing on

SB 1517 120
the totaled motor vehicle, and shall reduce all taxes by an
equally distributed pro rata amount.
4. The prorated property tax credit, which shall be
prorated on a monthly basis, is to be determined by a ratio,
the numerator of which shall be the number of full months
from the date of disposition of the totaled motor vehicle
continuing through the close of the tax year, and the
denominator of which shall be twelve. The prorated property
tax credit is nonrefundable but may reduce a taxpayer's
liability down to zero.
5. A taxpayer may apply for such program if:
(1) Such taxpayer's totaled motor vehicle was owned,
registered, and titled under the taxpayer's name, or in the
case of a business taxpayer, the name of the business,
authorized agent, or other verifiable entity associated with
the business taxpayer, as of January first of the tax year
in which the motor vehicle was totaled and at the time of
the incident that totaled the taxpayer's motor vehicle in
the same tax year;
(2) The totaled motor vehicle was included on the
local taxing entity's tax roll for the tax year in which the
motor vehicle was totaled and such taxpayer is liable for
the payment of personal property taxes on the totaled motor
vehicle for such tax year;
(3) Such taxpayer was, as of the date of application,
up-to-date on all state and local taxes and fees owed on
such totaled motor vehicle; and
(4) As of the date of application for participation in
the program, the title on the totaled motor vehicle has been
transferred to the insurance company or other entity due to
the totaled nature of the vehicle and is no longer titled or
registered to the taxpayer nor in the taxpayer's possession.

SB 1517 121
6. If a taxpayer participating in a program
established under this section purchases a replacement
vehicle during the same tax year that the taxpayer's motor
vehicle was totaled and the taxpayer received a prorated
property tax credit for such totaled motor vehicle, such
replacement vehicle shall not be included in the tax rolls
for that tax year to offset the property tax liability.
Taxation of such replacement vehicle shall follow the
statutory assessment standards as provided by general law
and the applicable taxing entity if such replacement vehicle
is owned by such taxpayer as of January first of the
following tax year.
7. If a taxpayer participating in a program
established under this section repurchases the same totaled
motor vehicle from the insurance company or other entity by
way of a salvage certificate of title, as that term is
defined in section 301.217, and the taxpayer operates or
maintains the salvaged motor vehicle in the taxpayer's
possession, taxation of such salvaged motor vehicle shall
follow the statutory assessment standards as provided by
general law. Such salvaged motor vehicle shall not benefit
from the prorated property tax credit established in this
section.
8. A totaled motor vehicle personal property tax
proration program shall be created upon the adoption of an
ordinance by the governing body of such taxing entity. Such
ordinance shall be in accordance with the provisions of this
section and shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(1) Procedures and deadlines for application and
participation in such program and any required documentation
to sufficiently prove eligibility necessary for such

SB 1517 122
100 program, such as documents ascertaining proof of the totaled
101 motor vehicle's total loss value, copies of valuation
102 reports, insurance total loss documentation or total loss
103 letter, verification of the transfer of title of the totaled
104 motor vehicle, signed copy of title, certified letter of
105 transfer, or other such documentation necessary to
106 substantiate the taxpayer's eligibility;
107 (2) Procedures for verification and record keeping of
108 the prorated property tax credit amount and the total amount
109 by which the personal property tax owed has been modified
110 for each taxpayer participating in the program;
111 (3) Creation of a form for taxpayers participating in
112 the program that may be submitted in person, by mail, or
113 electronically on a taxing entity's website;
114 (4) Procedures for the crediting of the amount of a
115 taxpayer's prorated property tax credit toward such
116 taxpayer's personal property taxes; and
117 (5) Any other provisions that such taxing entity deems
118 reasonable and necessary for the implementation and
119 operation of such program.
120 9. A taxing entity may by ordinance promulgate rules,
121 establish procedures, and provide additional standards of
122 eligibility for a program adopted under this section.
123 10. Any taxing entity that establishes a totaled motor
124 vehicle personal property tax proration program under the
125 provisions of this section shall make information regarding
126 such program available to the taxpayers of the taxing entity.
127 11. Participation in this program and proration of
128 personal property taxes received under such program by any
129 qualified taxpayer as a prorated property tax credit toward
130 any portion of such taxpayer's personal property taxes shall

SB 1517 123
131 not affect the taxpayer's right to protest the amount of
132 such tax payments under applicable provisions of law.
139.053. 1. The governing body of any county[,
excluding township counties,] may by ordinance or order
provide for the payment of all or any part of current real
and personal property taxes which are owed, at the option of
the taxpayer, on an annual, semiannual or quarterly basis at
such times as determined by such governing body.
2. The ordinance shall provide the method by which the
amount of property taxes owed for the current tax year in
which the payments are to be made shall be estimated. The
collector shall submit to the governing body the procedures
by which taxes will be collected pursuant to the ordinance
or order. The estimate shall be based on the previous tax
year's liability. A taxpayer's payment schedule shall be
based on the estimate divided by the number of pay periods
in which payments are to be made. The taxpayer shall at the
end of the tax year pay any amounts owed in excess of the
estimate for such year. The county shall at the end of the
tax year refund to the taxpayer any amounts paid in excess
of the property tax owed for such year. No interest shall
be paid by the county on excess amounts owed to the
taxpayer. Any refund paid the taxpayer pursuant to this
subsection shall be an amount paid by the county only once
in a calendar year.
3. If a taxpayer fails to make an installment payment
of a portion of the real or personal property taxes owed to
the county, then such county may charge the taxpayer
interest on the amount of property taxes still owed for that
year.
4. Any governing body enacting the ordinance or order
specified in this section shall first agree to provide the

SB 1517 124
county collector with reasonable and necessary funds to
implement the ordinance or order.
5. Subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
payment for real property taxes by financial institutions,
as defined in section 381.410, who pay tax obligations which
they service from escrow accounts, as defined in Title 24,
Part 3500, Section 17, Code of Federal Regulation, as
amended.
162.441. 1. If any school district desires to be
attached to a community college district organized under
sections 178.770 to 178.890 or to one or more adjacent seven-
director school districts for school purposes, upon the
receipt of a petition setting forth such fact, signed either
by voters of the district equal in number to ten percent of
those voting in the last school election at which school
board members were elected or by a majority of the voters of
the district, whichever is the lesser, the school board of
the district desiring to be so attached shall submit the
question to the voters [at a November election] as provided
in subsection 1 of section 115.706.
2. As an alternative to the procedure in subsection 1
of this section, a seven-director district may, by a
majority vote of its board of education, propose a plan to
the voters of the district [at a November election] as
provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706 to attach the
district to one or more adjacent seven-director districts
and call an election upon the question of such plan.
3. As an alternative to the procedures in subsection 1
or 2 of this section, a community college district organized
under sections 178.770 to 178.890 may, by a majority vote of
its board of trustees, propose a plan to the voters of the
school district [at a November election] as provided in

SB 1517 125
subsection 1 of section 115.706 to attach the school
district to the community college district, levy the tax
rate applicable to the community college district at the
time of the vote of the board of trustees, and call an
election upon the question of such plan. The community
college proposing the annexation shall appear at a public
meeting of the school district to which the annexation is
being proposed to present the annexation proposal. The
school board shall invite the community college to make this
presentation at a regularly scheduled meeting no more than
one hundred twenty days prior and no less than thirty days
prior to the election to present the annexation proposal.
The tax rate applicable to the community college district
shall not be levied as to the school district until the
proposal by the board of trustees of the community college
district has been approved by a majority vote of the voters
of the school district at the election called for that
purpose. The community college district shall be
responsible for the costs associated with the election.
4. A plat of the proposed changes to all affected
districts shall be published and posted with the notice of
election.
5. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ school district become a part
of and be annexed to the ______ community
college district effective the ______ day of
______, ______? If this proposition is approved,
the overall tax levy in the school district will
increase by the community college tax levy of
$_____ per $100 of assessed valuation and all
residents of the school district will be

SB 1517 126
eligible for reduced community college tuition
at the in-district rate.]
6. If a majority of the votes cast in the district
proposing annexation favor annexation, the secretary shall
certify the fact, with a copy of the record, to the board of
the district and to the boards of the districts to which
annexation is proposed; whereupon the boards of the seven-
director districts to which annexation is proposed shall
meet to consider the advisability of receiving the district
or a portion thereof, and if a majority of all the members
of each board favor annexation, the boundary lines of the
seven-director school districts from the effective date
shall be changed to include the district, and the board
shall immediately notify the secretary of the district which
has been annexed of its action.
7. Upon the effective date of the annexation, all
indebtedness, property and money on hand belonging thereto
shall immediately pass to the seven-director school
district. If the district is annexed to more than one
district, the provisions of sections 162.031 and 162.041
shall apply.
162.840. The question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall there be organized a special school
district comprising the school districts of
______ (described by school district name and/or
number), state of Missouri, for vocational
education and for the education and training of
handicapped and severely handicapped children,
embracing the entire area of these school
districts, having the power to impose a property

SB 1517 127
tax not to exceed the annual rate of twenty-five
cents on each hundred dollars assessed
valuation, and any additional tax that is
approved hereafter by vote thereon, and to be
known as "The Special School District of
______," as prayed for by a petition filed with
state board of education on the ______ day of
______, 20______?]
163.021. 1. A school district shall receive state aid
for its education program only if it:
(1) Provides for at least a minimum school term as
provided in section 171.031. When the aggregate hours lost
in a term due to inclement weather decreases the total hours
of the school term below the required minimum number of
hours by more than twelve hours for all-day students or six
hours for one-half-day kindergarten students, all such hours
below the minimum must be made up as provided in section
171.033;
(2) Maintains adequate and accurate records of
attendance, personnel and finances, as required by the state
board of education, which shall include the preparation of a
financial statement which shall be submitted to the state
board of education the same as required by the provisions of
section 165.111 for districts;
(3) Levies an operating levy for school purposes of
not less than one dollar and twenty-five cents after all
adjustments and reductions on each one hundred dollars
assessed valuation of the district; and
(4) Computes average daily attendance as defined in
subdivision (2) of section 163.011 as modified by section
171.031. Whenever there has existed within the district an
infectious disease, contagion, epidemic, plague or similar

SB 1517 128
condition whereby the school attendance is substantially
reduced for an extended period in any school year, the
apportionment of school funds and all other distribution of
school moneys shall be made on the basis of the school year
next preceding the year in which such condition existed.
2. (1) For the 2006-07 school year and thereafter, no
school district shall receive more state aid, as calculated
under subsections 1 and 2 of section 163.031, for its
education program, exclusive of categorical add-ons, than it
received per weighted average daily attendance for the
school year 2005-06 from the foundation formula, line 14,
gifted, remedial reading, exceptional pupil aid, fair share,
and free textbook payment amounts, unless it has an
operating levy for school purposes, as determined pursuant
to section 163.011, of not less than:
(a) For school years ending on or before June 30,
2026, two dollars and seventy-five cents after all
adjustments and reductions; and
(b) For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent
school years, one dollar and fifty cents after all
adjustments and reductions.
(2) Any district which is required, pursuant to
Article X, Section 22 of the Missouri Constitution, to
reduce its operating levy below the minimum tax rate
otherwise required under this subsection shall not be
construed to be in violation of this subsection for making
such tax rate reduction.
(3) Pursuant to Section 10(c) of Article X of the
state constitution, a school district may levy the operating
levy for school purposes required by this subsection less
all adjustments required pursuant to Article X, Section 22
of the Missouri Constitution if such rate does not exceed

SB 1517 129
the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax
year.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean
that a school district is guaranteed to receive an amount
not less than the amount the school district received per
eligible pupil for the school year 1990-91.
(5) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
to any school district located in a county of the second
classification which has a nuclear power plant located in
such district or to any school district located in a county
of the third classification which has an electric power
generation unit with a rated generating capacity of more
than one hundred fifty megawatts which is owned or operated
or both by a rural electric cooperative except that such
school districts may levy for current school purposes and
capital projects an operating levy not to exceed two dollars
and seventy-five cents less all adjustments required
pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of the Missouri
Constitution.
3. No school district shall receive more state aid, as
calculated in section 163.031, for its education program,
exclusive of categorical add-ons, than it received per
eligible pupil for the school year 1993-94, if the state
board of education determines that the district was not in
compliance in the preceding school year with the
requirements of section 163.172, until such time as the
board determines that the district is again in compliance
with the requirements of section 163.172.
4. No school district shall receive state aid,
pursuant to section 163.031, if such district was not in
compliance, during the preceding school year, with the
requirement, established pursuant to section 160.530 to

SB 1517 130
allocate revenue to the professional development committee
of the district.
5. No school district shall receive more state aid, as
calculated in subsections 1 and 2 of section 163.031, for
its education program, exclusive of categorical add-ons,
than it received per weighted average daily attendance for
the school year 2005-06 from the foundation formula, line
14, gifted, remedial reading, exceptional pupil aid, fair
share, and free textbook payment amounts, if the district
did not comply in the preceding school year with the
requirements of subsection 5 of section 163.031.
100 6. Any school district that levies an operating levy
101 for school purposes that is less than the performance levy,
102 as such term is defined in section 163.011, shall provide
103 written notice to the department of elementary and secondary
104 education asserting that the district is providing an
105 adequate education to the students of such district. If a
106 school district asserts that it is not providing an adequate
107 education to its students, such inadequacy shall be deemed
108 to be a result of insufficient local effort. The provisions
109 of this subsection shall not apply to any special district
110 established under sections 162.815 to 162.940.
164.021. 1. Whenever it becomes necessary, in the
judgment of the school board of any school district in the
state, to increase the tax rate beyond the rate authorized
by the constitution for district purposes without voter
approval plus the last tax rate approved by the voters for
school purposes, or when voters of the district equal in
number to ten percent or more of the number of votes cast
for the member of the school board receiving the greatest
number of votes cast at the last school election in the
district wherein board members were elected, petition the

SB 1517 131
board, in writing, for an increase in the tax rate, the
board shall determine the rate of taxation necessary to be
levied in excess of the existing rate and submit the
proposition as to whether the rate of taxation shall be
increased by the board to the voters of the district. The
proposal may be submitted [at an election] as provided in
section 115.706.
2. If the necessary majority of the voters voting
thereon, as required by Article X, Section 11(c), of the
Constitution, favor the proposed increase, the result of
vote, including the rate of taxation so voted, shall be
certified by the clerk of the district to the clerk of the
commission of the proper county or counties, who, on receipt
thereof, shall assess the amount so certified, effective as
of September twentieth next following, against all taxable
property of the school district as provided by law. In
metropolitan districts the certification shall be made by
the secretary of the board as required by law.
164.151. 1. The questions on bond issues in all
districts shall be submitted [in substantially the following
form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ board of education borrow
money in the amount of ______ dollars for the
purpose of ______ and issue bonds for the
payment thereof resulting in an estimated
increase to the debt service property tax levy
of ______ (amount of estimated increase) per one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation? If this
proposition is approved, the adjusted debt
service levy of the school district is estimated
to increase from ______ (amount of current
school district levy) to ______ (estimated

SB 1517 132
adjusted debt service levy) per one hundred
dollars assessed valuation of real and personal
property.]
2. If the constitutionally required number of the
votes cast are for the loan, the board may, subject to the
restrictions of section 164.161, borrow money in the name of
the district, to the amount and for the purpose specified in
the notices aforesaid, and issue bonds of the district for
the payment thereof.
167.231. 1. Within all school districts except
metropolitan districts the board of education shall provide
transportation to and from school for all pupils living more
than three and one-half miles from school and may provide
transportation for all pupils. State aid for transportation
shall be paid as provided in section 163.161 only on the
basis of the cost of pupil transportation for those pupils
living one mile or more from school, including
transportation provided to and from publicly operated
university laboratory schools. The board of education may
provide transportation for pupils living less than one mile
from school at the expense of the district and may prescribe
reasonable rules and regulations as to eligibility of pupils
for transportation, and, notwithstanding any other provision
of law, no such district shall be subject to an
administrative penalty when the district demonstrates
pursuant to rule established by the state board of education
that such students are required to cross a state highway or
county arterial in the absence of sidewalks, traffic
signals, or a crossing guard and that no existing bus stop
location has been changed to permit a district to evade such
penalty. If no increase in the tax levy of the school
district is required to provide transportation for pupils

SB 1517 133
living less than one mile from the school, the board may
transport said pupils. If an increase in the tax levy of
the school district is required to provide transportation
for pupils living less than one mile from school, the board
shall submit the question at a public election. If a two-
thirds majority of the voters voting on the question at the
election are in favor of providing the transportation, the
board shall arrange and provide therefor.
2. The proposal and the ballots [may] shall be [in
substantially the following form:] submitted as provided in
section 115.706.
[Shall the board of education of the ______ school
district provide transportation at the expense of
the district for pupils living less than one mile
from school and be authorized to levy an
additional tax of ______ cents on the one hundred
dollars assessed valuation to provide funds to pay
for such transportation service?
□ YES □ NO
(If you are in favor of the proposition (or
question), place an X in the box opposite "YES".
If you are opposed to the proposition (or
question), place an X in the box opposite "NO".)]
3. The board of education of any school district may
provide transportation to and from school for any public
school pupil not otherwise eligible for transportation under
the provisions of state law, and may prescribe reasonable
rules and regulations as to eligibility for transportation,
if the parents or guardian of the pupil agree in writing to
pay the actual cost of transporting the pupil. The minimum
charge would be the actual cost of transporting the pupil

SB 1517 134
for ninety school days, which actual cost is to be
determined by the average per-pupil cost of transporting
children in the school district during the preceding school
year. The full actual cost shall be paid by the parent or
guardian of the pupil and shall not be paid out of any state
school aid funds or out of any other revenues of the school
district. The cost of transportation may be paid in
installments, and the board of education shall establish the
cost of the transportation and the time or times and method
of payment.
178.881. 1. The board of trustees of any public
community college district in this state may establish a
community college capital improvement subdistrict by its
order for the sole purpose of capital projects. The
boundaries of any capital improvement subdistrict
established pursuant to this section shall be within the
boundaries of the community college district.
2. In the event a capital improvement subdistrict is
so established, the board of trustees may propose an annual
rate of taxation for the sole purpose of capital projects,
within the limits of sections 178.770 to 178.891, which
proposal shall be submitted to a vote of the people within
the capital improvement subdistrict.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of trustees of ______ (name of
district) be authorized, for the purpose of ______
(name of capital project), to borrow money in the
amount of ______ dollars to be used in the capital
improvement subdistrict of ______ (name of capital
improvement subdistrict) for the purpose of ______

SB 1517 135
(name of capital project) and issue bonds for
payment thereof?
□ YES □ NO]
4. If a majority of the votes cast on the question are
for the tax as submitted, the tax shall be levied and
collected on property within the capital improvement
subdistrict in the same manner as other community college
district taxes. Such funds shall be used for capital
improvements in the community college capital improvement
subdistrict.
5. Where a tax has not been approved by the voters
within a five-year period from the establishment of a
community college capital improvement subdistrict, such
capital improvement subdistrict shall be dissolved by the
board of trustees.
182.010. 1. Whenever voters equal to five percent of
the total vote cast for governor at the last election in any
county, outside of the territory of all cities and towns in
the county which at the time of election as hereinafter
provided maintain and control free public and tax supported
libraries pursuant to other provisions of this chapter,
except as provided in section 182.030, shall petition the
county governing body in writing, asking that a county
library district of the county, outside of the territory of
all the aforesaid cities and towns, be established and be
known as "______ County library district", and asking that
an annual tax be levied for the purpose herein specified,
and specifying in their petition a rate of taxation, then
the county governing body, if it finds the petition was
signed by the requisite number of voters and verified in

SB 1517 136
accordance with the provisions of section 126.040,
pertaining to initiative petitions, shall enter of record a
brief recital of the petition, including a description of
the proposed county library district, and of its finding;
and shall order that the questions of the petition be
submitted to the voters of the proposed county library
district as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706.
The order of the county governing body and the notice shall
specify the name of the county and the rate of taxation
mentioned in the petition.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be established a ______ County
library district?
Shall there be a tax of ______ (insert amount)
on each one hundred dollars assessed valuation
for a county library?]
3. In case the boundary limits of any city or town
hereinabove mentioned are not the same as the boundary
limits of the school district of the city or town, and the
school district embraces territory outside the boundary
limits of the city or town and within the boundary limits of
the proposed county library district, then all voters,
otherwise qualified and residing in the school district, but
outside the limits of the city or town and within the limits
of the proposed county library district, shall be eligible
to vote on the proposition, and may cast a vote thereon at
the designated polling place within the county. The ballots
shall be certified to county governing body as provided in
section 179.020.
4. In case the proposed tax is sought as an increased
tax for the maintenance of a library already established

SB 1517 137
hereunder, over a lesser tax rate theretofore voted and
adopted, then such fact shall be recited in the petition and
the notice of the submission of the question.
5. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a tax increase of ______ (insert
amount) over the present ______ tax for the county
library?]
6. If a majority of all the votes cast on the question
are for the tax as submitted, the tax specified in the
notice shall be levied and collected in the same manner as
other county library taxes as provided in section 182.020,
and shall be known as and become a part of the "County
Library Fund" to be administered as provided in section
182.020.
182.015. 1. In addition to the provisions of section
182.010, the county commission of any county of the state
may establish by its order a county library district without
a petition or submission to the voters as provided in
section 182.010, provided such district conforms otherwise
to the provisions of that section and does not include any
part of a regional library system established pursuant to
other provisions of this chapter. In the event a district
is so established, the county commission shall propose an
annual rate of taxation within the limitations prescribed by
section 182.010, which proposal shall be submitted to a vote
of the people in the same manner as though the district were
formed under the provisions of that section.
2. Where the county library district of any county is
not operating a library within such county, the county
commission may divide the county library district into
subdistricts. In the event the subdistricts are

SB 1517 138
established, the county commission shall propose an annual
rate of taxation, which proposal shall be submitted to a
vote of the people residing in the subdistrict in the same
manner as provided for in section 182.010. If a majority of
the votes cast on the question are for the tax as submitted,
the tax shall be levied and collected on property within the
subdistrict in the same manner as other county library taxes
are levied and collected pursuant to section 182.020. Such
funds shall be used to provide library services in the
subdistrict of the county library district.
3. Where a tax has not been approved by the voters
within a five-year period from the establishment of a
library district, such library district shall be dissolved.
4. (1) The boundaries of any subdistrict established
under this section in any county may be expanded as provided
in this subsection. Whenever not less than ten percent of
registered voters residing in an area in such county
adjacent to an existing subdistrict desire to be annexed
into the subdistrict, such registered voters shall file a
petition with the governing body of the county requesting,
subject to the official approval of the existing county
library board, the expansion of the subdistrict. The
petition shall contain the following information:
(a) The name and residence of each petitioner; and
(b) A specific description of the proposed subdistrict
boundaries, including a map illustrating the boundaries.
(2) Upon the filing of a petition under this
subsection, subject to the official approval of the existing
county library board, the governing body of the county may,
by resolution, approve the expansion of the subdistrict.
Any resolution to expand such subdistrict adopted by the

SB 1517 139
governing body of the county shall contain the following
information:
(a) A description of the proposed boundaries of the
subdistrict;
(b) The time and place of a hearing to be held to
consider expansion of the subdistrict; and
(c) The rate of tax to be imposed in the area of
expansion and voted on within the proposed subdistrict, if
any.
Following the hearing required in this subsection, if the
existing library board approves the expansion, and if the
governing body of the county determines that expansion is in
the best interest of the current subdistrict, then the
governing body may, by order or ordinance, provide for the
expansion of the subdistrict and for any imposition of the
existing subdistrict tax rate within the area of expansion.
The order or ordinance shall not become effective unless the
governing body of the county submits to the voters residing
within the proposed subdistrict, at a [state] general[,
primary, or special] election, a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the county to expand the boundaries of the
subdistrict and, if necessary, to impose the existing
subdistrict tax rate within the area of expansion. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
voters voting thereon and residing in the existing
subdistrict and a majority of the votes cast on the question
by the qualified voters voting thereon and residing in the
area proposed to be annexed into the subdistrict are in
favor of the question, then the expansion of the subdistrict
and the imposition of the tax within the area of expansion
shall become effective on the first day of the second

SB 1517 140
calendar quarter immediately following the vote. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
voters voting thereon in either the existing subdistrict or
in the area proposed to be annexed into the subdistrict are
opposed to the question, then the expansion of the
subdistrict and the imposition of the tax shall not become
effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under
this subsection to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by the required majorities of the qualified voters
voting on the question under this subsection.
(3) The governing body of any county that has expanded
subdistrict boundaries or imposed a tax increase authorized
in this subsection may submit the question of repeal of the
expansion of boundaries and the accompanying imposition of
the tax in the area of expansion to the voters of the
subdistrict on [any date available for elections for the
county] a general election day. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective
on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such
100 repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
101 question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
102 to the repeal, then the expansion of boundaries and the
103 imposition of the tax as authorized in this subsection shall
104 remain effective until the question is resubmitted under
105 this subsection to the qualified voters and the repeal is
106 approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
107 question.
108 (4) Whenever the governing body of any county that has
109 expanded subdistrict boundaries or imposed a tax as
110 authorized in this subsection receives a petition, signed by
111 ten percent of the registered voters of the library

SB 1517 141
112 subdistrict, calling for an election to repeal the expansion
113 of boundaries and the accompanying imposition of the tax in
114 the area of expansion under this subsection, the governing
115 body shall submit to the voters of the subdistrict on a
116 general election day a proposal to repeal the expansion and
117 the accompanying imposition of the tax. If a majority of
118 the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
119 voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall
120 become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
121 year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of
122 the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
123 voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the expansion
124 of boundaries and the imposition of the tax as authorized in
125 this subsection shall remain effective until the question is
126 resubmitted under this subsection to the qualified voters
127 and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified
128 voters voting on the question.
182.020. 1. If, from returns of the submission of the
question, the majority of all the votes cast are in favor of
establishing a county library district and for the tax for a
free county library, the county governing body shall enter
of record a brief recital of the returns and that there has
been established "______ county library district", and
thereafter such "______ county library district", shall be
considered established; and the tax specified in the notice,
subject to the provisions of this section, shall be levied
and collected, from year to year.
2. At least once in every month the county collector
in each county of the first and second classes, including
such counties having a charter form of government, shall pay
over to the treasurer of the county library district all
moneys received and collected by him to which the district

SB 1517 142
is entitled and take duplicate receipts from the treasurer,
one of which he shall file with the secretary of the county
library district and the other he shall file in his
settlement with the county governing body. The county
collector in the counties of the third and fourth classes
shall pay over to the county treasurer at least once in
every month all moneys received and collected by him which
are due the county library district and shall take duplicate
receipts therefor, one of which he shall file in his
settlement with the county governing body. The county
treasurer in such counties shall pay over to the treasurer
of the county library district, at least once in every
month, all moneys so received by him to which the district
is entitled. Upon payment he shall take duplicate receipts
from the treasurer of the county library district, one of
which he shall file with the secretary of the county library
district, and the other he shall file in his settlement with
the county governing body.
3. The tax may be reconsidered whenever the voters of
any county library district shall so determine by a majority
vote on such questions after petition, order, and notice of
the election and of the purpose thereof, first having been
made, filed, and given, as in the case of establishing such
county library district. At least five years must elapse
after the county library district has been established and a
tax therefor has been levied before a question to reconsider
the tax may be submitted under this subsection.
4. Whenever the county library board of trustees finds
it appropriate, it may order an election as provided in
subsection 1 of section 115.706 on the question of
increasing the tax established pursuant to subsection 2 of
section 182.010 or increased pursuant to subsection 5 of

SB 1517 143
section 182.010. Notice of the election shall be published
in the same manner as is notice of an election to establish
a county library district under section 182.010. The notice
and order shall each recite the amount of the proposed
increase. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ per hundred dollars assessed
valuation tax for the county library be
increased to ______ per hundred dollars assessed
valuation?]
If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the increase, then the increased tax shall be levied and
collected in the same manner as the tax was at its previous
lower rate.
5. As used in sections 182.010 to 182.120, the words
"county commission" or "county governing body" shall be
construed to mean the proper commission or official in any
county operating under a special charter.
182.030. Whenever voters equal to five percent of the
total vote cast for governor at the last election in an
existing municipal library district within the geographical
boundaries of a proposed or existing county library district
shall petition in writing the county commission to be
included in the proposed or existing county library
district, subject to the official approval of the existing
county library board, the voters of the municipal library
district shall be permitted to vote on the question for
establishing or joining the county library district, and on
the proposition for a tax levy for establishing and
maintaining a free county library as provided in section
115.706. If the question carries by a majority vote, the

SB 1517 144
municipal library district shall become a part of the county
library district at the beginning of the next fiscal year
and the property within the municipal library district shall
be liable to taxes levied for free county library purposes.
If a majority of voters in the existing municipal library
district oppose the county library district, the existing
municipal library district shall continue.
182.100. 1. Whenever, in any county library district
which has decided or shall hereafter decide to establish and
maintain a free county library under the provisions of
sections 182.010 to 182.120, the county library board of
trustees, by written resolution entered of record, deems it
necessary that free county library buildings be erected in
the county and voters equal to five percent of the total
vote cast for governor at the last election of any county
library district shall petition the county governing body in
writing asking that an annual tax be levied at and as an
increased rate of taxation for the library buildings and
specify in their petition a rate of taxation annually, and
not to be levied for more than ten years, on all taxable
property in such county library district, then the county
governing body, if it finds the petition was signed by the
requisite number of voters, shall enter of record a brief
recital of the petition, and of its finding, and shall order
that the question of the petition be submitted to the voters
of the county library district [at an election] as provided
in subsection 1 of section 115.706. The order and the
notice shall specify the rate of taxation mentioned in the
petition.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.

SB 1517 145
[Shall there be a tax of ______ (insert amount)
on each one hundred dollars assessed valuation
for the erection of a free county library
building?]
3. If the majority of the voters of the county library
district voting on the question vote in favor of the tax,
the tax specified in the notice shall be levied and
collected in like manner with other taxes of the county
library district, and shall be known as the "County Library
Building Fund", and shall be subject to the exclusive
control of the county library board of trustees. At least
once in every month the county collector in all counties of
the first and second classes, including such counties having
a charter form of government, shall pay over to the
treasurer of the county library district all money received
and collected by him for the fund and take duplicate
receipts from the treasurer, one of which he shall file with
the secretary of the county library district and the other
he shall file in his settlement with the county governing
body. The county collector in counties of the third and
fourth classes shall pay over to the county treasurer, at
least once in every month, all moneys received and collected
by him for the county library building fund and shall take
duplicate receipts therefor, one of which he shall file in
his settlement with the county governing body. The county
treasurer in such county shall pay over to the treasurer of
the county library district, at least once in every month,
all moneys so received by him for the fund; upon payment he
shall take duplicate receipts from the treasurer of the
county library district, one of which he shall file with the
secretary of the district, and the other he shall file in
the settlement with the county governing body. This fund

SB 1517 146
shall be used for expenses incident to the erection and
furnishing of the library building. The tax hereby provided
for the erection of free county library buildings in such
county shall be in addition to the tax levied for the
establishment and maintenance of such county library.
182.140. 1. Whenever voters equal to five percent of
the total vote cast for governor at the last election in any
city petition the mayor, common council or other proper
governing body in writing asking that an annual tax be
levied for the establishment and maintenance of a free
public library in the city, and specify in their petition a
rate of taxation on all the taxable property in the city,
the governing body shall direct that the question be
submitted to the voters of the city [at an election] as
provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706. The order of
the governing body and the notice shall specify the name of
the city and the rate of taxation mentioned in the petition.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a tax of ______ (insert amount)
on each one hundred dollars assessed valuation
for a public library?]
3. If, from returns of the election, the majority of
all the votes cast on the question are in favor of the tax,
the governing body shall enter of record a brief recital of
the returns and that there has been established a public
library and thereafter the free public library shall be
established, and shall be a body corporate, and known as
such.
4. The tax specified in the notice, subject to the
provisions of this section, shall be levied and collected,
from year to year, in like manner with other general taxes

SB 1517 147
of the city. The proceeds of the levy, together with all
interest accruing on same, with library fines, collections,
bequests and donations in money, shall be deposited in the
city library fund. At least once in every month the proper
city finance officer shall pay over to the treasurer of the
library district all moneys received and collected for the
city library fund, including interest on such moneys, and
shall take duplicate receipts from the treasurer, one of
which he shall file with the secretary of the library
district and the other of which he shall file in his
settlement with the city governing body.
5. In case the proposed tax is sought as an increased
tax for the maintenance of a free public library already
established over a lesser tax rate theretofore voted and
adopted, then such fact shall be recited in the petition and
the notice of the election or whenever the city library
board of trustees finds it appropriate it may order an
election as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706 on
the question of increasing the tax established pursuant to
this section. Notice of the election shall be published in
the same manner as is notice of an election to establish a
city library district under this section. The notice and
order shall each recite the amount of the proposed increase.
6. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a tax increase of ______ (insert
amount) over the present ______ tax for the public
library?]
7. If a majority of all the votes cast on the question
is for the tax submitted, the tax specified in the notice
shall be levied and collected in like manner with other
general taxes of the city, and shall be known as and become

SB 1517 148
a part of the "City Library Fund" and be administered as
provided in section 182.200.
8. The tax may be reconsidered whenever the voters of
the city determine by a majority vote given at an election.
9. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
chapter to the contrary, any city may establish, operate and
maintain a free public library in accordance with the
provisions of this section if the city is located within the
boundaries of a county library district that has been
established, but has not levied and collected a library tax
pursuant to section 182.020 within a year of when the county
library district was first established.
10. The authority granted by this section shall be in
addition to those powers granted in section 94.400.
182.650. 1. Whenever a consolidated public library
district has been created it may levy a tax at a rate of not
less than twenty cents on the one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation of all taxable property in the districts
to be served by the consolidated public library district;
except that, any increase in the rate of taxation to be
assessed shall, on resolution adopted by the board of
trustees of the consolidated public library district, be
submitted to the county commission or county executive
officers of the counties included within the district, to be
submitted to the voters of the respective counties for
approval.
2. The county commissions or county executive
officers, after receipt of the resolution pursuant to the
provisions of this section, shall order that the proposed
increase in the rate of taxation be submitted to the voters
of the consolidated public library district [at an election]
as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706. The order

SB 1517 149
of the commission and the notice shall specify the name of
the county and the rate of taxation mentioned in the
petition.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent tax increase over
the ______ cent tax per hundred dollars assessed
valuation for the ______ consolidated public
library district?]
4. If a majority of all the votes cast on the question
shall be for the tax increase as submitted, the increased
tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in
like manner with other county taxes and shall be paid and
forwarded to the treasurer of the board of trustees of the
consolidated public library district by the county collector.
5. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
shall be against the tax rate as submitted, then the tax
rate shall remain at the previously existing levy.
6. Whenever in any consolidated public library
district which has decided to establish and maintain a free
library in any district served under the provisions of
sections 182.610 to 182.670, the consolidated public library
district board of trustees, by written resolution entered of
record, deems it necessary that free library buildings be
erected in the district, it shall notify the county
commission or chief executive in writing asking that an
annual tax be levied at and as an increased rate of taxation
for the library buildings and specify in its resolution an
additional rate of taxation of ______ cents on the hundred
dollars annually, and not to be levied for more than ten
years on all taxable property in such consolidated public
library district, then the county commission or county

SB 1517 150
executive officer shall enter of record a brief recital of
the resolution and shall order that the question be
submitted to the voters of the consolidated public library
district as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706.
The order of the commission or county executive officer and
notice shall specify the rate of taxation mentioned in the
resolution.
7. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent tax for erection of
library buildings?]
8. If the majority of the voters of the county library
district voting on the question vote in favor of the tax,
the tax specified in the notice shall be levied and
collected in like manner with other taxes of the county, and
delivered to the treasurer of the board of trustees of the
consolidated public library district, and shall be subject
to the exclusive control of the consolidated public library
district board of trustees, and the fund shall be disbursed
by the consolidated public library district treasurer only
upon proper instrument of payment of the board, and be used
for expenses incident to the erection and furnishing of the
library buildings. The levy herein providing for the
erection of library buildings shall be in addition to the
tax levied for the establishment and maintenance of the
consolidated public library district.
182.655. 1. The board of trustees of the consolidated
public library district may provide for the purchase of
ground and for the erection of public library buildings, and
for the improvement of existing buildings, and for the
furnishing of said buildings and may provide for the payment

SB 1517 151
of the same by the issue of bonds or otherwise, subject to
the conditions and limitations set forth in this section.
2. No bonds shall be issued in an amount in excess of
the constitutional limitations of the value of taxable,
tangible property in the consolidated public library
district, as shown by the last completed assessment for
state and county purposes, nor shall such indebtedness be
incurred unless it has been approved by the vote of the
constitutionally required percentage of the voters of the
consolidated public library district voting on the question
[at a municipal election] as provided in subsection 1 of
section 115.706. The ballot for approval shall state in
boldfaced type the tax rate necessary to retire the bonds as
nearly accurate as may be and shall be submitted as provided
in section 115.706.
3. The boards of trustees shall provide for the
collection of an annual tax on all taxable, tangible
property in the consolidated public library district
sufficient to pay the interest and principal of the
indebtedness as they shall fall due and to retire the same
within twenty years from the date contracted.
4. If, upon the returns from the election, which shall
be certified to the board of trustees of the district, it
appears that the question to incur indebtedness has been
assented to by the constitutionally required percentage of
the voters voting on the question, the board of trustees
shall enter of record a brief recital of the returns and
shall declare that the consolidated public library district
board of trustees may issue bonds of the consolidated public
library district in a total amount not in excess of that
authorized by the voters. The board shall offer such bonds
at public sale and shall provide such method as it may deem

SB 1517 152
necessary for the advertisement of the sale of each issue of
said bonds before the same are sold. The bonds shall be
issued, payable to bearer and in denominations of not less
than one hundred dollars, or some multiple thereof, payable
in not more than twenty years from the date they bear,
bearing interest from date at a rate not exceeding the rate
allowable by law, payable semiannually, and with interest
coupons attached to conform to the face thereof. All bonds
shall be signed by the president of the board of trustees,
attested by the signature of the treasurer, and each bond
shall have impressed thereon the corporate seal of the
consolidated public library district.
182.715. 1. Whenever an urban public library district
is created pursuant to section 182.703, the vote for
creation of the urban public library district shall provide
that any levy for library purposes established pursuant to
section 137.030 shall be transferred to the urban public
library district and such urban public library district
shall be authorized to levy a tax at this established levy
rate. Any increase above this levy rate shall, on
resolution adopted by the board of trustees of the urban
public library district, be submitted to the voters of the
urban public library district for approval, in accordance
with the provisions of section 137.030 and in compliance
with section 115.706.
2. If a majority of all the votes cast on the question
shall be for the tax increase as submitted, the increased
tax specified in the notice shall be levied and collected in
like manner with other county taxes and shall be paid and
forwarded to the treasurer of the board of trustees of an
urban public library district by the county collector.

SB 1517 153
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
shall be against the tax rate as submitted, then the tax
rate shall remain at the previously existing levy.
4. Whenever in any urban public library district which
has decided to establish and maintain a free library in any
district served under the provisions of sections 182.701 to
182.723, the urban public library district board of
trustees, by written resolution entered of record, deems it
necessary that free library buildings be erected in the
district it shall notify the appropriate election
authorities that the question should be submitted to the
voters of the urban public library district. The resolution
and the notice shall specify the rate of taxation necessary.
5. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be a ______ cent tax for erection
of library buildings?]
6. If the majority of the voters of the urban public
library district voting on the question vote in favor of the
tax, the tax specified in the notice shall be levied and
collected in like manner with other taxes of the district,
and delivered to the treasurer of the board of trustees of
the urban public library district, and shall be subject to
the exclusive control of the urban public library district
board of trustees and the fund shall be disbursed by the
urban public library district treasurer only upon proper
instrument of payment of the board of trustees, and be used
for expenses incident to the erection and furnishing of the
library buildings. The levy herein providing for the
erection of library buildings shall be in addition to the
tax levied for the establishment and maintenance of the
urban public library district.

SB 1517 154
182.717. 1. The board of trustees of an urban public
library district may provide for the purchase of ground and
for the erection of public library buildings, and for the
improvement of existing buildings, and for the furnishing of
the buildings and may provide for the payment of the same by
the issue of bonds or otherwise, subject to the conditions
and limitations set forth in this section.
2. No bonds of the public library district shall be
issued in an amount in excess of the constitutional
limitations of the value of taxable, tangible property in an
urban public library district, as shown by the last
completed assessment for state and county purposes, nor
shall such indebtedness be incurred unless it has been
approved by the vote of the constitutionally required
percentage of the voters of an urban public library district
voting on the question [at an election] as provided in
subsection 1 of section 115.706. The ballot for approval
shall state in boldfaced type the tax rate necessary to
retire the bonds as nearly accurate as may be and shall be
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
3. The board of trustees shall provide for the
collection of an annual tax on all taxable, tangible
property in an urban public library district sufficient to
pay the interest and principal of the indebtedness as they
shall fall due and to retire the same within twenty years
from the date contracted.
4. If, upon the returns from the election, which shall
be certified to the board of trustees, it appears that the
question to incur indebtedness has been assented to by the
constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting on
the question, the board of trustees shall enter of record a
brief recital of the returns and shall declare that the

SB 1517 155
urban public library district board of trustees may issue
bonds of the urban public library district in a total amount
not in excess of that authorized by the voters. The board
of trustees shall offer such bonds at public sale and shall
provide such method as it may deem necessary for the
advertisement of the sale of each issue of said bonds before
the same are sold. The bonds shall be issued, payable to
bearer and in denominations of not less than one hundred
dollars, or some multiple thereof, payable in not more than
twenty years from the date they bear, bearing interest from
date at a rate not exceeding the rate allowable by law,
payable semiannually, and with interest coupons attached to
conform to the fact thereof. All bonds shall be signed by
the president of the board of trustees, attested by the
signature of the treasurer, and each bond shall have
impressed thereon the corporate seal of the urban public
library district.
184.350. 1. Whenever qualified voters representing
five percent of the votes cast at the last preceding
election for governor in any constitutional charter city not
located within a county and qualified voters representing
five percent of the votes cast at the last preceding
election for governor in a constitutional charter county
adjoining such city shall file verified petitions for the
establishment of a metropolitan zoological park and museum
district, comprising a zoological subdistrict, and art
museum subdistrict or a St. Louis Science Center subdistrict
with the respective election officials of such city and
county, respectively, requesting such election officials to
submit a proposition for the establishment of a metropolitan
zoological park and museum district comprised of a
zoological subdistrict, and art museum subdistrict and a St.

SB 1517 156
Louis Science Center subdistrict at the next general or
primary election for the election of state officers or
special election for the submission of such proposition,
such election officials shall communicate to their
corresponding counterparts and the chief executive officers
of the respective city and county the fact a verified
petition has been filed. At such time that both election
officials have received the verified petitions described
above, then such officials shall submit the above described
proposition or propositions to the qualified voters of such
city and county [at the next general or primary election for
the election of state officers or special election] as
provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706. Such election
officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior
to such general or primary election or special election in
at least two newspapers that such proposition or
propositions shall be submitted at the next general or
primary election or special election held for submission of
this proposition.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters
in substantially the following form at such election:] as
provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706.
[Shall there be established a Metropolitan
Zoological Park and Museum District comprising the
City of ______ and the County of ______ which
district shall consist of all or any one of the
following subdistricts:
a. Zoological Subdistrict with a tax rate not in
excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed
valuation of all taxable property within the
district.

SB 1517 157
□ FOR □ AGAINST
b. Art Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not in
excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed
valuation of taxable property within the district.
□ FOR □ AGAINST
c. St. Louis Science Center Subdistrict with a
tax rate not in excess of one cent on each $100 of
assessed valuation of taxable property within the
district.
□ FOR □ AGAINST]
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
on such propositions in such city and the majority of voters
voting on such propositions in such county at said election
cast votes "FOR" one or more of the propositions, then the
district shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
established by the board, for such subdistrict shall be
deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
year following the year of said election. The results of
the aforesaid election shall be certified by the election
officials of such city and county, respectively, to the
respective chief executive officers of such city and county
not less than thirty days after the day of election. In the
event one or more of the propositions shall fail to receive
a majority of the votes "FOR" in either the city or the
county, then such proposition shall not be resubmitted at
any election held within one year of the date of the
election the proposition was rejected. Any such
resubmissions of one or more of such propositions shall
substantially comply with the provisions of sections 184.350
to 184.384.

SB 1517 158
4. All costs of the election shall be paid as provided
by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
184.351. 1. The board of directors of any
metropolitan zoological park and museum district, as
established pursuant to the provisions of sections 184.350
to 184.384, on behalf of the district may request the
election officials of any city and county containing all or
part of such district to submit a proposition to increase
the maximum tax rate for the St. Louis Science Center
subdistrict set in section 184.350, to the qualified voters
of such district at any general [or primary or special]
election. Such election officials shall give legal notice
as provided in chapter 115.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters
in substantially the following form at such election:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Zoological Park and Museum District of
the City of ______ and County of ______ be
authorized to increase the St. Louis Science
Center Subdistrict to a tax rate not in excess of
six cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of
taxable property within the district for the
purpose of operating, maintaining and otherwise
financially supporting the subdistrict? The tax
rate shall be set annually by the board based on
the budget submitted by the St. Louis Science
Center and approved by the board. This rate shall
replace the present tax rate of ______ cent for
the St. Louis Science Center Subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO]
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
on such proposition in such city and the majority of voters

SB 1517 159
voting on such proposition in such county at such election
cast votes "YES" for the proposition, then the tax rate for
such subdistrict shall be deemed in full force and effect as
of the first day of the second month following the
election. The results of the aforesaid election shall be
certified by the election officials of such city and county,
respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of
such city and county not less than thirty days after the day
on which such election was held. All costs of the election
shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a
majority of the votes "YES" in either the city or the
county, then such proposition shall not be resubmitted at
any election held within one year of the date of the
election at which such proposition was rejected.
184.353. 1. (1) The board of directors of any
metropolitan zoological park and museum district, as
established according to the provisions of sections 184.350
to 184.384, on behalf of the district may request the
election officials of any city and county containing all or
part of such district to submit the following described
proposition to the qualified voters of such district [at any
general, primary or special election] as provided in
subsection 1 of section 115.706. Such election officials
shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such
[general, primary or special] election in at least two
newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted [at any
general, primary or special election held for submission of
the proposition] as provided in section 115.706.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters
in substantially the following form at such election:] as
provided in section 115.706.

SB 1517 160
Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum
District of the City of ______ and County of ______
be authorized to provide for a Botanical Garden
Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the
Botanical Garden Subdistrict with a tax rate not in
excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed
valuation of taxable property within the district?
□ YES □ NO
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
votes on the proposition, then the botanical garden
subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
second month following the election. The results of the
election shall be certified by the election officials of
such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief
executive officers of such city and county not less than
thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the
election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive
a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the
county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted [at
any election held prior to] until the next general [or
primary] election [in such city or county in the following
year]. Any such resubmission shall subsequently comply with
the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
(4) If the botanical garden subdistrict shall be
established, then its commissioners, or any person with whom
its commissioners contract, may establish and charge fees

SB 1517 161
for admission to the premises of the botanical garden
subdistrict, or to the premises of any person with whom its
commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults
and fifty cents for children under sixteen years of age.
Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to
implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of
the metropolitan zoological park and museum district of
which the botanical garden subdistrict is a member.
2. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan
zoological park and museum district, as established
according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384,
on behalf of the district may request the election officials
of any city and county containing all or part of such
district to submit the following described proposition to
the qualified voters of such district [at any general,
primary or special election] as provided in subsection 1 of
section 115.706. Such election officials shall give legal
notice at least sixty days prior to such [general, primary
or special] election in at least two newspapers that such
proposition shall be submitted [at any general, primary or
special election held for submission of the proposition] as
provided in section 115.706.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters
in substantially the following form at such election:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum
District of the City of ______ and County of ______
be authorized to provide for a Transport Museum
Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the
Transport Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not in
excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed
valuation of taxable property within the district?

SB 1517 162
□ YES □ NO]
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
votes on the proposition, then the transport museum
subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
second month following the election. The results of the
election shall be certified by the election officials of
such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief
executive officers of such city and county not less than
thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the
election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive
a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the
county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted [at
any election held prior to] until the next general [or
primary] election [in such city or county in the following
100 year]. Any such resubmission shall subsequently comply with
101 the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
102 (4) If the transport museum subdistrict shall be
103 established, then its commissioners, or any person with whom
104 its commissioners contract, may establish and charge fees
105 for admission to the premises of the transport museum
106 subdistrict, or to the premises of any person with whom its
107 commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults
108 and fifty cents for children under sixteen years of age.
109 Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to
110 implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of

SB 1517 163
111 the metropolitan zoological park and museum district of
112 which the transport museum subdistrict is a member.
113 3. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan
114 zoological park and museum district, as established
115 according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384,
116 on behalf of the district may request the election officials
117 of any city and county containing all or part of such
118 district to submit the following described proposition to
119 the qualified voters of such district [at any general,
120 primary or special election] as provided in subsection 1 of
121 section 115.706. Such election officials shall give legal
122 notice at least sixty days prior to such [general, primary
123 or special] election in at least two newspapers that such
124 proposition shall be submitted [at any general, primary or
125 special election held for submission of the proposition] as
126 provided in section 115.706.
127 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters
128 in substantially the following form at such election:] as
129 provided in section 115.706.
130 [Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum
131 District of the City of ______ and the County of
132 ______ be authorized to provide for a Missouri
133 History Museum Subdistrict and be authorized to
134 provide the Missouri History Museum Subdistrict
135 with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on
136 each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable
137 property within the district?
138 □ YES □ NO]
139 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
140 voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
141 voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"

SB 1517 164
142 votes on the proposition, then the Missouri history museum
143 subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
144 established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
145 deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
146 second month following the election. The results of the
147 election shall be certified by the election officials of
148 such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief
149 executive officers of such city and county not less than
150 thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the
151 election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
152 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive
153 a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the
154 county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted [at
155 any election held prior to] until the next general [or
156 primary or special] election [in such city or county in the
157 following year]. Any such resubmission shall subsequently
158 comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
159 4. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan
160 zoological park and museum district, as established
161 according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.354,
162 on behalf of the district may request the election officials
163 of any city and county containing all or part of such
164 district to submit the following described proposition to
165 the qualified voters of such district [at any general,
166 primary or special election] as provided in subsection 1 of
167 section 115.706. Such election officials shall give legal
168 notice at least sixty days prior to such [general, primary
169 or special] election in at least two newspapers that such
170 proposition shall be submitted [at any general, primary or
171 special election held for submission of the proposition] as
172 provided in section 115.706.

SB 1517 165
173 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters
174 in substantially the following form at such election:] as
175 provided in section 115.706.
176 [Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum
177 District of the City of ______ and County of ______
178 be authorized to provide for a Symphony Orchestra
179 Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the
180 Symphony Orchestra Subdistrict with a tax rate not
181 in excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed
182 valuation of taxable property within the district?
183 □ YES □ NO]
184 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
185 voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
186 voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
187 votes on the proposition, then the symphony orchestra
188 subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
189 established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
190 deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
191 second month following the election. The results of the
192 election shall be certified by the election officials of
193 such city and county not less than thirty days after the day
194 of election. The cost of the election shall be paid as
195 provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the
196 proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES"
197 votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition
198 shall not be resubmitted [at any election held prior to]
199 until the next general [or primary in such city or county in
200 the following year] election. Any such resubmission shall
201 subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350
202 to 184.384.

SB 1517 166
203 (4) If the symphony orchestra subdistrict shall be
204 established, then its commissioners, or any person with whom
205 its commissioners contract, may charge such prices from time
206 to time for tickets for performances conducted under the
207 auspices of the subdistrict or as they or such person deem
208 proper; provided, however, that no fewer than fifty tickets
209 for each such performance conducted at the principal concert
210 hall of such subdistrict or such person shall be made
211 available without charge for distribution to members of the
212 general public and no fewer than fifty tickets shall be made
213 available without charge for distribution to students in
214 public and private elementary, secondary schools and
215 colleges and universities in the metropolitan zoological
216 park and museum district and all performances of the
217 symphony orchestra conducted at the principal concert hall
218 of the symphony orchestra within the district shall be
219 offered for broadcast live on a public or commercial AM or
220 FM radio station located in and generally receivable in the
221 district or on a public or commercial broadcast television
222 station located in or generally receivable in the district.
223 The symphony orchestra subdistrict shall institute a fully
224 staffed educational music appreciation program to benefit
225 all of the citizens of the taxing district at a nominal
226 charge.
227 (5) Immediately following the effective date of the
228 symphony orchestra subdistrict tax rate any person receiving
229 funds from said tax rate shall become ineligible for program
230 assistance funding from the Missouri state council on the
231 arts.
232 5. The board of directors of any metropolitan
233 zoological park and museum district, as established
234 according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384,

SB 1517 167
235 on behalf of the district may request the election officials
236 of any city and county containing all or part of such
237 district to submit the following described proposition to
238 the qualified voters of such district [at any general,
239 primary or special election] as provided in subsection 1 of
240 section 115.706. Such election officials shall give legal
241 notice at least sixty days prior to such [general, primary
242 or special] election in at least two newspapers that such
243 proposition shall be submitted [at any general, primary or
244 special election held for submission of the proposition] as
245 provided in section 115.706. Such proposition shall be
246 submitted [to the voters in substantially the following form
247 at such election:] as provided in section 115.706.
248 [Shall a Recreational and Amateur Sports
249 Subdistrict be authorized and provided for by the
250 Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District
251 of the City of ______ and the County of ______ and
252 such subdistrict be authorized to establish a tax
253 rate not in excess of four cents on each $100 of
254 assessed valuation of taxable property within the
255 district for a period not to exceed nine years?
256 □ YES □ NO]
257 In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on
258 such proposition in such city and a majority of voters
259 voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes
260 on the proposition, then the recreation and amateur sports
261 subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
262 established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
263 deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
264 second month following the election for a period not to
265 exceed nine years. The results of the election shall be

SB 1517 168
266 certified by the election officials of such city and county,
267 respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of
268 such city and county not less than thirty days after the day
269 of the election. The cost of the election shall be paid as
270 provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the
271 proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES"
272 votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition
273 shall not be resubmitted [at any election held prior to]
274 until the next general [or primary or special] election [in
275 such city or county in the following year]. Any such
276 resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions
277 of sections 184.350 to 184.384.
278 6. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan
279 zoological park and museum district, as established
280 according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384,
281 on behalf of the district may request the election officials
282 of any city and county containing all or part of such
283 district to submit the following described proposition to
284 the qualified voters of such district [at any general,
285 primary or special election] as provided in subsection 1 of
286 section 115.706. Such election officials shall give legal
287 notice at least sixty days prior to such [general, primary
288 or special] election in at least two newspapers that such
289 proposition shall be submitted [at any general, primary or
290 special election held for submission of the proposition] as
291 provided in section 115.706.
292 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters
293 in substantially the following form at such election:] as
294 provided in section 115.706.
295 [Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum
296 District of the City of ______ and County of ______

SB 1517 169
297 be authorized to provide for an African-American
298 History Museum and Cultural Subdistrict and be
299 authorized to provide the African-American history
300 museum and cultural subdistrict with a tax rate not
301 in excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed
302 valuation of taxable property within the district?
303 □ YES □ NO]
304 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
305 voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
306 voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
307 votes on the proposition, then the African-American history
308 museum and cultural subdistrict shall be deemed established
309 and the tax rate, as established by the board for such
310 subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and effect as of
311 the first day of the second month following the election.
312 The results of the election shall be certified by the
313 election officials of such city and county, respectively, to
314 the respective chief executive officers of such city and
315 county not less than thirty days after the day of the
316 election. The cost of the election shall be paid as
317 provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the
318 proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES"
319 votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition
320 shall not be resubmitted [at any election held prior to]
321 until the next general [or primary] election [in such city
322 or county in the following year]. Any such resubmission
323 shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections
324 184.350 to 184.384.
325 (4) If the African-American history museum and
326 cultural subdistrict shall be established, then its
327 commissioners, or any person with whom its commissioners

SB 1517 170
328 contract, may establish and charge fees for admission to the
329 premises of the African-American history museum and cultural
330 subdistrict, or to the premises of any person with whom its
331 commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults
332 and fifty cents for children under sixteen years of age.
333 Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to
334 implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of
335 the metropolitan zoological park and museum district of
336 which the African-American history museum and cultural
337 subdistrict is a member.
184.357. 1. The board of directors of any
metropolitan zoological park and museum district as
established pursuant to the provisions of sections 184.350
to 184.384, on behalf of the district, may request the
election officials of any city and county of such district
to submit a proposition or propositions to increase the tax
rate for the zoological park subdistrict and the art museum
subdistrict set in section 184.350 and to increase the rate
for the botanical garden subdistrict set in section 184.353
to the qualified voters of such district at any general[,
primary or special] election. Such election officials, upon
receipt of such request in the form of a verified resolution
or resolutions approved by the majority of the members of
such district board of directors, shall set the date of such
election and give notice of such election as provided by
sections 115.063 [and], 115.065, and 115.706.
2. Such proposition or propositions shall be jointly
or severally submitted [to the voters in substantially the
following form at such election:] as provided in section
115.706.

SB 1517 171
[(1) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and County of
______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for
the zoological park subdistrict up to the maximum
tax rate of eight cents, or any percent thereof, on
each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property
within the district for the purpose of operating,
maintaining and otherwise financially supporting
the subdistrict? The tax rate shall be set annually
by the board based on the budget submitted by the
zoological park subdistrict and approved by the
board. This tax rate shall replace the present tax
rate of ______ cents for the zoological park
subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
(2) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and County of
______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for
the art museum subdistrict up to the maximum tax
rate of eight cents, or any percent thereof, on
each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property
within the district for the purpose of operating,
maintaining and otherwise financially supporting
the subdistrict and approved by the board? The tax
rate shall be set annually by the board based on
the budget submitted by the art museum subdistrict
and approved by the board. This tax rate shall
replace the present tax rate of ______ cents for
the art museum subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
(3) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and County of
______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for
the botanical garden subdistrict up to the maximum
tax rate of six cents, or any percent thereof, on
each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property
within the district for the purpose of operating,

SB 1517 172
maintaining and otherwise financially supporting
the subdistrict and approved by the board? The tax
rate shall be set annually by the board based on
the budget submitted by the botanical garden
subdistrict and approved by the board. This tax
rate shall replace the present tax rate of ______
cents for the botanical garden subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
(4) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and County of
______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for
the Missouri history museum subdistrict up to the
maximum tax rate of six cents, or any percent
thereof, on each $100 of assessed valuation of
taxable property within the district for the
purpose of operating, maintaining, and otherwise
financially supporting the subdistrict and approved
by the board? The tax rate shall be set annually by
the board based on the budget submitted by the
Missouri history museum subdistrict and approved by
the board. This tax rate shall replace the present
tax rate of ______ cents for the Missouri history
museum subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO]
In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such
proposition or propositions in such city and the majority of
the voters voting on such proposition or propositions in
such county cast votes "YES" on the proposition or
propositions, then the tax rate for such subdistrict shall
be deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of
the second month following the election. The results of the
aforesaid election shall be certified by the election
officials of such city and county, respectively, to the

SB 1517 173
respective chief executive officers of such city and county
not less than thirty days after the day on which such
election was held. The cost of the election shall be paid
as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event
the proposition or propositions shall fail to receive a
majority of the votes "YES" in either the city or the
county, then the proposition or propositions shall not be
resubmitted [at any election held within one year of the
date of the election the proposition or propositions were
100 rejected] until the next general election.
184.359. 1. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of
chapter 137, the board of directors of any metropolitan
zoological park and museum district, as established
according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.384,
on behalf of such district, may request the election
officials of any city and county containing all or part of
such district to submit to the qualified voters of such
district at any [municipal, special, primary or] general
election [or elections] a referendum or referendums to
permit or restore, in part, or, in whole, the tax rate or
rates authorized for any subdistrict of such district from
time to time under the provisions of sections 184.350 to
184.384.
2. Such proposal or proposals shall be submitted to
the voters [in substantially the following form at such
election or elections:] submitted as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum
District of the City of ______ and the County of
______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for
the ______ Subdistrict to ______ cents on each
$100 of assessed valuation of taxable property

SB 1517 174
within the District? This tax rate shall replace
the present tax rate of ______ for the ______
Subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO]
3. The proposed tax rate shall not exceed the maximum
tax rate authorized by the voters from time to time pursuant
to sections 184.350 to 184.384, prior to reduction or
reductions in such rate following any reassessment pursuant
to chapter 137.
4. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
thereon in such city and a majority of the voters voting
thereon in such county cast votes in favor of the proposal
or proposals, then the tax rate or rates for such
subdistrict or subdistricts shall be deemed in full force
and effect as of the first day of the second month following
the election. The results of the election shall be
certified by the election officials of such city and county,
respectively, to such district not less than thirty days
after the day of the election. The cost of the election
shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
In the event any proposal shall fail to receive a majority
of the "YES" votes in either the city or the county, then
such proposal shall not be resubmitted [at any election held
within one year of the date of the election on which such
proposal was rejected] until the next general election.
5. Such proposal or proposals to the qualified voters
of the district may be submitted by a verified resolution of
the district board of directors to the respective election
officials of the city and county wherein the district is
located.

SB 1517 175
184.600. 1. A metropolitan zoo district may be
established in any city with a population of one hundred
thousand or more inhabitants located within a first class
county which does not adjoin any other first class county,
after voter approval pursuant to this section. A zoo
district shall consist of such institutions and places for
the collection and exhibition of animals and animal life,
for the instruction and recreation of the people, for the
promotion of zoology and kindred subjects, for the
encouragement of zoological study and research and for the
increase of public interest in wild animals and in the
protection of wild animal life. The boundaries of any such
metropolitan zoo district shall be the corporate boundaries
of the city, any lands annexed into the city after the
establishment of the district and areas adjacent to the city
which petition and vote to become part of the district
pursuant to section 184.602. The question shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the city [at a local or
state general, primary or special election] as provided in
subsection 1 of section 115.706 upon the petition of five
percent of the qualified voters of the city as determined on
the basis of the number of votes cast in the city for
governor at the last election held prior to the filing of
the petition[, except that such election shall not be held
prior to 1992]. The election officials shall give legal
notice at least sixty days prior to such [general or primary
election or special] election in at least one newspaper of
general circulation within the city that such proposition
shall be submitted [at the next general or primary election
or special election held for submission of this proposition]
as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706. A
municipality shall include in the ballot a provision for a

SB 1517 176
tax to support the district in an amount not to exceed ten
cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation of all
taxable property within the district.
2. Citizens living in a first class county in an area
adjacent to and within two miles of a city that has formed
or has called an election to form a metropolitan zoo may
petition the county commission where the city is located to
become part of the metropolitan zoo district by filing with
the county commission a petition containing a description of
the area to be included in the district and the signatures
of five percent of the qualified voters of the area as
determined by the county clerk on the basis of the number of
votes cast in the area for governor at the last election
held prior to the filing of the petition. The question
shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the area [at a
local or state general, primary or special election] as
provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706 upon the
certification by the county clerk that the petition contains
the signatures of the required number of qualified voters.
The election officials shall give legal notice at least
sixty days prior to such [general or primary election or
special] election in at least one newspaper of general
circulation within the county that such proposition shall be
submitted [at the next general or primary election or
special election held for submission of this proposition] as
provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706. The commission
shall include in the ballot as requested in the petition a
provision for a tax to support the district at the rate of
tax which residents of the city are required to pay to
support the district.
3. If the election is held in the city such
proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in

SB 1517 177
substantially the following form at such election:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be established a Metropolitan Zoo
District comprising the City of ______ with a tax
rate not to exceed ______ cents on each one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation of all
taxable property within the district?
□ FOR □ AGAINST]
4. If the election is held in an area outside the city
such proposition shall be submitted [to the voters in
substantially the following form at such election:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the area be part of a Metropolitan Zoo
District with the City of ______ with a tax rate
not to exceed ______ cents on each one hundred
dollars of assessed valuation of all taxable
property within the area?
□ FOR □ AGAINST]
5. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
on such proposition in the city at such election cast votes
"FOR" the proposition, then the district shall be
established and the tax rate shall be in full force and
effect as of the first day of the year following the year of
the election. The results of the election shall be
certified by the election officials of the city not less
than thirty days after the day of election. In the event
the proposition fails to receive a majority of the votes
"FOR" in the city, then such proposition shall not be
resubmitted [at any election held within one year of the

SB 1517 178
date of the election the proposition was rejected] until the
next general election.
6. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
on such proposition in an area outside the city at such
election cast votes "FOR" the proposition, then the area
shall be part of the metropolitan zoo district as of the
100 first day of the year following the year of the election
101 provided the voters in the city have voted to form such a
102 district. The results of the election shall be certified by
103 the election official of the county not less than thirty
104 days after the election. In the event the proposition fails
105 to receive a majority of the votes "FOR" in the area outside
106 the city, then such proposition shall not be resubmitted [at
107 any election held within one year of the date of the
108 election the proposition was rejected] until the next
109 general election.
184.604. 1. The board of directors of any
metropolitan zoo district, as established pursuant to the
provisions of section 184.600, on behalf of the district may
request the election officials of the city to submit a
proposition to increase the maximum tax rate for the
district set in section 184.600, to the qualified voters of
such district at any general [or primary or special]
election. Such election officials shall give legal notice
as provided in chapter 115.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters
[in substantially the following form at such election:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the Metropolitan Zoo District of the City
of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate
to an amount not to exceed ______ cents on each
one hundred dollars of assessed valuation of

SB 1517 179
taxable property within the district for the
purpose of operating, maintaining and otherwise
financially supporting the district? This rate
shall replace the present tax rate of ______ cents
for the Metropolitan Zoo District.
□ YES □ NO]
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
on such proposition in the district at such election cast
votes "YES" for the proposition, then the new tax rate for
the district shall be in full force and effect as of the
first day of the year following the election. The results
of the election shall be certified by the election officials
of the city not less than thirty days after the day on which
such election was held. In the event the proposition fails
to receive a majority of the votes "YES" in the district,
then such proposition shall not be resubmitted [at any
election held within one year of the date of the election at
which such proposition was rejected] until the next general
election.
184.614. 1. Before incurring any indebtedness under
the provisions of section 184.612, the board of the district
shall provide for the collection of an annual tax on all
taxable tangible property therein sufficient to pay the
interest and principal of the indebtedness as they fall due
and to retire the same within twenty years from the date
contracted. The tax levy shall be in addition to that tax
levy authorized by the voters as provided in sections
184.600 and 184.604.
2. For the purpose of incurring additional
indebtedness as provided in section 184.612, the board of

SB 1517 180
the district shall submit the question to the voters of the
district.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Metropolitan Zoo District issue
bonds in the amount of ______ dollars for the
purpose of ______?]
190.040. 1. For the organization of a district which
shall levy a property tax, the question shall be submitted
[in substantially the following form:] as provided in
section 115.706.
[Shall there be organized in the counties of
______, state of Missouri, an ambulance district
for the establishment and operation of an
ambulance service to be located within the
boundaries of said proposed district and having
the power to impose a property tax not to exceed
the annual rate of thirty cents on the hundred
dollars assessed valuation without voter
approval, and such additional tax as may be
approved hereafter by vote thereon, to be known
as "______ Ambulance District" as prayed for by
petition filed with the county clerk of ______
County, Missouri, on the ______ day of ______,
20______?]
2. For the organization of a district which shall levy
a sales tax, the question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall there be organized in the counties of
______ , state of Missouri, an ambulance
district for the establishment and operation of

SB 1517 181
an ambulance service to be located within the
boundaries of said district and having the power
to impose a sales tax in an amount not to exceed
one-half of one percent without voter approval,
and such additional tax as may be approved
hereafter by vote thereon, to be known as
"______ Ambulance District" as prayed for by
petition filed with the county clerk of ______
County, Missouri, on the ______ day of ______,
20______?]
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by
the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the sales tax authorized in this section
shall be in effect and the governing body of the ambulance
district shall lower the level of its tax rate by an amount
which reduces property tax revenues by an amount equal to
fifty percent of the amount of sales tax collected in the
preceding year. If a majority of the votes cast by the
qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then
the governing body of the ambulance district shall not
impose the sales tax authorized in this section unless and
until the governing body of such ambulance district
resubmits a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
ambulance district to impose the sales tax authorized by
this section and such proposal is approved by a majority of
the qualified voters voting thereon.
4. All revenue received by a district from the tax
authorized pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a
special trust fund, and be used solely for the purposes
specified in the proposal submitted pursuant to this section
for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.

SB 1517 182
5. All sales taxes collected by the director of
revenue pursuant to this section, less one percent for cost
of collection, which shall be deposited in the state's
general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety
bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a
special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be known as
the "Ambulance District Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys
in the ambulance district sales tax trust fund shall not be
deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with
any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep
accurate records of the amount of money in the trust and the
amount collected in each district imposing a sales tax
pursuant to this section, and the records shall be open to
inspection by officers of the county and to the public. Not
later than the tenth day of each month, the director of
revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust
fund during the preceding month to the governing body of the
district which levied the tax. Such funds shall be
deposited with the board treasurer of each such district.
6. The director of revenue may make refunds from the
amounts in the trust fund and credit any district for
erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such
district. If any district abolishes the tax, the district
shall notify the director of revenue of the action at least
ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and
the director of revenue may order retention in the trust
fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount
collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible
refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored
checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
After one year has elapsed after the effective date of

SB 1517 183
abolition of the tax in such district, the director of
revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the
district and close the account of that district. The
director of revenue shall notify each district of each
instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from
receipts due the district.
7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions
of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed
pursuant to this section.
190.065. 1. For the purpose of purchasing any
property or equipment necessary or incidental to the
operation of an ambulance service, the board of directors
may borrow money and issue bonds for the payment thereof in
the manner provided herein. The question of the loan shall
be decided by the submission of the question ordered by the
board of directors of the district as provided in subsection
1 of section 115.706.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ ambulance district borrow
money in the amount of ______ dollars for the
purpose of ______ and issue bonds for the
payment thereof?]
3. If the constitutionally required percentage of the
votes cast are for the loan, the board shall, subject to the
restrictions of subsection 4, be vested with the power to
borrow money in the name of the district, to the amount and
for the purposes specified on the ballot, and issue the
bonds of the district for the payment thereof.
4. The loans authorized by this section shall not be
contracted for a period longer than twenty years, and the
entire amount of the loan shall at no time exceed, including

SB 1517 184
the existing indebtedness of the district, in the aggregate,
ten percent of the value of taxable tangible property
therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state
and county purposes, the rate of interest to be agreed upon
by the parties, but in no case to exceed the highest legal
rate allowed by contract; when effected, it shall be the
duty of the directors to provide for the collection of an
annual tax sufficient to pay the interest on the
indebtedness as it falls due, and also to constitute a
sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof within
the time the principal becomes due.
190.074. To levy and collect taxes as herein provided,
the board shall fix a rate of levy, not to exceed ten cents
on the one hundred dollars valuation of the taxable tangible
property within the district as shown by the last completed
assessment, the revenues from which shall be deposited in a
special fund and used only for the pension program of the
district, by submitting the [following] question to the
voters [at the municipal general, or a state primary or
general election in such district or at any election at
which a member of the board of directors is to be elected:]
as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______
Ambulance District be authorized to levy an
annual tax rate of ______ cents per one hundred
dollars valuation, the revenues from which shall
be deposited in a special fund and used only for
the pension program of the district? ]
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of

SB 1517 185
this section, but if a majority of the voters casting votes
thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by this
subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in
effect.
190.296. 1. For the purpose of purchasing any
property or equipment necessary or incidental to the
operation of central dispatching of emergency services, the
board may borrow money and issue bonds for the payment
thereof in the manner provided herein. The question of the
loan shall be decided by the submission of the question to
the eligible voters of the county [at the first municipal
election held in a calendar year] as provided in subsection
1 of section 115.706.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ emergency services board
borrow money in the amount of ______ dollars for
the purpose of ______ and issue bonds for the
payment thereof?]
3. If the constitutionally required percentage of the
votes cast are for the loan, the board shall, subject to the
restrictions of subsection 4 of this section, be vested with
the power to borrow money in the name of the board, to the
amount and for the purposes specified on the ballot, and
issue the bonds of the board for the payment thereof.
4. The loans authorized by this section shall not be
contracted for a period longer than twenty years, and the
entire amount of the loan shall at no time exceed, including
the existing indebtedness of the board, in the aggregate,
ten percent of the value of taxable tangible property
therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state
and county purposes, the rate of interest to be agreed upon

SB 1517 186
by the parties, but in no case to exceed the highest legal
rate allowed by contract; when effected, it shall be the
duty of the directors to direct a portion of the tax
collected pursuant to section 190.292 in an amount
sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it
falls due, and also to constitute a sinking fund for the
payment of the principal thereof within the time the
principal becomes due.
5. This section shall only apply to any county of the
third classification without a township form of government
and with more than twenty-four thousand five hundred but
less than twenty-four thousand six hundred inhabitants.
198.260. The question of whether or not a nursing home
shall be organized shall be submitted [in substantially the
following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall there be organized in the counties of
______ , state of Missouri, a nursing home
district for the establishment and operation of
a nursing home to be located within the
boundaries of the proposed district and having
the power to impose a property tax not to exceed
the annual rate of thirty-five cents on the
hundred dollars assessed valuation without voter
approval, and such additional tax as may be
approved hereafter by vote thereon, to be known
as "______ Nursing Home District" as prayed for
by petition filed with the county clerk of
______ County, Missouri, on the ______ day of
______, 20______?]
198.263. Any district which has a lower tax levy than
the maximum levy authorized by section 198.250 may increase
its levy up to, but not in excess of, such maximum levy if a

SB 1517 187
majority of the voters of the district who vote on the
increase approve the increase. The ballot of submission for
a tax increase under this section shall be [in substantially
the following form:] submitted as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall the ______ Nursing Home District be
authorized to increase the annual rate of property
tax from ______ cents to ______ cents on the
hundred dollars assessed valuation?
□ YES □ NO
(Place an "X" in the square opposite the answer
for which you wish to vote.)]
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
are in favor of the increase, the board of directors of the
district shall levy the annual rate of tax approved; but if
a majority of the voters casting votes thereon are opposed
to the increase, any annual tax rate in effect at the time
of the election shall remain in effect; provided, however,
that if the voters of the district have previously approved
a levy and the levy has not been imposed, the board of
directors may impose such previously approved levy or
portion thereof, subject to other provisions of the law with
respect to limitation on tax revenues.
198.310. 1. For the purpose of purchasing nursing
home district sites, erecting nursing homes and related
facilities and furnishing the same, building additions to
and repairing old buildings, the board of directors may
borrow money and issue bonds for the payment thereof in the
manner provided herein. The question of the loan shall be
submitted by an order of the board of directors of the

SB 1517 188
district as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706.
Notice of the submission of the question, the amount and the
purpose of the loan shall be given as provided in section
198.250.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Nursing Home District borrow
money in the amount of ______ dollars for the
purpose of ______ and issue bonds in payment
thereof?]
3. If the constitutionally required percentage of the
votes cast are for the loan, the board shall, subject to the
restrictions of subsection 4, be vested with the power to
borrow money in the name of the district, to the amount and
for the purposes specified on the ballot, and issue the
bonds of the district for the payment thereof.
4. The loans authorized by this section shall not be
contracted for a period longer than twenty years, and the
entire amount of the loan shall at no time exceed, including
the existing indebtedness of the district, in the aggregate,
ten percent of the value of taxable tangible property
therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state
and county purposes, the rate of interest to be agreed upon
by the parties, but in no case to exceed the highest legal
rate allowed by contract; when effected, it shall be the
duty of the directors to provide for the collection of an
annual tax sufficient to pay the interest on the
indebtedness as it falls due, and also to constitute a
sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof within
the time the principal becomes due.
204.250. 1. If the construction and maintenance of a
common system of trunk sewers and sewage treatment plants is

SB 1517 189
necessary to secure proper sanitary conditions for the
preservation of public health in a natural drainage area the
major portion of which lies within a county of the first
class containing all or part of a city having a population
of four hundred fifty thousand or more, or in a county of
the first class not having a charter form of government, or
in a county of the second, third or fourth class, and which
natural drainage area contains all or portions of several
drainage basins, several municipalities or sewer districts,
and if a common sewer district encompassing the entire area
would be eligible for federal aid and assistance under the
provisions of Title 33, Section 1151 et seq. of the United
States Code Annotated, as now or as may hereafter be
amended, the area may be established and incorporated as a
common sewer district under sections 204.250 to 204.470 in
the following manner: The county commission, or in charter
counties, the county executive with the concurrence by
resolution of the county legislature, of the county within
which the major portion of the area lies may petition the
circuit court having jurisdiction over the major portion for
the appointment of commissioners as herein provided, and to
take further action as may be necessary for the submission
to the legal voters residing in the area of the question
whether the area shall be organized and incorporated as a
common sewer district under sections 204.250 to 204.470.
2. The petition shall set forth a description in
general terms of the territory to be embraced in, suggest a
name for the proposed common sewer district and state the
aim and purposes for which the district is created.
3. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the
contrary, if a sanitary sewage disposal or treatment system
is necessary for any number of buildings used solely or

SB 1517 190
primarily for residential or commercial purposes which are
situated in such geographical proximity and manner to one
another that the creation of a sewage disposal or treatment
system is feasible, and such buildings are situated in or
are in geographical proximity to an existing common sewer
district formed pursuant to this chapter, and if sanitary
sewage disposal or treatment services are not otherwise
available for service to such buildings, regardless of
whether the buildings lie in a natural drainage area or
natural drainage basin, such area may be established as a
common sewer subdistrict of an existing common sewer
district formed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
by complying with the procedures set forth in subsections 4
to 7 of this section.
4. The circuit court of the circuit proposing to
create a sewer subdistrict pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section may, by order of the court, for good cause shown,
submit the question of creating such subdistrict to all
owners of record of all real property within such proposed
subdistrict at a general [or special] election [called for
that purpose] as provided in subsection 1 of section
115.706. Such order shall set forth the project name for
the proposed subdistrict, the general nature of the proposed
subdistrict, the estimated cost of the sewer improvements
for such subdistrict, the boundaries of the proposed
subdistrict to be assessed for sewer improvements, [and] the
proposed method or methods of assessment, and other
information as provided in section 115.706. The court may
thereafter create a sewer subdistrict of an existing common
sewer district formed pursuant to this chapter when the
question of creating such subdistrict has been approved by
the vote of the percentage of electors within such

SB 1517 191
subdistrict voting thereon that is equal to the percentage
of voter approval required for the issuance of general
obligation bonds of the city or county wherein such
subdistrict is located under Article VI, Section 26 of the
Constitution of this State. The notice of election
containing the question of creating a sewer subdistrict
shall contain the project name for the proposed subdistrict,
the general nature of the proposed subdistrict, the
estimated cost of the sewer improvements for such
subdistrict, the boundaries of the proposed subdistrict to
be assessed for sewer improvements, the proposed method or
methods of assessment, [and] a statement that the final cost
of such sewer improvements assessed against property within
the subdistrict and the amount of general obligation bonds
issued therefor shall not exceed the estimated cost of such
sewer improvements, as stated in such notice, by more than
twenty-five percent, and other information as provided in
section 115.706. The ballot upon which the question of
creating a sewer subdistrict is submitted to the qualified
voters residing within the proposed subdistrict shall
contain a question [in substantially the following form:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ Circuit Court be authorized to
create a sewer subdistrict proposed for the
______ (common sewer district name) and
authorize the common sewer district to incur
indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds
to pay for all or part of the cost of the
creation and maintenance of such subdistrict,
the cost of all indebtedness so incurred to be
assessed by the ______ (common sewer district
name) on the property within the subdistrict?]

SB 1517 192
5. As an alternative to the procedure described in
100 subsection 4 of this section, the circuit court of the
101 circuit may create such a sewer subdistrict when a proper
102 petition has been signed by the owners of record of at least
103 two-thirds by area of all real property located within such
104 proposed subdistrict. The petition, in order to become
105 effective, shall be filed with the circuit court. A proper
106 petition for the creation of a sewer subdistrict shall set
107 forth the proposed subdistrict name, the general nature of
108 the proposed subdistrict, the estimated cost of the sewer
109 improvements for such subdistrict, the boundaries of the
110 proposed subdistrict to be assessed for sewer improvements,
111 the proposed method or methods of assessment, a notice that
112 the names of the signers may not be withdrawn later than
113 seven days after the petition is filed with the court, and a
114 notice that the final cost of such assessments against
115 property within the subdistrict and the amount of general
116 obligation bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the
117 estimated cost of sewer improvements, as stated in such
118 petition, by more than twenty-five percent.
119 6. Upon receiving the requisite voter approval at an
120 election or upon the filing of a proper petition with the
121 court, the court may by order determine the advisability of
122 the subdistrict and may order that the subdistrict be
123 established and that preliminary plans and specifications
124 for the subdistrict be made. Such order shall state and
125 make findings as to the subdistrict name, the nature of the
126 subdistrict, the estimated cost of the sewer improvements
127 for such subdistrict, the boundaries of the subdistrict to
128 be assessed for sewer improvements, the proposed method or
129 methods of assessment, and shall also state that the final
130 cost of such assessments against the property within the

SB 1517 193
131 subdistrict and the amount of general obligation bonds
132 issued therefor shall not, without a new election or
133 petition, exceed the estimated cost of such sewer
134 improvements by more than twenty-five percent.
135 7. The boundaries of the proposed subdistrict shall be
136 described by metes and bounds, streets or other sufficiently
137 specific description. The area of the subdistrict finally
138 determined to be assessed may be less than, but shall not
139 exceed, the total area comprising such district.
205.563. 1. The governing body of any city of the
fourth classification with more than two hundred but fewer
than three hundred inhabitants and located in any county of
the second classification with more than forty-eight
thousand two hundred but fewer than forty-eight thousand
three hundred inhabitants may impose, by order or ordinance,
an annual real property tax to fund the construction,
operation, and maintenance of a community health center.
The tax authorized in this section shall not exceed thirty-
five cents per year on each one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation on all taxable real property within the city. Any
such city may enter into an agreement or agreements with
taxing jurisdictions located at least partially within the
incorporated limits of such city to levy the tax authorized
under this section upon real property located within the
jurisdiction of such district, but outside the incorporated
limits of such city, provided that any taxing jurisdiction
desiring to levy such tax shall first receive voter approval
of such measure in the manner and form contained in this
section and section 115.706. The tax authorized in this
section shall be in addition to all other property taxes
imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all
other charges and taxes.

SB 1517 194
2. No order or ordinance adopted under this section
shall become effective unless the governing body of the city
submits to the voters residing within such city at a [state]
general[, primary, or special] election a proposal to
authorize the city to impose a tax under this section.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the city of ______ and ______ district (if
applicable) be authorized to impose a tax on
owners of real property in an amount equal to
______ (insert amount not to exceed thirty-five
cents) per one hundred dollars assessed valuation
for the purpose of constructing, operating, and
maintaining a community health center?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".]
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, then the tax shall become effective in the tax
year immediately following its approval. If a majority of
the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the question, then the tax
shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
such question is approved by a majority of the qualified
voters voting on the question.

SB 1517 195
4. The tax authorized under this section shall be
levied and collected in the same manner as other real
property taxes are levied and collected within the city.
5. The governing body of any city that has imposed a
real property tax under this section may submit the question
of repeal of the tax to the voters on any [date available
for elections for the city] general election day. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
voters voting thereon are in favor of repeal, that repeal
shall become effective on the first day of the tax year
immediately following its approval. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall remain
effective until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
6. Whenever the governing body of any city that has
imposed a real property tax under this section receives a
petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the
city equal to at least two percent of the number of
registered voters of the city voting in the last
gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal
the tax, the governing body shall submit to the voters of
such city on a general election day a proposal to repeal the
tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal,
the repeal shall become effective on the first day of the
tax year immediately following its approval. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall
remain effective until the question is resubmitted under
this section to the qualified voters and the repeal is

SB 1517 196
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
question.
7. If the real property tax authorized under this
section is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds
collected under the tax shall continue to be used solely for
the designated purposes.
205.979. 1. The board of trustees may request that
the governing body of the county or counties request the
election officials of any county or city not within a county
containing all or part of such service area to submit to the
qualified voters of such county, or city not within a
county, at a general[, primary, or special] election the
proposition contained in subsection 3 of this section. Such
election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty
days prior to such general[, primary, or special] election
in at least two newspapers that such proposition shall be
submitted at any general[, primary, or special] election
held for submission of the proposal. A request by the board
of trustees for a proposition to be submitted to the voters
as set out in this section shall be considered a request of
the county, or city not within a county, for purposes of
section 115.063.
2. The tax may not be levied to exceed forty cents per
each one hundred dollars assessed valuation therefor.
3. The ballot to be used for voting on the proposition
shall be [substantially in the following form:] submitted as
provided in section 115.706.
[OFFICIAL BALLOT
(Check the one for which you wish to vote.)

SB 1517 197
Shall (name of county) establish a community mental
health fund to establish, improve (and) (or)
maintain a community mental health service, and for
which the (county) shall levy a tax of (insert
exact amount to be voted upon) cents per each one
hundred dollars assessed valuation therefor?
□ YES □ NO]
4. The election shall be conducted and the vote
canvassed in the same manner as other county elections.
206.070. The question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall there be organized in the counties of
______, state of Missouri, a hospital district
for the establishment and operation of a
hospital to be located at ______ in ______
County, Missouri, and having the power to impose
a property tax not to exceed the annual rate of
fifty cents on the hundred dollars assessed
valuation without voter approval, and such
additional tax as may be approved hereafter by
vote thereon to be known as "______ Hospital
District", as prayed for by petition filed with
the county clerk of ______ County, Missouri, on
the ______ day of ______, 20______?]
206.120. 1. For the purpose of purchasing hospital
sites, erecting hospitals and related facilities and
furnishing the same, building additions to and repairing old
buildings, the board of directors may borrow money and issue
bonds for the payment thereof in the manner provided

SB 1517 198
herein. The question of the loan shall be submitted to the
voters by an order of the board of directors of the district.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ hospital district borrow money
in the amount of ______ dollars for the purpose
of ______ and issue bonds in payment thereof?]
3. If the then constitutionally required majority of
the votes cast are for the loan, the board shall, subject to
the restrictions of subsection 5, be vested with the power
to borrow money in the name of the district, to the amount
and for the purposes specified on the ballot, and issue the
bonds of the district for the payment thereof.
4. If less than the required majority of the votes
cast are for the first loan submitted to the voters
following the organization of the district, a second
question for authority to borrow money may be submitted and
if unsuccessful a third question may be submitted. If each
of the first three questions submitted to the voters for
authority to borrow money for the purposes of this section
is defeated, or if no successful submission for such purpose
is conducted within five years after the establishment of
the district, then the district shall be immediately
dissolved by order of the county commission establishing it,
and any funds remaining on hand and belonging to the
district shall forthwith be paid pro rata to those taxpayers
from whom they were collected; provided that in any district
wherein a hospital is in operation without having voted
bonds, the provisions of this section as relating to
dissolution shall not apply.
5. The loans authorized by this section shall not be
contracted for a period longer than twenty years, and the

SB 1517 199
entire amount of the loan shall at no time exceed, including
the existing indebtedness of the district, in the aggregate,
ten percent of the value of taxable tangible property
therein, as shown by the last completed assessment for state
and county purposes, the rate of interest to be agreed upon
by the parties, but in no case to exceed the highest legal
rate allowed by contract. When effected, it shall be the
duty of the directors to provide for the collection of an
annual tax sufficient to pay the interest on the
indebtedness as it falls due, and also to constitute a
sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof within
the time the principal becomes due.
209.130. 1. There is hereby levied an annual tax of
three cents on each one hundred dollars valuation of taxable
property in the state of Missouri to provide a fund out of
which shall be paid the pensions for the deserving blind as
herein provided. The tax shall be collected at the same
time and in the same manner and by the same means as other
state taxes are now collected. The tax, when so collected,
shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the
blind pension fund, out of which fund shall be paid the
pension as provided by law. Any balance remaining in the
fund after the payment of the pensions may be appropriated
for the adequate support of the commission for the blind,
and any balance remaining at the end of the biennium shall
be transferred to the distributive public school fund.
2. This section shall expire upon the adoption of an
amendment to Article III, Section 38(b) of the Constitution
of Missouri requiring the general assembly to annually
appropriate moneys for the pensioning of the blind and
eliminating the property tax levied for such purpose.

SB 1517 200
210.860. 1. The governing body of any county or city
not within a county may, after voter approval pursuant to
this section, levy a tax not to exceed twenty-five cents on
each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation on taxable
property in the county for the purpose of providing
counseling, family support, and temporary residential
services to persons eighteen years of age or less and those
services described in section 210.861. The question shall
be submitted to the qualified voters of the county or city
not within a county at a [county or state] general[, primary
or special] election upon the motion of the governing body
of the county or city not within a county or upon the
petition of eight percent of the qualified voters of the
county determined on the basis of the number of votes cast
for governor in such county or city not within a county at
the last gubernatorial election held prior to the filing of
the petition. The election officials of the county or city
not within a county shall give legal notice as provided in
chapter 115. The question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall ______ County (City) be authorized to levy
a tax of ______ cents on each one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation on taxable property in the
county (city) for the purpose of establishing a
community children's services fund for purposes
of providing funds for counseling and related
services to children and youth in the county
(city) eighteen years of age or less and services
which will promote healthy lifestyles among
children and youth and strengthen families?
□ YES □ NO]

SB 1517 201
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, then the tax shall be levied and collected as
otherwise provided by law. If a majority of the votes cast
on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, then the tax shall not be levied
unless and until the question is again submitted to the
qualified voters of the county or city not within a county
and a majority of such voters are in favor of such a tax,
and not otherwise.
2. All revenues generated by the tax prescribed in
this section shall be deposited in the county treasury or,
in a city not within a county, to the board established by
law to administer such fund to the credit of a special
"Community Children's Services Fund" to accomplish the
purposes set out herein and shall be used for no other
purpose. Such fund shall be administered by and expended
only upon approval by a board of directors, established
pursuant to section 210.861.
233.172. 1. In any county of the first classification
without a charter form of government having a population of
at least one hundred fifty thousand and either containing a
portion of a city with a population of at least three
hundred fifty thousand or bordering a city not within a
county, the county commission may, by resolution, submit the
question of creating a road benefit district pursuant to
sections 233.170 to 233.316, encompassing the unincorporated
areas of such county to all of the qualified voters residing
within such district [at a general or special election
called for that purpose] as provided in subsection 1 of
section 115.706. Such resolution shall set forth the name

SB 1517 202
of the proposed road benefit district, its boundaries and a
proposed road and bridge benefit district tax levy in an
amount not to exceed twenty cents per one hundred dollars
assessed valuation. The ballot upon which the question of
creating a road benefit district is submitted to the
qualified voters residing within the proposed district shall
contain a question [in substantially the following form:] as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ County, be authorized to
create a road benefit district within the
following boundaries, to-wit: ______ (set forth
boundaries of proposed road benefit district)
and assess a levy not to exceed ______ cents per
one hundred dollars assessed valuation upon all
property within the boundaries of said road
benefit district the proceeds of which levy
shall be placed in a "road benefit district
fund" and used solely for the improvement,
maintenance, construction and repair of roads
and bridges within the boundaries of the road
benefit district?]
2. If the ballot question is approved by a majority of
the qualified voters residing within the boundaries of the
proposed district, the governing body of the county shall be
authorized to assess and collect a levy in an amount not to
exceed the amount specified on the ballot, in which event
the sums so collected shall be placed in a separate "road
district benefit fund" and used only for the purposes
specified on the ballot within the boundaries of the road
benefit district.
3. Notwithstanding section 233.170, to the contrary, a
district established pursuant to this section may contain

SB 1517 203
less than six hundred forty acres and may contain
territories that are not contiguous.
233.200. 1. The commissioners of such districts so
incorporated shall have power to issue road and bridge bonds
for and on behalf of their respective districts, payable out
of funds derived from taxation of all property taxable
therein to an amount including existing indebtedness payable
out of funds so derived not exceeding five percent of the
assessed valuation of such property to be ascertained by the
assessment next before the last assessment for state and
county purposes. Such bonds to be issued in denominations
of one hundred dollars, or some multiple thereof, to bear
interest at not exceeding the rate per annum permitted by
law, and to become due in not exceeding twenty years after
the date of such bonds. Whenever the board of commissioners
of any such road district propose to issue such bonds, they
shall submit the question to the voters in the district as
provided in section 115.706.
2. The notice of election shall state the amount of
bonds to be issued.
3. The result of the submission of the question shall
be entered upon the records of the district. If it shall
appear that the constitutionally required percentage of the
voters voting on the question shall have voted in favor of
the issue of the bonds, the commissioners shall order and
direct the execution of the bonds for and on behalf of such
district and provide for the levy and collection of a direct
annual tax upon all the taxable property in the district
sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal and
interest of the bonds so authorized as they respectively
become due.

SB 1517 204
4. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ special road district of
______ County issue road and bridge bonds in the
amount of ______ dollars?]
5. The board of commissioners shall not sell the bonds
for less than ninety-five percent of the par value thereof,
and the proceeds shall be paid over to the county treasurer,
and disbursed on warrants drawn by the president or vice
president of the board of commissioners and attested by the
secretary. The proceeds of the sale of such bonds shall be
used for the purpose only of paying the cost of holding such
election, and constructing, repairing and maintaining
bridges and culverts within the district, and working,
repairing, maintaining and dragging public roads within the
district.
233.345. 1. The special road district commissioners
of districts so incorporated shall have power to issue road
and bridge bonds for and on behalf of their respective
districts, payable out of funds derived from taxation of all
property taxable therein, to an amount, including existing
indebtedness payable out of funds so derived not exceeding
five percent of the assessed valuation of such property to
be ascertained by the assessment next before the last
assessment for state and county purposes. Such bonds to be
issued in denominations of one hundred dollars or some
multiple thereof, to bear interest at not exceeding the rate
per annum permitted by law, and to become due in not
exceeding twenty years after the date of such bonds.
2. Whenever the board of special road district
commissioners of such road district propose to issue such
bonds, they shall order the question to be submitted to the

SB 1517 205
voters of the district as provided in section 115.706. The
notice of election shall state the amount of bonds to be
issued.
3. The result of the submission of the question shall
be entered upon the records of the district. If it shall
appear that the constitutionally required percentage of the
voters voting on the question shall have voted in favor of
the issue of the bonds, the commissioners shall order and
direct the execution of the bonds for and on behalf of such
district and provide for the levy and collection of a direct
annual tax upon all the taxable property in the district
sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal and
interest of the bonds so authorized as they respectively
become due.
4. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ special road district of
______ County issue bonds in the amount of
______ dollars?]
5. The board of special road district commissioners
shall not sell the bonds for less then ninety-five percent
of the par value thereof and the proceeds shall be paid over
to the treasurer of the special road district and disbursed
on warrants drawn by the president or vice president of the
board of commissioners and attested by the secretary. The
proceeds of the sale of such bonds shall be used for the
purpose only of paying the cost of holding such election,
and constructing, repairing and maintaining bridges and
culverts within the district, and working, repairing,
maintaining and dragging public roads within the district.
233.455. 1. Whenever the board of commissioners of
any special road district proposes to issue bonds for road

SB 1517 206
purposes, they shall order the submission of the question to
the voters and whenever twenty voters of any township shall
file with the clerk of the county commission wherein the
township is located a petition in writing asking that bonds
for road purposes be issued for and on behalf of such
township, it shall be the duty of the county commission to
order the submission of the question to the voters as
provided in section 115.706.
2. The notice of election, in either case, shall state
the amount of bonds to be issued.
3. The result of the submission of the question shall
be entered upon the records of such county commission or the
board of commissioners. If it shall appear that two-thirds
of the voters voting on said question shall have voted in
favor of the issuance of said bonds, the board of
commissioners of the special road district, or the county
commission, as the case may be, shall order and direct the
execution of the bonds for and on behalf of such special
road district or township, and shall provide for the levy
and collection of a direct annual tax upon all the taxable
property in said district or township sufficient to provide
for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds
so authorized as they respectively become due.
4. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the board of
commissioners on or before the first day of May in each
year, or the state auditor immediately thereafter, in case
the clerk of the board of commissioners should fail or
neglect, on or before the first day of May of each year, so
to do, to certify to the county commission of the county, or
counties, wherein such road district is situated, the amount
of money that will be required during the next succeeding

SB 1517 207
year to pay interest falling due on bonds issued and the
principal of bonds maturing during such year.
5. On receipt of such certificate it shall be the duty
of the county commission, or commissions, at the time it
makes the levy for state, county, school and other taxes,
to, by order made, levy such a rate of taxation upon the
taxable property in the road district, in such county or
counties, as will raise the sum of money required for the
purposes aforesaid. On such order being made it shall be
the duty of the clerk of the county commission, or
commissions, to extend such rate of taxation upon the tax
books, against all of the taxable property in the district
in such county or counties, and the same shall be collected
by the collector of the revenue at the time and in the
manner, and by the same means as state, county, school and
other taxes are collected.
6. At the time the county commission is required to
determine and levy the rate of taxation for state, county,
school and other taxes, to determine, order and levy such a
rate of taxation upon the taxable property in any township
in such county as may have outstanding bonds issued under
this section as will be sufficient to pay interest and
principal falling due during the next succeeding year. It
shall be the duty of the clerk of the county commission to
extend upon the tax books of the county such rate of
taxation upon and against all of the taxable property in
such township, and when so extended the same shall be
collected by the collector of the revenue at the time, in
the manner, and by the means that state, county, school and
other taxes are collected.
7. All the laws, rights and remedies of the state of
Missouri for the collection of state, county, school and

SB 1517 208
other taxes, shall be applicable to the collection of taxes
herein authorized to be collected.
233.460. The question shall be submitted [in
substantially the following form:] as provided in section
115.706.
[Shall the ______ special road district of
______ (Name district or township) of ______
county issue road bonds in the amount of ______
dollars?]
233.510. 1. The commissioners of any special road
subdistrict may levy, if four-sevenths of the voters of the
subdistrict voting thereon approve, a tax on all taxable
property in the subdistrict, the proceeds of which to be
used for the support of the subdistrict, including the
payment of bonds issued under section 233.513. The
proposition to levy the tax authorized by this section may
be submitted by the commissioners at the next annual
election of the members of the commission or at any
[regularly scheduled primary or] general election [or at a
special election called for the purpose]. A separate ballot
containing the question shall [read as follows:] be
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the commissioners of the ______
Special Road Subdistrict be authorized to
levy a tax of ______ cents on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation to
provide funds for the support of the
subdistrict?
□ FOR THE PROPOSITION
□ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION

SB 1517 209
(Place an X in the square opposite the one
for which you wish to vote.)]
If four-sevenths of the qualified voters casting votes
thereon be in favor of the question, the commissioners shall
levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this
section, but if four-sevenths of the voters casting votes
thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by this
section, no such tax shall be levied.
2. Any tax authorized pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall be levied and collected as provided by
law for the levy and collection of taxes for special road
districts. Taxes authorized pursuant to this section shall
be deposited with the county treasurer, who shall disburse
the moneys only to the president or vice president of the
subdistrict upon warrants signed by such officer and
attested by the secretary of the subdistrict.
235.175. 1. Before the board of directors of any
street light maintenance district may increase the
district's current tax levy, the proposed increase must be
approved by a majority of the voters voting thereon.
2. The proposition to increase the tax levy may be
submitted by the board of directors or upon petition of five
hundred registered voters of the district. All propositions
to increase the tax levy shall be submitted [at the next
election permitted by section 115.123] as provided in
subsection 1 of section 115.706.
3. A separate ballot containing the question shall
[read as follows:] be submitted as provided in section
115.706.

SB 1517 210
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ street
light maintenance district be authorized to
increase the current tax levy of ______ cents per
one hundred dollars assessed valuation to ______
cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to
provide funds for the support of the district?
□ YES □ NO
(If you are in favor of the tax levy, place an X in
the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the
tax levy, place an X in the box opposite "NO".)]
4. If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes
thereon be in favor of the increased tax levy, the board of
directors shall raise the tax levy to the level approved by
the voters. If a majority of the voters casting votes
thereon do not vote in favor of the increased tax levy, any
levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
5. No street light maintenance district shall fix a
rate of levy which exceeds the maximum tax levy authorized
by section 235.170.
238.232. 1. If approved by at least four-sevenths of
the qualified voters voting on the question in the district,
the district may impose a property tax in an amount not to
exceed the annual rate of ten cents on the hundred dollars
assessed valuation. The district board may levy a property
tax rate lower than its approved tax rate ceiling and may
increase that lowered tax rate to a level not exceeding the
tax rate ceiling without voter approval. The property tax
shall be uniform throughout the district.
2. The ballot of submission shall be [substantially in
the following form:] submitted as provided in section
115.706.

SB 1517 211
[Shall the ______ Transportation Development
District impose a property tax upon all real
and tangible personal property within the
district at a rate of not more than ______
(insert amount) cents per hundred dollars
assessed valuation for the purpose of
providing revenue for the development of a
project (or projects) in the district (insert
general description of the project or
projects, if necessary)?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
box opposite "NO".]
3. The county collector of each county in which the
district is partially or entirely located shall collect the
property taxes and special benefit assessments made upon all
real property and tangible personal property within that
county and the district, in the same manner as other
property taxes are collected.
4. Every county collector having collected or received
district property taxes shall, on or before the fifteenth
day of each month and after deducting his commissions, remit
to the treasurer of that district the amount collected or
received by him prior to the first day of the month. Upon
receipt of such money, the district treasurer shall execute
a receipt therefor, which he shall forward or deliver to the
collector. The district treasurer shall deposit such sums
into the district treasury, credited to the appropriate
project or purpose. The collector and district treasurer
shall make final settlement of the district account and

SB 1517 212
commissions owing, not less than once each year, if
necessary.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, all property owned by an entity that is exempt
from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c), as amended,
shall be exempt from any special assessment levied by a
district under this section so long as the property is used
in furtherance of the entity's tax exempt purposes.
247.130. 1. Any district organized hereunder shall
have power to borrow money for any of the purposes provided
for in sections 247.010 to 247.220, and to issue bonds
therefor. In such event the board of directors shall
proceed substantially as follows: The board shall adopt a
resolution, reciting the necessity for the borrowing of
money, the amount of money necessary to be raised, the
purposes thereof, and the amount and type or character of
bonds to be issued. Such resolution shall also fix the date
of an election, to be held on a general election day, for
the purpose of testing the sense of the voters of the
district on the question of incurring such indebtedness and
issue bonds in evidence thereof.
2. Such resolution may submit at such election a
proposal to issue general obligation bonds or special
obligation bonds, or both, but in no event shall the board
of directors have authority to issue bonds unless at such
election the constitutionally required percentage of the
qualified voters of the district voting on any general
obligation bonds shall assent thereto and a simple majority
of the qualified voters of the district voting on any
special obligation bonds shall assent thereto.
3. Districts organized under the provisions of
sections 247.010 to 247.220 may issue either general

SB 1517 213
obligation bonds or special obligation bonds, as herein
defined; provided, however, that the type or character of
bonds to be issued shall be determined by the board of
directors in advance of calling the bond election and shall
be stated in the notice of election as herein provided.
4. General obligation bonds, within the meaning of
said sections, shall be bonds issued within the limitation
of indebtedness prescribed under Section 26 of Article VI of
the Constitution of Missouri, for the payment of which, both
principal and interest, a direct tax may be levied upon all
taxable property within the district. Before or at the time
of issuing general obligation bonds, the board of directors
shall provide for the collection of an annual tax, to be
levied upon all taxable property within the district
sufficient to pay the interest on such bonds as it falls
due, and also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment
of the principal thereof within twenty years from the date
of such bonds; provided, however, that the net income and
revenue arising from the operation of the waterworks system
of such district, after providing for costs of operation,
maintenance, depreciation and necessary extensions and
enlargements, shall be transferred to and become a part of
the interest and sinking fund applicable to such general
obligation bonds, unless or until such net revenues are
pledged to the payment of special obligation bonds as herein
provided.
5. Special obligation bonds, within the meaning of
sections 247.010 to 247.220, shall be bonds payable, both as
to principal and interest, wholly and only out of the net
income and revenues arising from the operation of the
waterworks system of any such district, after providing for
costs of operation, maintenance, depreciation and necessary

SB 1517 214
extensions and enlargements, and such bonds shall not be
deemed to be indebtedness of any such district within the
meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation upon
the incurring of indebtedness. Before or at the time of
issuing any such special obligation bonds, the board of
directors shall pledge such net income and revenues to the
payment of such bonds, both principal and interest, and
shall covenant to fix, maintain and collect rates for water
and water service supplied by such district so as to assure
that such net income and revenues will be sufficient for the
purposes herein required.
6. All bonds issued under the provisions of sections
247.010 to 247.220 shall be payable serially, beginning not
more than five years after the date they bear; the last
installment of any general obligation bonds so issued shall
be payable not more than twenty years after such date, and
the last installment of any special obligation bonds so
issued shall be payable not more than thirty-five years
after such date. Such bonds shall bear such rate of
interest, not exceeding six percent per annum, payable
annually or semiannually, shall be payable at such place or
places, within or without the state of Missouri, shall be
executed by the president of the board of directors,
attested by the clerk of said board, under the seal of the
district, and shall be of such denomination and be payable
in such medium of payment, all as the board of directors may
determine; provided, further, that should any bond issue
fail to carry at an election held for that purpose, the
board of directors shall have no power to call another
election on the question of the issuance of bonds for a
period of four months thereafter.

SB 1517 215
247.350. 1. The decree of incorporation shall not
become final and conclusive until it shall have been
submitted to voters of the proposed district and until it
shall have been assented to by a majority vote of the voters
of the district voting on the question.
2. The decree shall provide for the submission of the
question of incorporating such districts and to vote on the
maximum rate of levy for general operating purposes if such
maximum rate shall exceed fifteen cents on the one hundred
dollar valuation of the district, shall fix the date for
holding such election as the general election date.
3. The question of incorporating the district shall be
submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall there be incorporated a ______
metropolitan water supply district?]
4. Any question to determine the maximum rate of levy
for general operation purposes in excess of fifteen cents on
the one hundred dollars valuation shall be submitted in
substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ metropolitan water supply district be
authorized to levy a tax not exceeding ______ cents per one
hundred dollars assessed valuation for general operating
purposes?
5. The return shall be certified to the circuit court
having jurisdiction in the cause, and said court shall
thereupon enter its order canvassing said returns and
declaring the result of such election. If upon such canvass
and declaration it is found and determined that a majority
of the voters of the district voting on the question shall
have voted in favor of the question, the court shall enter
its further order declaring the decree of incorporation to

SB 1517 216
be final and conclusive. In the event, however, that the
court shall find the majority shall not have voted in favor
of the question the court shall enter its further order
declaring said decree of incorporation to be void and of no
effect.
6. If the court enters an order declaring the decree
of incorporation to be final and conclusive, it shall at the
same time designate the first board of directors of said
district from among the names of the voters who have been
named in one or more petitions filed in said cause. The
court shall designate and the decree shall contain the
appointment of two of such directors to serve for a term
ending three years after the next succeeding second Tuesday
in April, two of such directors to serve for a term ending
three years after the next succeeding second Tuesday in
April, two of such directors to serve for a term ending two
years after the next succeeding second Tuesday in April, and
one of such directors to serve for a term ending one year
after the next succeeding second Tuesday in April. The
directors thus appointed by the court shall serve for the
terms thus designated and until their successors shall have
been appointed or elected as provided in section 247.430.
7. The court shall at the same time enter an order of
record declaring the result of the submission of the
question to determine the maximum rate of levy of the
district, and shall set forth the amount beyond which the
board shall not thereafter have power to order a levy except
as otherwise provided in section 247.460 and which levy in
no event shall exceed the sum of twenty-five cents on the
one hundred dollar assessed valuation.
247.470. 1. On or before the first day of May of each
year, the board shall certify to the county commission of

SB 1517 217
the county within which the district is located a rate of
levy so fixed by the board as provided by law, with
directions that at the time and in the manner required by
law for levy of taxes for county purposes such county
commission shall levy a tax at the rate so fixed and
determined upon the assessed valuation of all the taxable
tangible property within the district, in addition to such
other taxes as may be levied by such county commission.
2. If the board thereafter in any year fixes and
determines by resolution of the board a rate of levy in
excess of fifteen cents per one hundred dollars valuation or
of the rate approved by a vote of the majority of the voters
of the district voting thereon, as provided herein for
general purposes, then the board shall order the submission
of the question of levying a tax rate in such increased
amount to the voters of the district in the same manner so
far as practicable as is provided for the submission of the
question to create a bonded indebtedness. Such resolution
of the board shall also fix the date upon which the election
is to be held at the next general election date.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the ______ metropolitan water supply
district be authorized to levy an annual rate of
taxation not exceeding ______ cents per one
hundred dollars assessed valuation for general
operating purposes?]
247.550. 1. Any district organized hereunder shall
have power to borrow money for any of the purposes provided
for in sections 247.230 to 247.670, and to issue bonds
therefor. In such event the board of directors shall
proceed substantially as follows:

SB 1517 218
(1) The board shall adopt a resolution reciting the
necessity for the borrowing of money, the amount of money
necessary to be raised, the purposes thereof, the amount and
type or character of bonds to be issued.
(2) Such resolution shall also fix the date of an
election to be held for the purpose of testing the sense of
the voters of the district on the question to borrow money
and issue bonds in evidence thereof at the next general
election date.
(3) Such resolution may submit at such election a
proposal to issue general obligation bonds or special
revenue obligation bonds, or both. Districts organized
under the provisions of sections 247.230 to 247.670 may
issue either general obligation bonds or special revenue
obligation bonds provided that the type or character of
bonds to be issued shall be determined by the board of
directors in advance of calling the bond election and shall
be stated in the notice of election as herein provided.
2. If the question is to issue general obligation
bonds, it must be assented to by two-thirds of the voters of
the district voting on the question; if the question is to
issue special revenue obligation bonds, it must be assented
to by four-sevenths of the voters on the question.
249.929. 1. To establish a sewage or storm water
facility improvement district, the governing body of any
city with a population of three hundred fifty thousand or
more inhabitants which is located in more than one county,
or the governing body of any county of the first
classification without a charter form of government that has
a population of at least one hundred sixty thousand
inhabitants, or the governing body of any county of the
first classification without a charter form of government

SB 1517 219
containing a portion of a city with a population of at least
three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, or the governing
body of any county of the first classification without a
charter form of government as of August 28, 1995, that has a
population of more than one hundred five thousand but less
than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants, shall comply
with the procedures described in subsection 2 of this
section.
2. The governing body of any city with a population of
three hundred fifty thousand or more inhabitants which is
located in more than one county, or the governing body of
any county of the first classification without a charter
form of government that has a population of at least one
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, or the governing body of
any county of the first classification without a charter
form of government containing a portion of a city with a
population of at least three hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants, or the governing body of any county of the
first classification without a charter form of government as
of August 28, 1995, that has a population of more than one
hundred five thousand but less than one hundred twenty
thousand inhabitants, proposing to create a sewage or storm
water facility improvement district may, by resolution,
submit the question of creating such district to all
qualified voters residing within such district [at a general
or special election called for that purpose] as provided in
subsection 1 of section 115.706. Such resolution shall set
forth the project name for the proposed sewage or storm
water facility improvement, the general nature of the
proposed improvement, the estimated cost of such
improvement, the boundaries of the proposed sewage or storm
water facility improvement district to be assessed, and the

SB 1517 220
proposed method or methods of assessment, including any
provision for the annual assessment of maintenance costs of
the improvement in each year after the bonds issued for the
original sewage or storm water facility improvement are paid
in full. The governing body of the city or county may
create a sewage or storm water facility improvement district
when the question of creating such district has been
approved by the vote of the percentage of electors within
such district voting thereon that is equal to the percentage
of voter approval required for the issuance of general
obligation bonds of such county under Article VI, Section 26
of the Constitution of this State. The notice of election
containing the question of creating a sewage or storm water
facility improvement district shall contain the project name
for the proposed improvement, the general nature of the
proposed improvement, the estimated cost of such
improvement, the boundaries of the proposed sewage or storm
water facility improvement district to be assessed, the
proposed method or methods of assessment, including any
provision for the annual assessment of maintenance costs of
the improvement in each year after the bonds issued for the
original improvement are paid in full, and a statement that
the final cost of such improvement assessed against property
within the district and the amount of general obligation
bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the estimated cost of
such improvement, as stated in such notice, by more than
twenty-five percent. The question of whether to create any
sewage water facility improvement district or storm water
facility improvement district, the boundaries of which are
not identical to any existing or proposed storm water
facility improvement district or any existing or proposed
sewage water facility improvement district, shall be

SB 1517 221
submitted to the voters as a separate question as provided
in section 115.706; however, the question of whether to
create a sewage water facility improvement district and a
storm water facility improvement district, the boundaries of
which are identical, may be submitted as a single question
as provided in section 115.706. The ballot upon which the
question of creating a sewage or storm water facility
improvement district is submitted to the qualified voters
residing within the proposed district shall contain a
question [in substantially the following form:] submitted as
provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ (name of city or county) be
authorized to create a sewage or storm water
facility improvement district proposed for the
______ (project name for the proposed improvement)
and incur indebtedness and issue general obligation
bonds to pay for all or part of the cost of sewage
or storm water facility improvements within such
district, the cost of all indebtedness so incurred
to be assessed by the governing body of the ______
(city or county) on the property benefitted by such
improvements for a period of ______ years, and, if
included in the resolution, an assessment in each
year thereafter with the proceeds thereof used
solely for maintenance of the sewage or storm water
facility improvement?
100 □ YES □ NO]
101 3. Upon receiving the requisite voter approval at an
102 election, the governing body of any city with a population
103 of three hundred fifty thousand or more inhabitants which is
104 located in more than one county, or the governing body of a
105 county of the first classification without a charter form of
106 government that has a population of at least one hundred

SB 1517 222
107 sixty thousand inhabitants, or the governing body of any
108 county of the first classification without a charter form of
109 government containing a portion of a city with a population
110 of at least three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, or the
111 governing body of any county of the first classification
112 without a charter form of government as of August 28, 1995,
113 that has a population of more than one hundred five thousand
114 but less than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants, may,
115 by resolution, determine the advisability of the improvement
116 and may order that the sewage or storm water facility
117 improvement district be established and that preliminary
118 plans and specifications for the improvement be made. Such
119 resolution shall state and make findings as to the project
120 name for the proposed improvement, the nature of the
121 improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the
122 boundaries of the sewage or storm water facility improvement
123 district to be assessed, the proposed method or methods of
124 assessment, including any provision for the annual
125 assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement in each
126 year after the bonds issued for the original improvement are
127 paid in full, and shall also state that the final cost of
128 such improvement assessed against the property within the
129 sewage or storm water facility improvement district and the
130 amount of general obligation bonds issued therefor shall
131 not, without a new election, exceed the estimated cost of
132 such improvement by more than twenty-five percent.
249.1106. 1. The ballot upon which the question of
creating a consolidated sewer district is submitted to the
qualified voters residing within each existing sewer
district or districts shall contain a question [in
substantially the following form:] submitted as provided in
section 115.706.

SB 1517 223
[Shall the ______ (governing body's name) of ______
(county's name) be authorized to dissolve the
existing ______ (name of existing sewer district)
and create a consolidated sewer district proposed
for the ______ (name of existing sewer districts to
be consolidated) and authorize the consolidated
sewer districts to incur indebtedness and issue
general obligation bonds to pay for all or part of
the cost of the creation and maintenance of such
consolidated sewer district, with the cost of all
indebtedness so incurred to be assessed by the
______ (name of consolidated sewer district) on the
property within the consolidated sewer district?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".]
If a majority of the total votes cast on the proposal by the
qualified voters of each existing district or districts
voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the order
shall become effective. If the proposal receives less than
the required majority in at least one existing district,
then the governing body of the county shall have no power to
impose the consolidation of sewer districts as authorized
pursuant to this section unless and until the governing body
of the county shall again have submitted another proposal to
authorize the governing body of the county to consolidate
authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by
the required majority of the total votes cast on the
proposal by the qualified voters of each existing district
or districts voting on such proposal.

SB 1517 224
2. The boundaries of the proposed consolidated sewer
district shall be described by metes and bounds, streets or
other sufficiently specific description.
3. There shall be separate submissions of the question
of creating a consolidated sewer district to each group of
voters within each existing sewer district or districts, and
the elections shall be held simultaneously.
249.1150. 1. There is hereby created within any
county of the third classification without a township form
of government and with more than thirty-four thousand but
less than thirty-four thousand one hundred inhabitants, any
county of the second classification without a township form
of government and with more than fifty-four thousand two
hundred but less than fifty-four thousand three hundred
inhabitants, any county of the third classification without
a township form of government and with more than thirteen
thousand seventy-five but less than thirteen thousand one
hundred seventy-five inhabitants, any county of the first
classification with more than two hundred forty thousand
three hundred but less than two hundred forty thousand four
hundred inhabitants, any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than
nine thousand four hundred fifty but less than nine thousand
five hundred fifty inhabitants, any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and
with more than twenty-eight thousand six hundred but less
than twenty-eight thousand seven hundred inhabitants, any
county of the first classification with more than thirty-
nine thousand seven hundred but less than thirty-nine
thousand eight hundred inhabitants, any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and
with more than thirty-one thousand but less than thirty-one

SB 1517 225
thousand one hundred inhabitants, and any county of the
third classification without a township form of government
and with more than seventeen thousand nine hundred but less
than eighteen thousand inhabitants, the "Upper White River
Basin Watershed Improvement District". The watershed
improvement district is authorized to own, install, operate,
and maintain decentralized or individual on-site wastewater
treatment plants. The watershed improvement district
created under this section shall be a body corporate and a
political subdivision of the state of Missouri, shall be
capable of suing and being sued in contract in its corporate
name, and shall be capable of holding such real and personal
property necessary for corporate purposes. The district
shall implement procedures to regulate the area within the
district and to educate property owners within the district
about the requirements imposed by the district.
2. Any county included in the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district, as established in subsection
1 of this section, may choose to opt out of the district in
one of two ways:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition signed by at least
twenty percent of the property owners residing within the
county, a proposal is submitted to the qualified voters
within the district boundaries. The ballot of submission
shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the county of ______ opt out of the Upper
White River Basin Watershed Improvement District?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to

SB 1517 226
the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".
If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors
the proposal to opt out of district, then the county shall
no longer be included in the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district, and shall cease all
imposition, collection, and assessment of any taxes
associated with that district, beginning on the first day of
the first month following the election. If a simple
majority of the votes cast in the county opposes the
proposal to opt out of the district, then the county shall
remain a part of the Upper White River Basin watershed
improvement district. However, if a proposal to opt out of
the district is not approved, the governing body of the
county shall not resubmit a proposal to the voters under
this section [sooner than twelve months from the date of the
last proposal submitted under this section] until the next
general election; or
(2) Upon the issuance of an order by the county
commission, a proposal is submitted to the qualified voters
within the district boundaries to opt out of the Upper White
River Basin watershed improvement district. The ballot of
submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the county of ______ opt out of the Upper
White River Basin Watershed Improvement District?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to

SB 1517 227
the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".
If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors
the proposal to opt out of the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district, then the county shall no
longer be included in the Upper White River Basin watershed
improvement district, and shall cease all imposition,
collection, and assessment of any taxes associated with that
district, beginning on the first day of the first month
following the election. If a simple majority of the votes
cast in the county opposes the proposal to opt out of the
Upper White River Basin watershed improvement district, then
the county shall remain a part of the Upper White River
Basin watershed improvement district. However, if a
proposal to opt out of the Upper White River Basin watershed
improvement district is not approved, the governing body of
100 the county shall not resubmit a proposal to the voters under
101 this section [sooner than twelve months from the date of the
102 last proposal submitted under this section] until the next
103 general election.
104 3. Any county who has successfully chosen to opt out
105 of the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement
106 district under the provisions of subsection 2 of this
107 section shall be allowed to rejoin the district at any time,
108 provided the county submits the proposal to rejoin the
109 district in one of two ways:
110 (1) Upon the filing of a petition signed by at least
111 twenty percent of the property owners residing within the
112 county, a proposal is submitted to the qualified voters

SB 1517 228
113 within the county. The ballot of submission shall be in
114 substantially the following form:
115 Shall the county of ______ rejoin the Upper White
116 River Basin Watershed Improvement District?
117 □ YES □ NO
118 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
119 in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
120 the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
121 "NO".
122 If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors
123 the proposal to rejoin the Upper White River Basin watershed
124 improvement district, then the county shall rejoin the
125 district. If a simple majority of the votes cast in the
126 county opposes the proposal to rejoin the district, then the
127 county shall remain outside the Upper White River Basin
128 watershed improvement district. However, if a proposal to
129 rejoin the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement
130 district is not approved, the governing body of the county
131 shall not resubmit a proposal to the voters under this
132 section [sooner than twelve months from the date of the last
133 proposal submitted under this section] until the next
134 general election; or
135 (2) Upon the issuance of an order by the county
136 commission, a proposal is submitted to the qualified voters
137 within the district boundaries to rejoin the Upper White
138 River Basin watershed improvement district. The ballot of
139 submission shall be in substantially the following form:
140 Shall the county of ______ rejoin the Upper White
141 River Basin Watershed Improvement District?

SB 1517 229
142 □ YES □ NO
143 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
144 in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
145 the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
146 "NO".
147 If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors
148 the proposal to rejoin the Upper White River Basin watershed
149 improvement district, then the county shall rejoin the Upper
150 White River Basin watershed improvement district. If a
151 simple majority of the votes cast in the county opposes the
152 proposal to rejoin the Upper White River Basin watershed
153 improvement district, then the county shall remain outside
154 the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement district.
155 However, if a proposal to rejoin the Upper White River Basin
156 watershed improvement district is not approved, the
157 governing body of the county shall not resubmit a proposal
158 to the voters under this section [sooner than twelve months
159 from the date of the last proposal submitted under this
160 section] until the next general election.
161 4. The watershed improvement district created under
162 this section shall have the power to borrow money and incur
163 indebtedness and evidence the same by certificates, notes,
164 or debentures, to issue bonds and use any one or more lawful
165 funding methods the district may obtain for its purposes at
166 such rates of interest as the district may determine. Any
167 bonds, notes, and other obligations issued or delivered by
168 the district may be secured by mortgage, pledge, or deed of
169 trust of any or all of the property within the district.
170 Every issue of such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall
171 be payable out of property and revenues of the district and

SB 1517 230
172 may be further secured by other property within the
173 district, which may be pledged, assigned, mortgaged, or a
174 security interest granted for such payment, without
175 preference or priority of the first bonds issued, subject to
176 any agreement with the holders of any other bonds pledging
177 any specified property or revenues. Such bonds, notes, or
178 other obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the
179 district board, and shall bear such date or dates, and shall
180 mature at such time or times, but not in excess of thirty
181 years, as the resolution shall specify. Such bonds, notes,
182 or other obligations shall be in such denomination, bear
183 interest at such rate or rates, be in such form, either
184 coupon or registered, be issued as current interest bonds,
185 compound interest bonds, variable rate bonds, convertible
186 bonds, or zero coupon bonds, be issued in such manner, be
187 payable in such place or places, and be subject to
188 redemption as such resolution may provide, notwithstanding
189 section 108.170. The bonds, notes, or other obligations may
190 be sold at either public or private sale, at such interest
191 rates, and at such price or prices as the district shall
192 determine.
193 5. The county commission of any county located within
194 the watershed improvement district may authorize individual
195 properties to be served by the district by adoption of a
196 resolution or upon the filing of a petition signed by at
197 least twenty percent of the property owners of the proposed
198 area. The resolution or petition shall describe generally
199 the size and location of the proposed area.
200 6. In the event that any property within the watershed
201 improvement district proposed under this section lies within
202 or is serviced by any existing sewer district formed under
203 this chapter, chapter 204, or chapter 250, the property

SB 1517 231
204 shall not become part of the watershed improvement district
205 formed under this section unless the existing sewer district
206 agrees to refrain from providing service or to discontinue
207 service to the property. No property shall become part of
208 the watershed district until the owner of that property has
209 paid in full all outstanding costs owed to an existing sewer
210 district formed under this chapter, chapter 204, or chapter
211 250.
212 7. Upon the creation of the watershed improvement
213 district as authorized by this section, a board of trustees
214 for the district consisting of nine members shall be
215 appointed. The governing body of each county shall appoint
216 one member to serve on the board. No trustee shall reside
217 in the same county as another trustee. Of the initial
218 trustees appointed, five shall serve terms of one year, and
219 four shall serve terms of two years, as determined by lot.
220 After the initial appointments of the trustees, the
221 successor trustees shall reside in the same county as the
222 prior trustee and be elected by the resident property owners
223 of their county within the district. Each trustee may be
224 elected to no more than five consecutive two-year terms.
225 Vacancies shall be filled by the board. Each trustee shall
226 serve until a successor is elected and sworn. The trustees
227 shall not receive compensation for their services, but may
228 be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses. The
229 board shall elect a chair and other officers necessary for
230 its membership. The board shall enter into contracts with
231 any person or entity for the maintenance, administrative, or
232 support work required to administer the district. The board
233 may charge reasonable fees and submit proposals to levy and
234 impose property taxes to fund the operation of the district
235 to the qualified voters in the district, but such proposals

SB 1517 232
236 shall not become effective unless a majority of the
237 qualified voters in the district voting on the proposals
238 approve the proposed levy and rate of tax. The board may
239 adopt resolutions necessary to the operation of the district.
240 8. No service shall be initiated to any property lying
241 within the watershed improvement district created under this
242 section unless the property owner elects to have the service
243 provided by the district.
244 9. Any on-site wastewater treatment system installed
245 on any property that participates in the watershed
246 improvement district formed under this section shall meet
247 all applicable standards for such on-site wastewater
248 treatment systems under sections 701.025 to 701.059 and as
249 required by rules or regulations promulgated by the board of
250 trustees and the appropriate state agencies.
251 10. Property owners participating in the watershed
252 improvement district formed under this section shall be
253 required as a condition of continued participation to have a
254 maintenance plan approved by the watershed improvement
255 district for the on-site wastewater treatment systems on
256 their properties. Such property owners shall also execute a
257 utilities easement to allow the district access to the
258 system for maintenance purposes and inspections. The
259 property owner shall provide satisfactory proof that
260 periodic maintenance is performed on the sewage system. At
261 a minimum the system shall be installed and maintained
262 according to the manufacturer's recommendations. The level
263 of satisfactory proof required and the frequency of periodic
264 proof shall be determined by the board of trustees.
265 11. A district established under this section may, at
266 a general [or primary] election, submit to the qualified
267 voters within the district boundaries a real property tax

SB 1517 233
268 that shall not exceed five cents per one hundred dollars
269 assessed valuation to fund the operation of the district.
270 The ballot of submission shall be [in substantially the
271 following form:] submitted as provided in section 115.706.
272 [Shall the ______ (name of district) impose a real
273 property tax within the district at a rate of not
274 more than ______ (insert amount) dollars per
275 hundred dollars of assessed valuation to fund the
276 operation of the district?
277 □ YES □ NO
278 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
279 in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
280 the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
281 "NO".]
282 If a majority of the votes cast in each county that is part
283 of the district favor the proposal, then the real property
284 tax shall become effective in the district on the first day
285 of the year following the year of the election. If a
286 majority of the votes cast in each county that is a part of
287 the district oppose the proposal, then that county shall not
288 impose the real property tax authorized in this section
289 until after the county governing body has submitted another
290 such real property tax proposal and the proposal is approved
291 by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
292 However, if a real property tax proposal is not approved,
293 the governing body of the county shall not resubmit a
294 proposal to the voters under this section [sooner than
295 twelve months from the date of the last proposal submitted
296 under this section] until the next general election.

SB 1517 234
297 12. The real property tax authorized by this section
298 is in addition to all other real property taxes allowed by
299 law.
300 13. Once the real property tax authorized by this
301 section is abolished or terminated by any means, all funds
302 remaining in the trust fund shall be used solely for the
303 purposes approved in the ballot question authorizing the
304 tax. The tax shall not be abolished or terminated while the
305 district has any financing or other obligations
306 outstanding. Any funds in the trust fund which are not
307 needed for current expenditures may be invested by the
308 district in the securities described in subdivisions (1) to
309 (12) of subsection 1 of section 30.270 or repurchase
310 agreements secured by such securities.
311 14. The governing body of any county included in the
312 Upper White River Basin watershed improvement district
313 established in this section may designate groundwater
314 depletion areas within specific areas of the county and may
315 require well volume monitoring. However, any county
316 included in this district may choose not to require well
317 volume monitoring.
250.060. 1. Bonds of any such sewer district, payable
from taxes, may be issued for the purpose of improving and
extending the sewerage system of the district upon the
approval of a proposition to issue such bonds by the
constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting on
the question as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706.
2. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ (name of city or district) issue
bonds payable from taxes?]

SB 1517 235
3. Before any sewer district shall incur any
indebtedness evidenced by bonds payable from taxes as hereby
authorized, such sewer district shall provide for the
collection of an annual tax on all taxable tangible property
therein sufficient to pay the interest and principal of the
indebtedness as they fall due and to retire the same within
twenty years from the date contracted.
256.445. 1. Any political subdivision which contains
a sponsor which has submitted a plan which has been approved
by the director pursuant to sections 256.435 to 256.445 may
submit to the qualified voters of the political subdivision
[the following] question[:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the political subdivision of ______ (name
of political subdivision) incur indebtedness and
issue general obligation bonds to pay for all or
part of the costs of establishing and maintaining
a water resource project with the political
subdivision, the cost of all indebtedness so
incurred to be assessed by the governing body of
______ (name of political subdivision) on property
within the political subdivision?
□ YES □ NO]
2. If it appears that the required percentage of the
voters of such political subdivision voting on the
proposition of incurring indebtedness submitted at the
election were in favor of incurring such indebtedness, the
election authority shall make an order reciting the holding
of such election and the results thereof, both for and
against the proposition, and if the result of the election
as certified shall be in favor of incurring the indebtedness
and issuing the bonds, then the governing body of the

SB 1517 236
political subdivision shall direct the issuance thereof to
the amount of the debt authorized to be incurred, or any
portion thereof, and shall either before or at the time of
doing so provide for the collection of an annual ad valorem
tax upon all of the taxable property within the political
subdivision, which tax shall be sufficient to pay the
interest on such indebtedness as it falls due and also to
create a sinking fund for the payment of the principal
thereof within twenty years from the date of contracting the
same, such tax to be levied and collected as provided for in
chapter 137.
3. The governing body of the political subdivision
shall have no power to levy or collect any taxes for the
payment of any indebtedness incurred by the political
subdivision pursuant to this section unless and until the
voters of the political subdivision shall have authorized
the incurring of indebtedness at [an] a general election,
but all such expenses and indebtedness incurred by the
political subdivision may be paid out of funds which may be
received by the political subdivision from the sale of bonds
authorized by the voters at any such election.
4. Such bonds shall be issued in denominations of one
hundred dollars or some multiple thereof; shall be payable
to bearer, not later than twenty years from their date;
shall bear interest from their date at a rate not exceeding
six percent per annum, payable annually or semiannually;
such interest payments to be evidenced by annexed coupons,
and such bonds shall not be sold for less than ninety-five
percent of the face value thereof and together with existing
indebtedness of the political subdivision, if any, shall not
exceed in the aggregate five percent of the value of all of
the taxable property in the political subdivision to be

SB 1517 237
ascertained by the assessment next before the last
assessment for state and county purposes previous to the
incurring of such indebtedness.
5. Such bonds shall be signed by the presiding officer
of the governing body of the political subdivision attested
by the signature of the secretary of the governing body with
the seal of the political subdivision affixed thereto. The
bonds may be sold under the same conditions as are provided
for the sale of county road bonds.
6. All bonds issued under this section shall be
registered in the office of the state auditor as provided by
law for the registration of bonds of cities and in the
office of the governing body of the political subdivision in
a book kept for that purpose for registry, shall show the
number, date, amount, date of sale, name of the purchaser
and the amount for which the bond was sold.
7. The governing body of the political subdivision
wherein such project is situate shall certify the amount of
money that will be required during the next succeeding year
to pay interest falling due on bonds issued and the
principal of bonds maturing in such year, and the amount
necessary to cover the estimated expenses of maintaining
such project in good condition. The governing body shall,
at the time it makes the levy for other taxes, by order
made, levy such a rate of taxes upon all the taxable
property in the political subdivision as will produce a sum
of money sufficient for the purposes of the water resource
project; provided, that the governing body shall have no
authority to levy such tax until the voters of the political
subdivision shall have voted to incur an indebtedness under
the provisions of this section.

SB 1517 238
8. On such order being made it shall be the duty of
the governing body to cause such rate of taxation to be
extended upon the tax books against all the taxable property
in the political subdivision and the same shall be collected
and remitted to the governing board of the water project by
the collector of the revenue of the political subdivision at
the time, in the manner, and by the same means as state,
county, school and other taxes are collected and remitted.
All of the laws, rights and remedies provided by the laws of
this state for the collection of state, county, school and
other taxes shall be applicable to the collection of taxes
herein authorized to be collected.
100 9. All taxes levied pursuant to this section shall be
101 based upon the assessed valuation of lands and other
102 property in the political subdivision in accordance with the
103 current record of the assessed valuations of all taxable
104 property within the political subdivision as may be
105 determined by the records in the assessor's office of the
106 political subdivision and such tax shall be prorated and an
107 equal amount levied upon each one hundred dollars assessed
108 valuation.
257.360. 1. The county clerk of each county within
the district shall certify to the secretary of the board of
trustees the total assessed valuation of all taxable
tangible property lying within the district in his county.
Thereupon, the board of trustees shall determine the rates
of taxation necessary to be levied for the amortization fund
and for the general fund for the year and shall direct the
secretary to certify the rates to the county clerk of each
county in which the district is situated. The several
county clerks shall thereupon extend the rates upon and
against the assessed valuation of all taxable tangible

SB 1517 239
property lying within the district and shall certify the
taxes to the collectors of revenue of their respective
counties, who shall proceed to collect and enforce the taxes
in like manner as state and county taxes are collected and
enforced and shall make remittances of their collections
monthly to the treasurer of the district.
2. The rate levied for the general fund shall in no
year exceed one mill on each one dollar assessed valuation
of taxable tangible property in such district, except as
follows:
(1) When the board determines that needs for general
fund moneys are greater than the one mill tax will provide
and thereupon determines the rate of taxation necessary to
be levied in excess of the authorized rate;
(2) When, accordingly, the question is submitted by
the board to the electorate of the district in the same
manner as provided in this chapter for bond elections and as
provided in section 115.706;
(3) When, at such election, the increase is approved
for a year, by a majority vote of those voting, or, in
excess of one year and not to exceed four years, by a two-
thirds vote of those voting; and provided that any such
increase in the tax rate for the general fund shall in no
year exceed two mills on each one dollar assessed valuation
of taxable tangible property in the district.
3. In the event that an increase in the tax rate is
voted as prescribed, the procedure for collection shall be
as for any general fund levy.
257.370. 1. The board of trustees of any river basin
conservancy district may issue general obligation bonds for
and on behalf of the district for the purpose of providing
funds to carry out the official plan or plans of the

SB 1517 240
district. The bonds shall not exceed, including existing
indebtedness of the district, an amount equal to five
percent of the assessed valuation of taxable tangible
property in the district, to be ascertained by the last
completed assessment for state and county purposes made
previous to the incurring of the indebtedness. The bonds
shall be issued in the denomination of one hundred dollars
each, or some multiple thereof, to bear interest at a rate
not exceeding six percent per annum, payable semiannually,
and to become due and payable at the times the board of
trustees determines by order of record, not exceeding twenty
years from date of issue. All bonds shall be signed by the
president of the board, and attested by the signature of the
secretary of the board, with the seal of the district
affixed; and all interest coupons shall be executed by the
lithographed facsimile signatures of the officers.
2. Whenever a conservancy district proposes to issue
bonds as aforesaid, it shall submit the question to the
voters of the district as provided in section 115.706. The
notice of election shall state the amount and purpose of
bonds to be issued, the polling place at which the election
is to be held.
3. The results of the submission of the question shall
be entered upon the records of the board of trustees.
4. If it appears that the constitutionally required
percentage of the voters voting on the question have voted
in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the board of trustees
shall order and direct the execution of the bonds for and on
behalf of the district and shall provide for the levy and
collection of a direct annual tax upon all the taxable
property in the district sufficient to provide for the

SB 1517 241
payment of the principal and interest of the bonds so
authorized as they respectively become due.
5. It shall be the duty of the secretary of the board,
on or before the first day of May in each year, or the state
auditor immediately thereafter, in case the secretary of the
board fails or neglects so to do, to certify to the
respective county clerks of the counties within the district
the amount of money that will be required during the next
succeeding year to pay interest falling due on bonds issued
and the principal of bonds maturing during such year. Upon
receipt of the certificate, it shall be the duty of the
county clerks to levy and extend upon the tax books such a
rate of taxation upon all taxable tangible property in the
district as will raise the sum of money required for the
purposes aforesaid.
6. All of the laws, rights and remedies of the state
of Missouri for the collection of state, county, school and
other taxes shall be applicable to the collection of taxes
herein authorized to be collected.
262.598. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Consolidated district", a district formed jointly
by two or more councils;
(2) "Council", a University of Missouri extension
council authorized under section 262.563;
(3) "District" or "extension district", a political
subdivision formed by one or more councils;
(4) "Governing body", the group of individuals who
govern a district;
(5) "Single-council district", a district formed by
one council.

SB 1517 242
2. University of Missouri extension councils, except
for any council located in a county with a charter form of
government and with more than nine hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants, are hereby authorized to form extension
districts made up of cooperating counties for the purpose of
funding extension programming. An extension district may be
a single-council district or a consolidated district. A
single-council district shall be formed upon a majority vote
of the full council. A consolidated district shall be
formed upon a majority vote of each participating council.
3. In a single-council district, the council shall
serve as the district's governing body. In addition to any
other powers and duties granted to the council under
sections 262.550 to 262.620, the council shall also have the
powers and duties provided under subsection 5 of this
section.
4. In a consolidated district, the governing body of
the district shall consist of at least three, but no more
than five, representatives appointed by each participating
council. The term of office shall be two years.
Representatives may be reappointed. The governing body
shall elect officers, who shall serve as officers for two
years, and establish a regular meeting schedule which shall
not be less than once every three months.
5. The governing body of a district shall have the
following powers and duties:
(1) Review the activities and annual budgets of each
participating council;
(2) Determine, by September first of each year, the
tax rate necessary to generate sufficient revenue to fund
the extension programming in the district, which includes
annual funding for each participating council for the costs

SB 1517 243
of personnel and the acquisition, supply, and maintenance of
each council's property, work, and equipment;
(3) Oversee the collection of any tax authorized under
this section by ensuring the revenue is deposited into a
special fund and monitoring the use of the funds to ensure
they are used solely for extension programming in the
district;
(4) Approve payments from the special fund in which
the tax revenue is deposited; and
(5) Work cooperatively with each participating council
to plan and facilitate the programs, equipment, and
activities in the district.
6. The governing body of a district may submit a
question to the voters of the district to institute a
property tax levy in the county or counties that compose the
district[. Questions may be submitted to the voters of the
district at any general municipal election] as provided in
subsection 1 of section 115.706. Any such proposed tax
shall not exceed thirty cents per one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation. The costs of submitting the question to
the voters [at the general municipal election] shall be paid
as provided in section 115.063. Such question shall be
submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
in section 115.706.
[Shall the Extension District in ______ County
(insert name of county) be authorized to levy an
annual tax of ______ (insert amount not to
exceed thirty) cents per one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation for the purpose of funding
the University of Missouri Extension District
programs, equipment, and services in the
district?]

SB 1517 244
In a single-council district, if a majority of the voters in
the county approve the question, then the district shall
impose the tax. If a majority of the voters in a single-
council district do not approve the question, then no tax
shall be imposed. In a consolidated district, if a majority
of voters in each county in the district approve the
question, then the district shall impose the tax. If a
majority of the voters in a consolidated district do not
approve the question, then no tax shall be imposed in any
county of the district. In a consolidated district, if a
majority of voters in a county do not approve the question,
the council in the county that did not approve the question
may withdraw from the district. Upon such withdrawal, the
district shall be made up of the remaining counties and the
tax shall be imposed in those counties. However, if the
county that did not approve the question does not withdraw
from the district, the tax shall not be imposed. Revenues
collected from the imposition of a tax authorized under this
section shall be deposited into a special fund dedicated
only for use by the local district for programming purposes.
7. The county commission of any county in which the
tax authorized under this section is levied and collected:
(1) Shall be exempt from the funding requirements
100 under section 262.597 if revenue derived from the tax
101 authorized under this section is in excess of an amount
102 equal to two hundred percent of the average funding received
103 under section 262.597 for the immediately preceding three
104 years; or
105 (2) May reduce the current year's funding amount under
106 section 262.597 by thirty-three percent of the amount of tax
107 revenues derived from the tax authorized under this section

SB 1517 245
108 which exceed the average amount of funding received under
109 section 262.597 for the immediately preceding three years.
110 8. Any county that collects tax revenues authorized
111 under this section shall transfer all attributable revenue
112 plus monthly interest for deposit into the district's
113 special fund. The governing body of the district shall
114 comply with the prudent investor standard for investment
115 fiduciaries as provided in section 105.688.
116 9. In any county in which a single-council district is
117 established, and for which a tax has not been levied, the
118 district may be dissolved in the same manner in which it was
119 formed.
120 10. A county may withdraw from a consolidated district
121 at any time by the filing of a petition with the circuit
122 court having jurisdiction over the district. The petition
123 shall be signed by not fewer than ten percent of those who
124 voted in the most recent presidential election in the county
125 seeking to withdraw that is part of a consolidated district
126 stating that further operation of the district is contrary
127 to the best interest of the inhabitants of the county in
128 which the district is located and that the county seeks to
129 withdraw from the district. The circuit court shall hear
130 evidence on the petition. If the court finds that it is in
131 the best interest of the inhabitants of the county in which
132 the district is located for the county to withdraw from the
133 district, the court shall make an order reciting the same
134 and submit the question to the voters. The costs of
135 submitting the question to the voters at the general
136 municipal election shall be paid as provided in section
137 115.063. The question shall be submitted in substantially
138 the following format:

SB 1517 246
139 Shall the County of ______ (insert name of
140 county) being part of ______ (insert name of
141 district) Extension District withdraw from the
142 district?
143 The question shall be submitted at the next general
144 municipal election date. The election returns shall be
145 certified to the court. If the court finds that two-thirds
146 of the voters voting on the question voted in favor of
147 withdrawing from the district, the court shall issue an
148 order withdrawing the county from the district, which shall
149 contain a proviso that the district shall remain intact for
150 the sole purposes of paying all outstanding and lawful
151 obligations and disposing of the district's property. No
152 additional costs or obligations for the withdrawing county
153 shall be created except as necessary. The withdrawal shall
154 occur on the first day of the following January after the
155 vote. If the court finds that two-thirds of the voters
156 voting on the question shall not have voted favorably on the
157 question to withdraw from the district, the court shall
158 issue an order dismissing the petition and the district
159 shall continue to operate.
160 11. The governing body of any district may seek voter
161 approval to increase its current tax rate authorized under
162 this section, provided such increase shall not cause the
163 total tax to exceed thirty cents per one hundred dollars of
164 assessed valuation. To propose such an increase, the
165 governing body shall submit the question to the voters [at
166 the general municipal election in the county in which the
167 district is located] as provided in subsection 1 of section
168 115.706. The costs of submitting the question to the voters
169 [at the general municipal election] shall be paid as

SB 1517 247
170 provided in section 115.063. The question shall be
171 submitted [in substantially the following form:] as provided
172 in section 115.706.
173 [Shall the Extension District in ______ (insert
174 name of county or counties) be authorized to
175 increase the tax rate from ______ (insert
176 current amount of tax) cents to ______ (insert
177 proposed amount of tax not to exceed thirty)
178 cents per one hundred dollars of assessed
179 valuation for the purpose of funding the
180 University of Missouri Extension District
181 programs, equipment, and services in the
182 district?]
183 In a single-council district, if a majority of the voters in
184 the county approve the question, then the district shall
185 impose the tax. If a majority of the voters in a single-
186 council district do not approve the question, then the tax
187 shall not be imposed. In a consolidated district, if a
188 majority of voters in the district approve the question,
189 then the district shall impose the new tax rate. If a
190 majority of the voters in a consolidated district do not
191 approve the question, then the tax shall not be imposed in
192 any county of the district. Revenues collected from the
193 imposition of the tax authorized under this section shall be
194 deposited into the special fund dedicated only for use by
195 the district.
263.452. 1. Upon motion of the county commission, or
upon the petition of one hundred landowners in any county,
the county commission shall declare that a threat exists to
the agricultural economy of the county by reason of the
growth and infestation of noxious weeds. After such

SB 1517 248
declaration there shall be submitted to the qualified voters
of the county at the next general election, the question of
enforcing the provisions of sections 263.450 to 263.474.
The question shall be submitted [substantially as follows:]
as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the county of ______ become a "Noxious Weed
Control Area" by adopting the provisions of
sections 263.450 to 263.474, RSMo, providing for
the control of noxious weeds, and authorizing the
county commission to levy a tax of up to fifteen
cents on each one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation to provide funds for the control of
noxious weeds?
□ YES □ NO
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote.)]
2. The election thereon shall be conducted, votes
canvassed, and the results declared in the manner provided
in chapter 115 for county general elections. If a majority
of the votes cast at the election are in favor of enforcing
the law controlling noxious weeds, the clerk of the county
commission shall enter upon the commission records the
result of the election and, within ten days after the
election, shall notify the state director of agriculture of
the result of the election. If a majority of the votes cast
at the election are not in favor of enforcing such law, the
question shall not be resubmitted for at least two years
after the election.
263.472. 1. Upon the motion of the county commission
or upon the petition of one hundred landowners in any county
which has elected to declare itself a Johnson grass

SB 1517 249
extermination area pursuant to sections 263.255 to 263.267,
there shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the
county at the next general election the question of
converting a Johnson grass extermination program,
established pursuant to sections 263.255 to 263.267, to a
noxious weed control program pursuant to sections 263.450 to
263.474. The question shall be submitted [substantially as
follows:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the county of ______ convert its Johnson
grass extermination program to a noxious weed
control program pursuant to sections 263.450 to
263.474, RSMo, and authorize the county commission
to levy a tax of up to fifteen cents on each one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation to provide
funds for the control of noxious weeds, and to use
taxes already collected under the Johnson grass
extermination law for these purposes?
□ YES □ NO
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote.)]
2. The election thereon shall be conducted, votes
canvassed, and the results declared in the manner provided
in chapter 115 for county general elections.
278.240. 1. The board of soil and water conservation
district supervisors of the soil and water conservation
district in which the watershed district is formed shall act
in an advisory capacity to the watershed district board.
When a watershed district lies in more than one soil and
water conservation district, the combined boards of soil and
water conservation district supervisors shall act in an
advisory capacity to the watershed district board.

SB 1517 250
2. Five landowners within the watershed district shall
be elected to serve as trustees of the watershed district.
The trustees shall be elected by a vote of landowners
participating in the referendum for the establishment of the
watershed district, but the date of the election shall not
fall upon the date of any regular political election held in
the county. The ballot submitting the proposition to form
the watershed district shall comply with section 115.706 and
shall be so worded as to clearly state that a tax, not to
exceed forty cents on one hundred dollars valuation of all
real estate within the watershed district, may be authorized
if the watershed district is formed. In watershed districts
formed after September 28, 1977, two trustees shall be
elected for a term of six years, two shall be elected for a
term of four years, and one shall be elected for a term of
two years. Their successors shall be elected for terms of
six years. In any district in existence on September 28,
1977, the three trustees holding office shall continue as
trustees. At the next scheduled election within the
watershed district, two additional trustees shall be
elected. One of the additional trustees shall be elected
for a term of four years and one shall be elected for a term
of six years. Each successor shall be elected for a term of
six years. In case of the death, loss of landowner standing
within the watershed district, or resignation from office of
any elected watershed district trustee, his or her successor
to the unexpired term shall be appointed by the trustees of
that watershed district. A trustee may succeed himself or
herself by reelection in this office. The trustees shall
elect one of their members as chairman and one of their
members as secretary to serve for terms of two years.

SB 1517 251
3. The trustees shall act in all matters pertaining to
the watershed district, except those concerning formation,
consolidation, expansion or disestablishment of the
watershed district. It shall be the responsibility of the
secretary of the trustees to see that each soil and water
district board included in the watershed district is
provided a copy of the minutes of each meeting held by the
trustees. The trustees shall be reimbursed for expenses
incurred relating to the business of the watershed district.
278.280. 1. When a plan of work is approved the
trustees of the watershed district, pursuant to section
278.240, shall then by resolution propose that the cost of
all works of improvement contemplated in the plan be paid
either by a general levy against all real estate in the
watershed district, subject to the limitations of section
278.250, or that such cost be paid by special assessment
against lands within the watershed district to be benefitted
by the installation of the proposed works of improvement, or
that such cost be paid by both such general levy and special
assessment stating the portion to be paid by each method.
2. If the resolution of financing provides that all or
any part of the cost of the works of improvement is to be
paid by special assessment of benefits the trustees of the
watershed district, pursuant to section 278.240, shall
appoint three appraisers, who shall be residents of the
state of Missouri, and who shall not be landowners in such
watershed district, who shall recommend apportionment of the
special assessment to the tracts of land which will receive
benefits from the installation of the works of improvement
proposed in the plan of work. The appraisers shall have
access to all available engineering reports and data
pertaining to the works contemplated and may request

SB 1517 252
additional legal counsel or engineering data from a
registered professional engineer as found necessary to carry
out their duties.
3. The appraisers shall proceed to view the premises
and determine the value of all land or other property within
or without the watershed district, to be acquired and used
for rights-of-way or other works set out in the plan of
work; they shall assess the amount of benefits, and the
amount of damage if any, that will accrue to each
governmental lot, forty-acre tract or other subdivision of
land according to ownership, railroad and other rights-of-
way, railroad roadways, and other property from carrying out
and putting into effect the plan of work heretofore adopted,
and shall make written reports of their findings to the
trustees of the watershed district. Each appraiser so
appointed shall be paid for his or her services and
necessary expenses.
4. Upon receiving the report from the appraisers, the
trustees of the watershed district, pursuant to section
278.240, shall prepare a resolution which shall contain a
list of the tracts of land found to be benefitted and the
amount of assessment to be levied against each such tract,
except that no such assessment against any tract of land
shall exceed the estimated benefits to such land by such
project. Such tracts of land shall be legally described and
the names of the owners thereof shall be set forth beside
the description of each tract so listed. After adopting
such resolution the trustees of the watershed district,
pursuant to section 278.240, shall fix a time and place for
hearing any complaint that may be made as to the benefit to
any tract of land appraised, notice of which hearing shall
be given by the secretary by publication pursuant to section

SB 1517 253
278.190. The board of trustees at the hearing may alter the
benefits to any tract if, in its judgment, the same has been
appraised too high or too low. The hearing shall be
conducted in the manner set forth in section 278.200. The
trustees of the watershed district, pursuant to section
278.240, shall immediately after the hearing pass a
resolution fixing the benefit assessment as to each tract of
land.
5. After the resolution fixing the benefit assessment
has been adopted the trustees of the watershed district,
pursuant to section 278.240, shall submit the proposal for
collection of such assessed benefits to the owners of the
lands so assessed for approval and if bonds are to be issued
the amount of the issue so proposed, the rate of interest,
and the amount of any necessary tax levy in excess of the
amount authorized in section 278.250. If two-thirds of the
owners of such lands voting favor the proposal as submitted,
it shall be adopted. The provisions of sections 278.190 to
278.210 and section 115.706 as to notice and procedure and
the question submitted shall apply to the referendum held
pursuant to this section.
6. The trustees of the watershed district, pursuant to
section 278.240, shall make the necessary general levy
against all real estate in the watershed district and the
special assessment against lands within the watershed
district to be benefitted by the improvement and shall
certify the rate of levy and the amount of the special
assessment to the county commission of the county or
counties in which the watershed district is located with
directions that at the time and in the same manner required
by law for the levy of taxes for county purposes the county
commission shall levy a tax at the rate so fixed and

SB 1517 254
determined upon the assessed valuation of all real estate
within the watershed district and shall levy the amount of
the special assessment, in addition to such other taxes as
are levied by the county commission.
7. The bond issue, authorized by this section in whole
or part, may be offered for sale to the United States
Department of Agriculture's Rural Development or other
federal agency without public offering or the securing of
competitive bids on such bond offering.
321.225. 1. A fire protection district may, in
addition to its other powers and duties, provide emergency
ambulance service within its district if a majority of the
voters voting thereon approve a proposition to furnish such
service and to levy a tax not to exceed thirty cents on the
one hundred dollars assessed valuation to be used
exclusively to supply funds for the operation of an
emergency ambulance service. The district shall exercise
the same powers and duties in operating an emergency
ambulance service as it does in operating its fire
protection service.
2. The proposition to furnish emergency ambulance
service may be submitted by the board of directors at any
[municipal general, primary or] general election or at any
election of the members of the board.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______
Fire Protection District be authorized to
provide emergency ambulance service
within the district and be authorized to
levy a tax not to exceed thirty cents on
the one hundred dollars assessed

SB 1517 255
valuation to provide funds for such
services?]
4. If a majority of the voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of emergency ambulance service and the levy, the
district shall forthwith commence such service.
5. As used in this section "emergency" means a
situation resulting from a sudden or unforeseen situation or
occurrence that requires immediate action to save life or
prevent suffering or disability.
6. In addition to all other taxes authorized on or
before September 1, 1990, the board of directors of any fire
protection district may, if a majority of the voters of the
district voting thereon approve, levy an additional tax of
not more than forty cents per one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation to be used for the support of the
ambulance service or partial or complete support of a
paramedic first responder program. The proposition to levy
the tax authorized by this subsection may be submitted by
the board of directors [at the next annual election of the
members of the board or at any regular municipal or school
election conducted by the county clerk or board of election
commissioners in such district or at a special election
called for the purpose,] at a general election or upon
petition of five hundred registered voters of the district.
A separate ballot containing the question shall [read as
follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______
Fire Protection District be authorized to levy
an additional tax of not more than forty cents
per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to
provide funds for the support of an ambulance

SB 1517 256
service or partial or complete support of a
paramedic first responder program?
□ FOR THE PROPOSITION
□ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote.)]
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection, but if a majority of voters casting votes
thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by this
subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in
effect.
321.240. 1. To levy and collect taxes as herein
provided, the board shall in each year determine the amount
of money necessary to be raised by taxation, and shall fix a
rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of the
taxable tangible property within the district as shown by
the last completed assessment, and with other revenues, will
raise the amount required by the district annually to supply
funds for paying the expenses of organization and operation
and the costs of acquiring, supplying and maintaining the
property, works and equipment of the district, and maintain
the necessary personnel, which rate of levy shall not exceed
thirty cents on the one hundred dollars valuation[;].
2. The board may fix an additional rate, not to exceed
ten cents on the hundred dollars valuation, the revenues
from which shall be deposited in a special fund and used

SB 1517 257
only for the pension program of the district, by submitting
the following question to the voters[:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to increase
the annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______
cents per one hundred dollars valuation, the
revenues from which shall be deposited in a
special fund and used only for the pension
program of the district?
provided, that] as provided in section 115.706. If the
question fails to receive a majority of the votes cast, it
shall not be resubmitted to the voters [within one year
after the election; except, that] until the next general
election.
3. Any district may impose a tax not to exceed ten
cents on the one hundred dollars valuation, in addition to
the rate which the board may levy under this section, by
submitting the [following] question to the voters [at any
election in such district at which a member of the board of
directors is to be elected:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to increase
the annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______
cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation?
and] as provided in section 115.706.
4. In addition [thereto, to] to other requirements of
this section, the board may fix a rate of levy which will
enable it to promptly pay in full when due all interest on
and principal of bonds and other obligations of the
district, and to pay any indebtedness authorized by a vote

SB 1517 258
of the people as provided in this chapter; and in the event
of accruing defaults or deficiencies in the bonded or
contractual indebtedness, an additional levy may be made as
provided in section 321.260.
321.241. 1. The board of directors of any fire
protection district may levy, if a majority of the voters of
the district voting thereon approve, in addition to all
other taxes heretofore approved, an additional tax of not
more than twenty-five cents per one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation to be used for the support of the
district. The proposition to levy the tax authorized by
this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors
[at the next annual election of the members of the board or
at any regular municipal or school election conducted by the
county clerk or board of election commissioners in such
district or at a special election called for the purpose,]
as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706 or upon
petition of five hundred registered voters of the district.
A separate ballot containing the question shall [read as
follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to levy an
additional tax of not more than twenty-five cents
on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to
provide funds for the support of the district?
□ FOR THE PROPOSITION
□ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote.) ]

SB 1517 259
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection, but if a majority of the voters casting
votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain
in effect.
2. After August 13, 1982, the board of directors of
any fire protection district may levy, if a majority of the
voters of the district voting thereon approve, in addition
to all other taxes heretofore approved, an additional tax of
not more than ten cents per one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation to be used for the support of the district. The
proposition to levy the tax authorized by this subsection
may be submitted by the board of directors [at the next
annual election of the members of the board or at any
regular municipal or school election conducted by the county
clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or
at a special election called for the purpose,] as provided
in subsection 1 of section 115.706 or upon petition of five
hundred registered voters of the district. A separate
ballot containing the question shall [read as follows:] be
submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to levy an
additional tax of not more than ten cents on the
one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide
funds for the support of the district?
□ FOR THE PROPOSITION
□ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION

SB 1517 260
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote.) ]
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection, but if a majority of the voters casting
votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain
in effect.
3. In addition to all other taxes authorized on or
before September 28, 1985, the board of directors of any
fire protection district may, if a majority of the voters of
the district voting thereon approve, levy an additional tax
of not more than twenty-five cents per one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation to be used for the support of the
district. The proposition to levy the tax authorized by
this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors
[at the next annual election of the members of the board or
at any regular municipal or school election conducted by the
county clerk or board of election commissioners in such
district or at a special election called for the purpose,]
as provided in subsection 1 of section 115.706 or upon
petition of five hundred registered voters of the district.
A separate ballot containing the question shall [read as
follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to levy an
additional tax of not more than twenty-five cents
on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to
provide funds for the support of the district?

SB 1517 261
□ FOR THE PROPOSITION
□ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote.)]
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection, but if a majority of the voters casting
votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain
in effect.
4. The board of directors of any fire protection
district may levy, if a majority of the voters of the
district voting thereon approve, in addition to all other
100 taxes heretofore approved, an additional tax of not more
101 than fifty cents per one hundred dollars of assessed
102 valuation to be used for the support of the district. The
103 proposition to levy the tax authorized by this subsection
104 may be submitted by the board of directors [at the next
105 annual election of the members of the board or at any
106 regular municipal or school election conducted by the county
107 clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or
108 at a special election called for that purpose,] as provided
109 in subsection 1 of section 115.706 or upon petition of five
110 hundred registered voters of the district. A separate
111 ballot containing the question shall [read as follows:] be
112 submitted as provided in section 115.706.
113 [Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire
114 Protection District be authorized to levy an

SB 1517 262
115 additional tax of not more than fifty cents on the
116 one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide
117 funds for the support of the district?
118 □ FOR THE PROPOSITION
119 □ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
120 (Place an X in the square opposite the one for
121 which you wish to vote.)]
122 If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
123 be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
124 accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of
125 this subsection, but if a majority of the voters casting
126 votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
127 this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain
128 in effect.
321.243. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, an additional tax of not to exceed
three cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation
may be levied and collected by any city, town, village,
county, or fire protection district, or a central fire and
emergency services board established in subsection 4 of this
section as provided in section 115.706. All the funds
derived from such tax, including any existing surplus funds,
shall be used for the purpose of establishing and providing
a joint central fire and emergency dispatching service and
for expenditures for equipment and services, except for
salaries, wages, and benefits, by cities, towns, villages,
counties, or fire protection districts which contract with
such joint central fire and emergency dispatching service.

SB 1517 263
2. The additional tax prescribed by this section shall
be levied only when the governing body of the city, town,
village, county, fire protection district, or central fire
and emergency services board determines that a central fire
and emergency dispatching center will meet the minimum
requirements set by section 321.245, and, except where a
central fire and emergency services board is established in
accordance with subsection 4 of this section, when the
governing body has entered into a contract with the center
for fire and emergency dispatching services. The funds from
the tax shall be kept separate and apart from all other
funds of the city, town, village, county, fire protection
district, or central fire and emergency services board and
shall be paid out only on order of the governing body.
Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section, all
funds received by such center, and all operations of such
center shall be governed and controlled by a board of
directors consisting of one member from each such agency
using the joint central fire and emergency dispatching
service. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 of
this section, in any county, city, town, or village, where a
tax-supported fire protection district is provided emergency
dispatching services by any form of joint communication
organization or emergency dispatching center, receiving
directly or indirectly any funds so levied and collected as
provided in this section including any funds or tariffs paid
by telephone subscribers for 911 emergency service, such
joint communication organization, however organized, shall
be governed by a board of directors, and the board of
directors shall consist in part of one member appointed by
each county, city, town, village or tax-supported fire
protection district so served. The members shall be an

SB 1517 264
elected official of a fire protection district, ambulance
district or city council appointed by each such agency to
serve for a one-year term or until a successor is duly
appointed.
3. In addition to the tax prescribed by subsections 1
and 2 of this section, an additional tax of not to exceed
two cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation
which has been approved by the voters as provided in section
115.706 may be levied and collected by any city, town,
village, county, or fire protection district, or a central
fire and emergency services board established in subsection
4 of this section of a county of the first classification
with a charter form of government which has a population
between two hundred thousand and five hundred thousand
inhabitants, but all of the funds derived from such tax
shall be used solely for the purpose of establishing and
providing a joint central fire and emergency dispatching
service.
4. A central fire and emergency services board shall
be established in any county of the first classification
with a charter form of government which has a population
between two hundred thousand and five hundred thousand
inhabitants in the manner prescribed in this subsection.
The board shall have all powers and duties prescribed in
this section and section 321.245 to establish and provide a
joint central fire and emergency dispatching service. The
initial board shall be established at the April, 1996,
election. The election authority shall be ordered to
conduct such election, which shall be conducted as a
nonpartisan election. The board shall consist of one member
elected from each county council district. All board
members shall serve for four-year terms, except that of the

SB 1517 265
initial members elected, the members elected from odd-
numbered county council districts shall serve for terms of
two years and the members elected from even-numbered county
council districts shall serve for terms of four years. Each
member shall be a resident of the county council district
from which the member is elected. No person who is a paid
employee of any fire protection district, ambulance
district, joint central fire and emergency dispatch board,
or a paid employee of a fire or ambulance department of a
municipality shall be elected to the joint central fire and
emergency dispatch board. At such election, the election
authority of the county shall submit to the qualified voters
of the county a proposal for the board to levy and collect
the taxes prescribed in this section as provided in section
115.706, and such tax shall be conditioned on the
replacement of the tax levied in such county by the county
under this section with the new tax levied by the board. A
portion of the funds derived from the tax levied pursuant to
this subsection shall be used to reimburse the county for
the cost of the election held in April, 1996, and any
subsequent elections that are necessary for the operation of
100 the board and the board's duties. In addition, if such a
101 tax is approved, any funds remaining in the separate fund
102 kept by the county, as required by subsection 2 of this
103 section, and any property and equipment purchased with
104 moneys in such separate fund held by the county shall be
105 transferred to the fund maintained by the board for the same
106 purpose. The board shall abide by section 50.660 in the
107 letting of contracts. The board shall be audited by the
108 state auditor pursuant to section 29.230. Except as
109 otherwise provided in this subsection, the board shall meet
110 as established in the bylaws. Any other meeting may be

SB 1517 266
111 called by four of the seven members voting in favor of
112 having an additional meeting.
113 5. Any fire protection district in any county with a
114 charter form of government and with more than one hundred
115 ninety-eight thousand but fewer than one hundred ninety-nine
116 thousand two hundred inhabitants that has levied any tax
117 under this section and has levied and imposed any
118 communications tax for central fire and emergency
119 dispatching services may submit a proposal to the voters of
120 the fire protection district to use the revenue derived from
121 the tax imposed under this section for general revenue
122 purposes. No revenues derived from any such tax imposed
123 under this section shall be used for any purpose other than
124 the stated purpose unless and until such proposal to use the
125 revenue for general revenue purposes has been submitted to
126 and approved by the voters of the fire protection district
127 in the same manner as other proposals are submitted to and
128 approved by the voters of the fire protection district.
321.244. 1. Any fire protection district which has
revised or reduced any levy which it has been authorized to
impose under the provisions of section 321.225, 321.240,
321.241, 321.243, 321.246, 321.610, or 321.620, under any
provision of the constitution or laws of this state, may
increase each such revised or reduced levy up to, but not in
excess of, the maximum limits allowed under the section
authorizing the rate of levy sought to be increased by
submitting [the following proposition] to the voters of the
district at any [primary,] general [or special] election[:]
a proposition as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to increase the

SB 1517 267
rate of levy for ______ (insert purpose of which
tax is levied) from ______ cents to ______ cents
on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation?
□ YES □ NO]
2. If any of the propositions submitted under
subsection 1 of this section is approved by a majority of
the voters of the district voting thereon, the board of
directors may increase the levy which was the subject of
such proposition to the amount authorized by such
proposition.
321.460. 1. Two or more fire protection districts may
consolidate with each other in the manner hereinafter
provided, and only if the districts have one or more common
boundaries, in whole or in part, or are located within the
same county, in whole or in part, as to any respective two
of the districts which are so consolidating.
2. By a majority vote of each board of directors of
each fire protection district included within the proposed
consolidation, a consolidation plan may be adopted. The
consolidation plan shall include the name of the proposed
consolidated district, the legal description of the
boundaries of each district to be consolidated, and a legal
description of the boundaries of the consolidated district,
the amount of outstanding bonds, if any, of each district
proposed to be consolidated, a listing of the firehouses
within each district, and the names of the districts to be
consolidated.
3. Each board of the districts approving the plan for
proposed consolidation shall duly certify and file in the
office of the clerk of the circuit court of the county in

SB 1517 268
which the district is located a copy of the plan of
consolidation, bearing the signatures of those directors who
vote in favor thereof, together with a petition for
consolidation. The petition may be made jointly by all of
the districts within the respective plan of consolidation.
A filing fee of fifty dollars shall be deposited with the
clerk, on the filing of the petition, against the costs of
court.
4. The circuit court sitting in and for any county to
which the petition is presented is hereby vested with
jurisdiction, power and authority to hear the same, and to
approve the consolidation and order such districts
consolidated, after holding an election, as hereinafter
provided.
5. If the circuit court finds the plan for
consolidation to have been duly approved by the respective
boards of directors of the fire protection districts
proposed to be consolidated, then the circuit court shall
enter its order of record, directing the submission of the
question.
6. The order shall direct publication of notice of
election, and shall fix the date thereof for the next
general election day. The order shall direct that the
elections shall be held to vote on the proposition of
consolidating the districts and to elect three persons,
having the qualifications declared in section 321.130 and
being among the then directors of the districts proposed to
be consolidated, to become directors of the consolidated
district.
7. The question shall be submitted in substantially
[the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.

SB 1517 269
[Shall the ______ Fire Protection Districts and
the ______ Fire Protection District be
consolidated into one fire protection district
to be known as the ______ Fire Protection
District, with tax levies not in excess of the
following amounts: maintenance fund ______
cents per one hundred dollars assessed
valuation; ambulance service ______ cents per
one hundred dollars assessed valuation; pension
fund ______ cents per one hundred dollars
assessed valuation; and dispatching fund ______
cents per one hundred dollars assessed
valuation?]
8. If, upon the canvass and declaration, it is found
and determined that a majority of the voters of the
districts voting on the proposition or propositions have
voted in favor of the proposition to incorporate the
consolidated district, then the court shall then further, in
its order, designate the first board of directors of the
consolidated district, who have been elected by the voters
voting thereon, the one receiving the third highest number
of votes to hold office until the first Tuesday in April
which is more than one year after the date of election, the
one receiving the second highest number of votes to hold
office until two years after the first Tuesday aforesaid,
and the one receiving the highest number of votes until four
years after the first Tuesday in April as aforesaid. If any
other propositions are also submitted at the election, the
court, in its order, shall also declare the results of the
votes thereon. If the court shall find and determine, upon
the canvass and declaration, that a majority of the voters
of the consolidated district have not voted in favor of the

SB 1517 270
proposition to incorporate the consolidated district, then
the court shall enter its order declaring the proceedings
void and of no effect, and shall dismiss the same at the
cost of petitioners.
321.610. 1. In addition to all other limits set forth
in this chapter, the board in counties of the first
classification shall in each year determine the amount of
money necessary to be raised by taxation, and shall fix a
rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of the
taxable tangible property within the district as shown by
the last completed assessment, and with other revenues, will
raise the amount required by the district annually to supply
funds for paying the expenses of organization and operation
and the costs of acquiring, supplying and maintaining the
property, works and equipment of the district, and maintain
the necessary personnel, which rate of levy shall not exceed
forty cents on the one hundred dollars valuation. The board
in any county of the first classification having a
population in excess of nine hundred thousand may fix an
additional rate not to exceed twenty-five cents on the
hundred dollars valuation and the board in all other first
classification counties may fix an additional rate, not to
exceed fifteen cents on the hundred dollars valuation, the
revenues from which shall be deposited in a special fund and
used only for the pension program of the district, by
submitting [the following question] to the voters at [the
municipal general, primary or] a general election in such
district [or at any election at which a member of the board
of directors is to be elected:] a question as provided in
section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to levy an

SB 1517 271
annual tax rate of ______ cents per one hundred
dollars valuation, the revenues from which shall
be deposited in a special fund and used only for
the pension program of the district?]
2. Any district approving a tax levy rate pursuant to
the provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall
transfer all revenue collected plus interest monthly for
deposit in the district retirement fund. The board of
directors for the fire protection district shall comply with
the prudent investor standard for investment fiduciaries as
provided in section 105.688 when investing the assets of the
pension program.
3. Any district may impose a tax not to exceed ten
cents on the one hundred dollars valuation, in addition to
the rate which the board may levy pursuant to this section,
by submitting the [following] question to the voters at any
election in such district held on the [first Tuesday in
April of any year:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire
District be authorized to increase the annual
tax rate from ______ cents to ______ cents on
the hundred dollars assessed valuation?
and] general election day as provided in section 115.706 in
addition thereto, [to] a district may fix a rate of levy
which will enable it to promptly pay in full when due all
interest on and principal of bonds and other obligations of
the district, and to pay any indebtedness authorized by a
vote of the people as provided by sections 321.010 to
321.450 and section 115.706; and in the event of accruing
defaults or deficiencies in the bonded or contractual

SB 1517 272
indebtedness, an additional levy may be made as provided in
section 321.260 and section 115.706.
321.620. 1. Fire protection districts in first class
counties may, in addition to their other powers and duties,
provide ambulance service within their district if a
majority of the voters voting thereon approve a proposition
to furnish such service and to levy a tax not to exceed
thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation
to be used exclusively to supply funds for the operation of
an emergency ambulance service. The district shall exercise
the same powers and duties in operating an ambulance service
as it does in operating its fire protection service. As
used in this section "emergency" means a situation resulting
from a sudden or unforeseen situation or occurrence that
requires immediate action to save life or prevent suffering
or disability.
2. The proposition to furnish ambulance service may be
submitted by the board of directors at any [municipal
general, primary or] general election or [at any election of
the members of the board or] upon petition by five hundred
voters of such district.
3. The question shall be submitted [in substantially
the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to provide
ambulance service within the district and be
authorized to levy a tax not to exceed thirty
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation to provide funds for such
services?]

SB 1517 273
4. If a majority of the voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of ambulance service and the levy, the district
shall forthwith commence such service.
5. In addition to all other taxes authorized on or
before September 1, 1990, the board of directors of any fire
protection district may, if a majority of the voters of the
district voting thereon approve, levy an additional tax of
not more than forty cents per one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation to be used for the support of the
ambulance service, or partial or complete support of a
paramedic first responder program. The proposition to levy
the tax authorized by this subsection may be submitted by
the board of directors at the next [annual election of the
members of the board or at any regular municipal or school
election conducted by the county clerk or board of election
commissioners in such district or at a special election
called for the purpose,] general election or upon petition
of five hundred registered voters of the district. A
separate ballot containing the question shall [read as
follows:] be submitted as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall the board of directors of the ______
Fire Protection District be authorized to levy
an additional tax of not more than forty cents
per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to
provide funds for the support of an ambulance
service or partial or complete support of a
paramedic first responder program?
□ FOR THE PROPOSITION
□ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote).]

SB 1517 274
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection, but if a majority of voters casting votes
thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by this
subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in
effect.
650.399. 1. The board of commissioners may, by a
majority vote of its members, request that the governing
body of the county submit to the qualified voters of such
county at a general[, primary or special] election [either
of the questions] a question relating to sales tax as
contained in subsection 2 of this section or a question
relating to property tax as provided in section 115.706.
The governing body may approve or deny such request. The
governing body may also vote to submit such question without
a request of the board of commissioners. The county
election official shall give legal notice of the election
pursuant to chapter 115.
2. The [questions] property tax question shall be
submitted as provided in section 115.706, and the sales tax
question shall be put in substantially the following form:
[(1) Shall (name of county) establish an emergency
communications system fund to establish (and/or)
maintain an emergency communications system, and
for which the county shall levy a tax of (insert
exact amount, not to exceed six cents) per each one
hundred dollars assessed valuation therefor, to be
paid into the fund for that purpose?
□ YES □ NO

SB 1517 275
; or
(2)] Shall (name of county) establish an
emergency communications system fund to establish
(and/or) maintain an emergency communications
system, and for which the county shall levy a
sales tax of (insert exact amount, not to exceed
one-tenth of one percent), to be paid into the
fund for that purpose?
□ YES □ NO
3. The election shall be conducted and vote canvassed
in the same manner as other county elections. If the
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon vote in
favor of such tax, then the county shall levy such tax in
the specified amount, beginning in the tax year immediately
following its approval. The tax so levied shall be
collected along with other county taxes in the manner
provided by law. If the majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon vote against such tax, then such tax shall
not be imposed unless such tax is resubmitted to the voters
and a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon
approve such tax.
4. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by
the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question authorizing a sales tax, then the tax shall become
effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter
after the director of revenue receives notification of
adoption of the local sales tax. Any sales tax levied under
this section shall apply to all retail sales made within the
county which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144,
except sales of food as defined in section 144.014. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified

SB 1517 276
voters voting thereon are opposed to the question
authorizing the sales tax, then the tax shall not become
effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under
this section to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
question, but no question shall be resubmitted under this
section [sooner than twelve months from the date of the last
question submitted to and opposed by the voters under this
section] until the next general election.
5. Except as modified in this section, all provisions
of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed
under this section.
6. All revenue collected under this section by the
director of the department of revenue on behalf of any
county, except for one percent for the cost of collection
which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue
fund, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is
hereby created and shall be known as the "County Emergency
Communications Sales Tax Fund", and shall be used solely for
the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be
deemed to be state funds, and shall not be commingled with
any funds of the state. The director may make refunds from
the amounts in the fund and credited to the county for
erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such
county. Any funds in the special fund which are not needed
for current expenditures shall be invested in the same
manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys
earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of
revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in the fund
during the preceding month by distributing the sum due the

SB 1517 277
county as certified by the director of revenue to the county
treasurer, or such other officer as may be designated by the
county ordinance or order, of each county imposing the tax
authorized by this section.
7. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means,
all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue
to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the
county shall notify the director of the department of
revenue of the action at least ninety days before the
effective date of the repeal and the director may order
retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of
two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such
notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax
100 and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the
101 credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after
102 the effective date of abolition of the tax in such county,
103 the director shall remit the balance in the account to the
104 county and close the account of that county. The director
105 shall notify each county of each instance of any amount
106 refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
650.408. 1. The funds necessary for payment of any
obligation of the county in connection with the
establishment, operation and maintenance of the emergency
communications system may be paid by the county out of the
fund established pursuant to section 650.402, or from bonds
issued pursuant to this section.
2. For the purpose of supporting the operation and
other purposes of the commission and the emergency
communications system, the county may issue bonds for and on
behalf of the county, payable out of funds derived from the
sales tax authorized in sections 650.396 and 650.399 or from
taxation of all taxable real property in the county, up to

SB 1517 278
an amount not exceeding six percent of the assessed
valuation of such property, with such evaluation to be
ascertained by the assessment immediately prior to the most
recent assessment for state and county purposes, or from
revenue generated from any other tax or fee authorized and
approved by the voters pursuant to section 650.399. Such
bonds shall be issued in denominations of one hundred
dollars, or some multiple thereof, and the provisions of
section 108.170 to the contrary notwithstanding, such bonds
may bear interest at a rate determined by the emergency
communications system commissioners, payable semiannually,
to become payable no later than twenty years after the date
of the bonds.
3. Whenever the board of commissioners of any such
emergency communications district proposes to issue bonds
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section,
they shall submit the question to the voters in the district
pursuant to this section and section 115.706. The notice
for any such election shall, in addition to the requirements
of chapter 115, state the amount of bonds to be issued.
4. The question shall be submitted in substantially
[the following form:] as provided in section 115.706.
[Shall ______ County issue bonds in the amount of
______ dollars, the purpose of which are to
support the construction, repair and maintenance
of the ______ Emergency Communications System?
□ YES □ NO]
5. The result of the election on the question shall be
entered upon the records of the county. If it shall appear
that four-sevenths of the voters voting on the question

SB 1517 279
shall have voted in favor of the issue of the bonds, the
commissioners shall order and direct the execution of the
bonds for and on behalf of such county and the commission.
If the general law of the state is such that an amount other
than a four-sevenths majority is required on ballot measures
of such type, the amount set by the general law of the state
shall control.
6. The county shall not sell such bonds for less than
ninety-five percent of the par value thereof, and the
proceeds shall be paid over to the county treasurer, and
disbursed on warrants drawn by the president or vice
president of the board of commissioners and attested by the
secretary. The proceeds of the sale of such bonds shall be
used for the purpose only of paying the cost of holding such
election, and constructing, repairing and maintaining the
emergency communications system and its appurtenances.
7. Such bonds shall be payable and collectible only
out of moneys derived from tax revenues authorized by
section 650.399, from the sale of such bonds or from
interest that may accrue on funds so derived while on
deposit with any county depositary. The county treasurer
shall hold in reserve, for payment of interest on such
bonds, a sufficient amount of the money so derived that may
come into his or her hands in excess of the amount then
necessary to pay all bonds and interest then past due, to
pay all interest that will become payable before the next
installment of such special tax becomes payable, and three
percent of the principal amount of the bonds not then due.
The county treasurer shall, whenever any of the bonds or
interest thereon become due, apply such money as may be in
his or her custody and applicable thereto, or that may
thereafter come into his or her custody and be applicable

SB 1517 280
thereto, to payment of such bonds and interest as may be due
and unpaid.
8. All money derived from the tax authorized pursuant
to section 650.399 shall be used in paying the bonds and the
interest thereon, except that the money that may be
collected pursuant to such tax in excess of the amount
necessary to pay all bonds then past due and such bonds and
interest as will become payable before another assessment of
such tax becomes payable may, less an amount equal to three
percent of the principal amount of the bonds not then due,
be used for the purposes authorized in section 650.411.
9. The county treasurer shall, as such bonds are sold,
deliver them to the purchaser upon being ordered to do so by
the commissioners. The county treasurer shall cancel bonds
as such bonds are paid, and shall deliver them to the clerk
of the county.
[137.570. The question shall be submitted
in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ road district of ______
County levy an additional tax rate of ______
cents on the hundred dollars valuation, for a
period of ______ years?]
Section B. If any provision of this act or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, such determination shall not affect the provisions
or applications of this act which may be given effect
without the invalid provision or application, and to that
end the provisions of this act are severable.
✓